Personal
Business
Help Center
Newsroom
Careers
Get NayaPay
User T&Cs
Chat T&Cs
Dispute Resolution T&Cs
Privacy Policy
Last Updated: 29 Oct 2021
1.  ABOUT NAYAPAY
NayaPay is licensed by the SBP as an Electronic Money Institution under the EMI Regulations.
2.  SCOPE
These Terms of Use govern the opening and closure of your NayaPay Account and use of the same and other Services available on the NayaPay Platform. Together with our Policies, and any other terms and conditions referred to in these Terms of Use, they constitute the agreement between you and us. For the use of certain Services, you may have to accept additional terms and conditions as notified to you when you are procuring or using such Services (
“Additional T&Cs”
). You are advised to print or download and keep a copy of these Terms of Use for future reference. You can ensure that you are reviewing the current Terms of Use on our Website or access the same on the NayaPay Platform.
3.  YOUR NAYAPAY ACCOUNT
3.1. In order to use our Services, you must first open a NayaPay Account by registering on the NayaPay Platform. As part of the registration process, we will ask you to create a NayaPay ID (for e.g. ab@nayapay). This ID will be used to identify you as a NayaPay user. At all times NayaPay shall hold full rights of the NayaPay ID. As and when required by NayaPay and without giving prior notice, NayaPay shall have the authority to revoke the NayaPay ID and ask you to change it. NayaPay will provide an option to you to choose an alternate NayaPay ID as part of the change procedure. As part of the registration process, you will also need to accept these Terms of Use and you must be at least eighteen (18) years of age and have legal capacity to accept the same. Please note that Additional T&Cs may apply to particular  Services.
3.2. Your NayaPay Account holds E-Money which enables you to use the Payment Services.
3.3.  Your NayaPay Account is denominated in PKR. This will remain the currency of your NayaPay Account for the duration of your agreement with us.
3.4. The E-Money held in your NayaPay Account does not expire but it will not earn any interest, mark-up, or any other form of return.
3.5. The NayaPay Account is not a bank account or a deposit. By accepting these Terms of Use you agree and acknowledge that the Banking Companies Ordinance, 1962 does not apply to your NayaPay Account. The E-Money held in your NayaPay Account is at all times backed by funds, which are held separate from our funds, in a trust account which is administered by a Trustee in accordance with the EMI Regulations.
3.6. The E-Money in a NayaPay Account belongs to the person or legal entity which is registered as the NayaPay Account holder. No person other than the NayaPay Account holder has any rights in relation to the E-Money held in a NayaPay Account, except as required under Applicable Laws. You may not assign or transfer your NayaPay Account to a third party or otherwise grant any third party a legal or equitable interest over it.
3.7. Any fee or other amounts payable by you to us shall be deducted/offset from the balance in your NayaPay Account. If the NayaPay Account balance is insufficient, we reserve the right to invoice you for any shortfall and/or restrict the provision of any or all of the Services.
3.8. By opening a NayaPay Account you represent and warrant to us that your opening of a NayaPay Account does not violate any Applicable Laws as are applicable to you.
3.9. All information you provide during the signup process or any time, thereafter, including information required pursuant to Applicable Laws, must be accurate and truthful, and you represent and warrant to us that all information provided as part of the signup process is true and accurate.
4.  MAINTAINING YOUR NAYAPAY ACCOUNT
4.1. You must ensure that the information recorded on your NayaPay Account is always accurate and up to date. We may ask you at any time to confirm the accuracy of your information or to provide documents or other evidence.
4.2. You may only add a Load Method to your NayaPay Account if you are the named holder or user of that Load Method. We take any violation of this requirement very seriously and will treat any attempt to add a Load Method of which you are not the named holder or user as a fraudulent act.
4.3. Any use of the Payment Services is displayed in your Transaction history on the NayaPay Platform. Each Transaction is given a unique Transaction ID and shown in the Transaction history. We will not alter or amend information displayed in your Transaction history. You should quote the relevant Transaction ID when communicating with us about a particular Transaction. You should check your NayaPay Account balance and Transaction history regularly. You should report any irregularities or clarify any questions you have as soon as possible by contacting Customer Service.
4.4. You must notify us without undue delay after becoming aware of any unauthorised or incorrect Transaction and in any event no later than three (3) months after the date of such Transaction.
5.  SECURITY & SAFETY
5.1. The NayaPay Platform uses built-in features to help protect the security of your NayaPay Account. As part of the registration process, you will be required to set your NayaPay Password and PIN.
5.2. You must take all reasonable steps to keep your: (i) NayaPay Password and PIN secure at all times and never disclose them to anyone; and (ii) Debit Card safe and within your possession. Our personnel will never ask you to provide your NayaPay Password and/or PIN to us or to a third party. Any message you receive or website you visit that asks for your NayaPay Password and/or PIN, other than the NayaPay Platform should be reported to us. It is advisable to change your NayaPay Password and PIN regularly (at least every three (3) to six (6) months) in order to reduce the risk of a security breach in relation to your NayaPay Account. We also advise you not to choose a NayaPay Password or PIN that is easily guessed from information someone might know or gather about you, or a NayaPay Password or PIN that has a meaning. You must never allow anyone to: (i) access your NayaPay Account or watch you accessing your NayaPay Account; and (ii) take possession of your Debit Card. You must comply with the security procedures we tell you about from time to time.
5.3. If you have any indication or suspicion of your NayaPay Account, Debit Card, login details, NayaPay Password, PIN, or other security feature being lost, stolen, misappropriated, used without authorisation or otherwise compromised, you are advised to change your NayaPay Password and PIN. You must contact Customer Service without undue delay on becoming aware of any loss, theft, misappropriation or unauthorised use of your NayaPay Account, Debit Card, login details, NayaPay Password, PIN or other security features. Any undue delay in notifying us will affect the security of your NayaPay Account.
5.4. If we think your NayaPay Account is at risk of fraud or a security threat, we will use our best efforts to contact you through the fastest and most secure means using the details you have provided to tell you what you need to do to help deal with that risk.
5.5. You must take all reasonable care to ensure that your e-mail account(s), mobile number, and Devices are secure and only accessed by you, as the same may be used to compromise the security of your NayaPay Account. In case any of the aforementioned means of communication are compromised, you should, without undue delay after becoming aware of this, contact Customer Service.
5.6. Certain Services you use on the NayaPay Platform may have additional security requirements and you must familiarise yourself with those as notified to you.
6.  CLOSING YOUR NAYAPAY ACCOUNT
6.1. We may close your NayaPay Account in accordance with section 17. You may close your NayaPay Account at any time by contacting Customer Service. If your NayaPay Account holds a balance at the time of its closure, we will ask you to withdraw your funds within a reasonable period of time, during which your NayaPay Account will be accessible for the purpose of withdrawing the remaining balance only. After the expiry of this period you will not be able to access your NayaPay Account, but you may withdraw any remaining funds by contacting Customer Service and requesting that the funds are sent to you in accordance with the relevant procedure.
6.2. In the event that you decide to discontinue use of a Debit Card, such Debit Card shall be returned to NayaPay. Notwithstanding this, the Debit Card issued to you shall remain at all times, the sole property of NayaPay and shall be surrendered on demand to NayaPay as per our request. NayaPay, at its sole discretion, reserves the right, at any time, to cancel or withdraw the Debit Card or refuse to reissue, renew or replace the same under intimation to you.
6.3. In the event of your death, Transactions shall continue to be debited to your NayaPay Account till such time that NayaPay is informed in writing about your death. Upon receiving such notice, NayaPay will block any fresh Transactions carried out from the date of receipt of the notice. All Transactions authorised through your Password, PIN, and other security credentials, before receipt of notice of your death, shall be debited to your NayaPay Account accordingly. Subject to exercise of any remedy available to NayaPay, in its sole discretion, in the event of your death, custody of the funds present in your E-Money Account shall only be handed to your successors-in-interest upon receipt of a succession certificate issued in accordance with Applicable Laws.
6.4. You may access your Transaction history for a period of six (6) months after the closure of your NayaPay Account by contacting Customer Service and requesting the information. Your obligations with regards to keeping your NayaPay Account safe as set forth in section 5 shall continue to apply.
6.5. We reserve the right to carry out any necessary money laundering, terrorism financing, fraud or other illegal activity checks before authorising any withdrawal of your funds, including in relation to returning any funds to you after you have closed your NayaPay Account.
7.  LOADING E-MONEY
7.1. You can load E-Money to your NayaPay Account through the Load Methods specified on the NayaPay Platform. Load Methods are services provided by third parties (for example, the cash-counter at a Partner Institution where you deposit PKR to load E-Money or a, Linked Account).
7.2. We do not guarantee the availability of any particular Load Method and may make changes to or discontinue the acceptance of any particular Load Method at our sole discretion and/or in compliance with Applicable Laws.
7.3. E-Money will be credited to your NayaPay Account after the corresponding PKR have been received by us or on behalf of us by the relevant Partner Institution.
8.  PROHIBITED TRANSACTIONS
8.1. It is strictly forbidden to use the Payment Services in connection with the sale or supply of: drugs and drug paraphernalia, weapons (including without limitation, knives, guns, firearms or ammunition), satellite and cable TV descramblers, pornography, adult material, material which incites violence, hatred, racism or which is considered obscene, government IDs and licences including replicas and novelty items and any counterfeit products, unlicensed or illegal lotteries or gambling services (including without limitation the use of or participation in illegal gambling houses), unregistered charity services, items which encourage or facilitate illegal activities, prepaid debit cards or other stored value cards that are not associated with a particular merchant and are not limited to purchases of particular products or services, third party processing or payment aggregation products or services, multi-level marketing, pyramid selling or Ponzi schemes, matrix programmes or other “get rich quick” schemes or high yield investment programmes, goods or services that infringe the intellectual property rights of a third party, or un-coded/miscoded gaming. We reserve the right, in our sole discretion, to add categories of prohibited transactions by adding such categories either to these Terms of Use or by notifying them to you in accordance with these Terms of Use.
8.2. It is strictly forbidden to use your NayaPay Account for any illegal purposes including but not limited to fraud and money laundering and may require you to submit evidence of the source of funds being used to load your NayaPay Account. We will report any suspicious activity to the relevant law enforcement agencies as required by Applicable Law.
8.3. It is your, and not our responsibility, to ensure that you only use the Payment Services in compliance with Applicable Laws. The mere fact that a person or entity accepts payments through the Payment Services is not an indication of the legality of the supply or provision of their goods and services or of the underlying transaction. If you are in doubt as to the legality of a supply or purchase or the underlying transaction, you should not continue with your payment.
9.  WITHDRAWING E-MONEY
9.1. You can request a withdrawal of all, or part, of the E-Money held in your NayaPay Account at any time through the Withdrawal Methods specified in the NayaPay Platform.
9.2. We do not guarantee the availability of any particular Withdrawal Method and may, at our sole discretion, make changes to or discontinue a particular Withdrawal Method at any time without providing you with any notice.
9.3. In the event you use your Debit Card or biometrics at a Partner Institution’s ATM which dispenses cash but your NayaPay Account is not debited for the same, NayaPay is irrevocably authorised to debit the relevant NayaPay Account for such withdrawal along with applicable charges, regardless of whether the account holder is informed or has authorised the same. The applicable charges will be in accordance with the Partner Institution’s Schedule of Charges in force at the time. In case the account holder's NayaPay Account does not have sufficient funds for any reason, NayaPay will have the right to set-off any credit balance/ proceeds of instruments or other items of the account holder available with NayaPay or claim the same from the account holder.
10. LIMITS
Your NayaPay Account is subject to load, payment, and withdrawal limits. These limits are adjusted dynamically and depend on your verification status, requirements under Applicable Laws, and other variety of factors determined at our sole discretion. You can view your limits at any time in your profile on the NayaPay Platform. Before loading any funds into your NayaPay Account or availing any Payment Services, you must ensure that you do not exceed the aforementioned limits.
11. PARTNER INSTITUTIONS
11.1.    We rely on Partner Institutions, who may be regulated entities, to provide the Payment Services.
11.2.     You agree and acknowledge that a contractual relationship exists between you and the Partner Institution with whom you maintain a Linked Account or whose Load Method / Withdrawal Method you utilize
(“Relationship”)
. It is your responsibility to familiarize yourself with the terms and conditions governing such Relationship and any feature, condition, limit, charges arising from the same which can impact your use of the Payment Services.
11.3.    You may add a Linked Account to your NayaPay Platform in accordance with our Account Linking process.
12. CHAT
12.1.    The NayaPay Platform enables you to use our Chat functionality to communicate with other users/account holders.
12.2.    You must access and use Chat only for purposes permitted under Applicable Laws, as per these Terms of Use and our Chat T&Cs You should print and keep a copy of the Chat T&Cs together with these Terms of Use. You will not use Chat in ways that: (a) are illegal, obscene, blasphemous, defamatory, threatening, intimidating, harassing, hateful, racially, or ethnically offensive, or instigate or encourage conduct that would be illegal, or otherwise inappropriate, including promoting violent crimes; (b) involve publishing falsehoods, misrepresentations, spam, or misleading statements; (c) impersonate someone; (d) involve sending illegal or impermissible communications such as bulk messaging, auto-messaging, and the like; or (e) involve any non-personal use of Chat unless otherwise authorized by us.
13. TRANSACTION FEES
13.1.    Transaction related fees can be viewed at any time in the "Fees" section of the NayaPay Platform. You should print or download and keep a copy of the "Fees" section together with a copy of these Terms of Use. For clarity, the "Fees" section forms part of these Terms of Use. Fees are subject to change in terms provided under these Terms of Use.
13.2.    Fees payable by you will be deducted from your NayaPay Account balance and you hereby authorise us to do the same. Transaction fees will be charged when the Transaction is executed. If your NayaPay Account balance is insufficient to cover the fees, we may refuse to execute the requested Service.
13.3.    You are responsible for ensuring if any charges are imposed on your use of the Payment Services under your Relationship with a Partner Institution.
14. DATA
14.1.        You agree to allow us to access your Device to, inter alia, check the phone numbers of other users/account holders of NayaPay in your address-book, photos, messages, location, and other information in accordance with our Privacy Policy. The processing of your data is governed by our Privacy Policy. By accepting these Terms of Use, you also agree to the terms of our Privacy Policy. You should print and keep a copy of the Privacy Policy together with these Terms of Use.
14.2.    For the purposes of operating the NayaPay Platform and/or the provision of the Services, and to the extent permitted under Applicable Laws, NayaPay may procure, engage and use the services of its affiliates and third-party agents and service providers. By entering into these Terms of Use, you hereby confirm that you fully understand, acknowledge, and agree, to the fullest extent permissible under Applicable Laws, to us, our affiliates,  our respective agents, sub-contractors and third party service providers, accessing, processing, and retaining any information you provide to us,  for the effective operation of the NayaPay Platform, provision of the Services, and our obligations under Applicable Laws. This does not affect our respective rights and obligations under Applicable Laws regarding protection of your data. You may withdraw this consent by closing your NayaPay Account. If you withdraw consent in this way, we will cease using your data for this purpose, but may continue to process your data for other purposes where required under Applicable Laws.
15. INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY
15.1.    We own all the intellectual property in, and relating to, the NayaPay Platform and the Services (for example, the content in our app and on our website, our logo and designs). You must not use our intellectual property as your own, except to enjoy the NayaPay Platform and the Services in accordance with these Terms of Use. You also must not reverse-engineer any part of the NayaPay Platform and the Services (that is, reproduce them after a detailed examination of their construction or composition).
15.2.    For more information, please refer to our Policies dealing with intellectual property.
16. LIABILITY & INDEMNITY
16.1.    In no case shall we be liable to you for any losses, costs, and damages attributable to or arising out of:
i.  your failure to keep your Debit Card, NayaPay Password, PIN, or other personalised security features of your NayaPay Account safe in accordance with these Terms of Use;
ii. if you fail to notify us without undue delay of any loss / theft/unauthorised use of your Debit Card, password, PIN or other event that could reasonably be expected to have compromised the security of your NayaPay Account after you have gained knowledge of such event;
iii.    if the Transaction was unauthorised but you have acted fraudulently or compromised the security of your NayaPay Account with intent or gross negligence;
iv. retention of your Debit Card by any ATM in Pakistan or abroad;
v.  if you fail to dispute and bring the unauthorised or incorrectly executed Transaction to our attention within three (03) months from the date of the Transaction;
vi. issues relating to the delivery, quality, quantity or use of any products or services offered, provided or sold by vendors/merchants on the NayaPay Platform, or any dispute between you and the Merchant;
vii.    any taxes, duties or other charges that arise from your use of the NayaPay Account or the Payment Services; provided in these Terms of Use;
viii.   any issues in relation to the use of the NayaPay Platform or the Services that emanate on account of your Relationship;
ix. limitation, restriction, failure, issues, malfunctions pertaining to Linked Accounts;
x.  any disruption or impairment of our Services or for disruptions or impairments of intermediary services on which we rely for the performance of our obligations hereunder, including but not limited to any act or omission by any Partner Institution, the Trustee, affiliate or third party agent or service provider;
xi. any action or omission of NayaPay pursuant to a direction of a Competent Authority; or
xii.    your failure to comply with your obligations and responsibilities under these Terms of Use and, to the extent applicable, the Policies.
16.2.    Without prejudice to the foregoing, you are asked to check the Transactions history of your NayaPay Account regularly and frequently, and to file a dispute in-app and/or contact Customer Services immediately in case you have any questions or concerns.
16.3.    In the case of any incorrect or misdirected payment, we shall take reasonable measures to assist you with tracing and recovering such payments.
16.4.    You acknowledge that you will not be able to countermand any instruction or Transaction given or carried out through Debit Card or biometrics at the ATM of a Partner Institution once the same has been processed.
16.5.    We shall not be liable for any indirect or consequential losses including but not limited to loss of profit, loss of business and loss of reputation. We shall not be liable for any losses arising from our compliance with Applicable Laws.
16.6.    Our obligation under these Terms of Use is limited to providing you with the NayaPay Account and the NayaPay Platform and we do not make any statement, representation, warranty, or endorsement in relation to the quality, safety or legality of any goods or services purchased or availed through the NayaPay Platform.
16.7.    NayaPay does not promote or support the use of its Services for any particular purpose, campaign, or cause and any such purpose, campaign, or cause available on the NayaPay Platform does not reflect our opinions or beliefs.
16.8.    You agree to hold, defend, reimburse or compensate us and hold us and other companies in our corporate group harmless from any claim, demand, expenses or costs (including legal fees, fines or penalties) that we incur or suffer due to or arising out of your or your agents': (i) breach of these Terms of Use; (ii) breach of Applicable Laws; (iii) violation of any of the Policies; or (iv) infringement of our intellectual property rights. This provision shall survive termination of the relationship between you and us.
17. TERMINATION & SUSPENSION
17.1.    We may terminate your NayaPay Account and the Services associated with the NayaPay Platform by giving you two (2) months’ prior notice. You may terminate your NayaPay Account and the Services associated with the NayaPay Platform at any time. Please note that section 6 will apply to closure of your NayaPay Account.
17.2.    We may: (i) terminate; (ii) temporarily suspend; and/or (iii) temporarily limit the functionality of, your NayaPay Account and the Services associated with the NayaPay Platform or part thereof, without notice, if:
i.  required by the order of a Competent Authority or in compliance with Applicable Laws (including those pertaining to AML/CFT/KYC/CDD);
ii. you breach any condition of these Terms of Use or Additional T&Cs applicable to specific Services;
iii.    we reasonably suspect that an unauthorised or fraudulent use of your NayaPay Account has occurred or that any of its security features have been compromised;
iv. you violate or we have reason to believe that you are in violation of Applicable Laws; or
v.  we have reason to believe that you are in any way involved in any fraudulent activity, money laundering, terrorism financing or other criminal activity.
18. CHANGE IN TERMS OF USE
18.1.    The Terms of Use, Additional T&Cs and Policies are subject to change. Changes will be implemented with notification from us under the procedure set forth in this section.
18.2.    We shall give notice to you of any proposed change in accordance with sections 19.1 and 19.2
18.3.    The proposed change shall come into effect immediately upon delivery of the abovementioned notice.
19. COMMUNICATION
19.1.    We usually message you through in-app notifications (which will require you to ensure that your Device to be connected to the internet) and SMS. You may opt for us to message you via email. You are required to check for incoming messages regularly and frequently, in any case at least once compulsorily in a twenty-eight (28) days period. Such messages may contain links to further communication on our NayaPay Platform. Any communication sent by in-app notification will be deemed received by you on the same day if it is delivered to your in-app notification area on the NayaPay Platform. Any communication sent by SMS or email is deemed to be received as recorded on our servers or the servers of any service provider we engage for such communication services.
19.2.    Where we are required to provide information to you on a durable medium, we will either send you an attachment with our message or send you a notification pointing you to information on the NayaPay Platform in a way that enables you to retain the information in print format or other format that can be retained by you permanently for future reference. We recommend you keep copies of all communications we send or make available to you.
19.3.    You can access a copy of the current Terms of Use, Additional T&Cs, Policies, or any other contractual document relevant to you within the NayaPay Platform and also by contacting Customer Service.
19.4.    We will never send you any messages with executable files attached or with links to any executable files. If you receive any message with such attachments, you should delete the message without clicking on the attachment. If you are unsure whether a communication is originating from us, please contact Customer Service.
19.5.    As a default, you will receive in-app notifications or e-mails (if applicable) that will inform you about new Services and its features, events, promotions, special deals etc. By accepting these Terms of Use, you agree to receive such communication on a regular basis. If you do not wish to be notified of any of the aforementioned communication, you can disable the notification by changing the appropriate setting on the NayaPay Platform.
19.6.     Except as otherwise provided elsewhere, any communication required from you under these Terms of Use may be routed to us through Customer Service using the following means:
i.  Email to support@nayapay.com
ii. Call to our Customer Service numbers
iii.    Contact form on the NayaPay website
iv. Through the NayaPay Platform
20. COMPLAINTS AND DISPUTES
20.1.    Any complaints about us or the Services we provide should be addressed to us in the first instance by contacting Customer Service. You should clearly indicate that you wish to make a complaint to or file a dispute with us. This helps us to distinguish complaints and disputes from mere queries. We send you a complaint or dispute filing acknowledgement within 48 hours of receiving your complaint or dispute in accordance with our Complaints and Disputes Handling Mechanism. You may access a copy of our Complaints and Disputes Handling Mechanism at any time from the NayaPay Platform or by contacting Customer Service.
21. MISCELLANEOUS
21.1.    Your NayaPay Account is personal to you and you may not assign any rights under the Terms of Use to any third party.
21.2.    Your NayaPay Account is operated in Pakistan and these Terms of Use shall be governed by and interpreted in accordance with the laws of Islamic Republic of Pakistan. Any dispute under these Terms of Use or otherwise in connection with your NayaPay Account shall be brought exclusively in the courts of Karachi.
21.3.    If any part of these Terms of Use is found to be invalid or unenforceable under Applicable Laws then such part shall be severed from the remainder of the Terms of Use, which shall continue to be valid and enforceable to the fullest extent permitted by Applicable Laws.
22. DEFINITIONS
Various terms in these Terms of Use have a defined meaning as follows:
i.
“Account Linking Process”
is NayaPay's process governing the use of Linked Accounts for Payments Services, which is available on the NayaPay Platform.
ii.
“Additional T&C’s”
is defined in Clause 2.
iii.
“Applicable Laws”
means any law, legislation, statute, ordinance, code, order, decree, directive, judgment, decision, injunction, license, permit, approval of any Competent Authority, rule, regulation, and judicial interpretation thereof, and any interpretation of or determination in respect of any of the foregoing, by any Competent Authority having jurisdiction over the matter in question and binding on a given person.
iv.
“Chat”
means the chat functionality of the NayaPay Platform which allows you to communicate with other users/account holders of the NayaPay Platform.
v.
“Competent Authority”
means any national, supranational, regional or local government or governmental, administrative, fiscal, judicial, or government-owned body, department, commission, authority, tribunal, agency or entity, or central bank (or any person, whether or not government owned and howsoever constituted or called, that exercises the functions of a central bank) or other recognized entity of any kind or other person exercising executive, legislative, judicial, regulatory or administrative functions.
vi.
“Complaint and Dispute Handling Procedure”
is NayaPay's mechanism of handling complaints and disputes related to the Services, which is available on the NayaPay Platform.
vii.
“Customer Service”
means our customer service, which you can reach by sending an email on support@nayapay.com, filling out a Contact Us form on the NayaPay website, by calling our Customer Service phone number, or through the NayaPay Platform.
viii.
“Debit Card”
means a physical or virtual debit card issued by NayaPay which will be linked to your NayaPay Account.
ix.
“Device(s)”
means a smart-phone, personal computer, tablet, or other form of electronic device used by you to access the NayaPay Platform.
x.
“EMI Regulations”
means the Regulations for Electronic Money Institutions issued by the SBP pursuant to the Payment Systems and Electronic Funds Transfer Act, 2007, as amended from time to time.
xi.
“E-Money”
shall have the meaning ascribed to the term under the EMI Regulations.
xii.
“Fees”
means the charges payable by you to us for using the Services as provided in the “Fees” section on the NayaPay Platform.
xiii.
“Linked Account”
means a PKR account of the user/account holder maintained with a Partner Institution, and that is registered on the NayaPay Platform.
xiv.
“Load Method”
means methods provided by Partner Institutions. agents and other third parties for loading E-Money into a NayaPay Account, including through Linked Accounts, cash-counters, ATMs, internet banking, and mobile banking.
xv.
“Partner Institution”
means the partner banking companies and other financial institutions that partner with NayaPay for the provision of the Payment Services, and listed on the NayaPay Platform.
xvi.
“Payment Services”
means electronic payment solutions offered as part of the NayaPay Account, including without limitation:
(i) Deposit and redemption/withdrawal of E-Money;
(ii)    Electronic Fund Transfers (inter-se Consumer-to-Business (C2B), Business-to-Consumer (B2C), Business-to-Business (B2B), Person-to-Person (P2P), Government-to-Person (G2P), and Person-to-Government (P2G) etc.) provided through the NayaPay Platform ;
(iii)   ATM, Point of Sale (POS), and e-commerce transactions carried out through Debit Cards; and
(iv)    Biometric transactions
xvii.
“PIN”
means the four (4) or six (6) digit numeric personal identification number set by the user/account holder and required to execute a Transaction (whether through the NayaPay Platform or through a Debit Card).
xviii.
“PKR”
means Pakistani Rupee.
xix.
“Policies”
means the policies of NayaPay, as updated from time to time, in respect of AML/KYC, data protection, information security, and usage of intellectual property, which may be accessed at https://www.nayapay.com, and shall include the Privacy Policy and Intellectual Property Policy.
xx.
“Privacy Policy”
is NayaPay's policy governing the processing of personal data, which is available on the NayaPay Platform.
xxi.
“Relationship”
has been defined in section 11.2.
xxii.
“SBP”
means the State Bank of Pakistan.
xxiii.
“Transaction”
refers to a single instance of use of the Payment Services.
xxiv.
“Trustee”
means the banking company appointed as trustee pursuant to the EMI Regulations.
xxv.
“NayaPay”
means NayaPay (Private) Limited, a company incorporated under the laws of Pakistan having its registered office at 2nd Floor,
14 Ali Block
, New Garden Town, Lahore & Head Office at 10th Floor, Lakson Square Building
No. 3, Sarwar Shaheed Road, Saddar, Karachi 74200, Pakistan
with CUIN No. 0104200.
xxvi.
“NayaPay Account”
means the E-Money account you open, operate and maintain through the NayaPay Platform.
xxvii.
“NayaPay Password”
means the password to access the NayaPay Platform on a Device, set by you at the time of registration.
xxviii.
“NayaPay Platform”
means the electronic platform, whether accessed through a mobile application, handheld devices, portals, payment gateways or websites, or other means, developed and operated by NayaPay to open NayaPay Accounts and provide Services;
xxix.
“Services”
means the Payment Services, the Chat, and other services made available on the NayaPay Platform in accordance with these Terms of Use, Additional T&C’s, and the Policies.
xxx.
“Terms of Use”
means these Terms of Use, published on the NayaPay Platform and as may be amended from time.
xxxi.
“We”, “us”, “our”
means NayaPay.
xxxii.
“Withdrawal Methods”
means methods provided by Partner Institutions and other agents and third parties for redemption of E-Money, including through cash-counters, , the ATM ,or transfers to a Linked Account.
xxxiii.
“You”, “your”
means you, the natural person or legal entity in whose name the NayaPay Account is opened and maintained.
1۔ نیاپے کے بارے میں
نیا پےSBP کی طرف سے EMI ریگولیشنز کے تحت بطورالیکٹرانک منی انسٹی ٹیوشن لائسنس یافتہ ہے۔
2۔ دائرہ کار
استعمال کی یہ شرائط آپ کے نیا پے اکاؤنٹ کو کھولنے اور بند کرنے اور نیا پے پلیٹ فارم پر دستیاب اور اسی طرح کی دیگرخدمات کے استعمال پرلاگو ہیں۔ ہمارے اور آپ کے درمیان یہ معاہدہ ہماری پالیسیوں سمیت استعمال کی ان شرائط میں شامل کسی دیگر شرائط و ضوابط پر مشتمل ہے۔ مخصوص خدمات کے استعمال کے لیے، آپ کو اضافی شرائط و ضوابط کو قبول کرنا پڑ سکتا ہے جن سے آپ کو اس طرح کی خدمات کی خریداری یا استعمال کرتے وقت مطلع کیا جاتا ہے(اضافی شرائط وضوابط)۔ آپ کو مشورہ دیا جاتا ہے کہ مستقبل میں حوالہ کے لیے استعمال کی ان شرائط کی کاپی پرنٹ کریں یا ڈاؤن لوڈ کرلیں اوراپنے پاس رکھیں۔ آپ یہ یقینی بناسکتے ہیں کہ آپ ہماری ویب سائٹ پرحالیہ استعمال کی شرائط کا جائزہ لے رہے ہیں یا نیا پے پلیٹ فارم پر ان تک رسائی حاصل کر سکتے ہیں۔
3۔ آپ کا نیاپے اکاؤنٹ
3.1۔ ہماری خدمات استعمال کرنے کے لیے، آپ کو پہلے نیا پے پلیٹ فارم پر اندراج کرکے نیا پے اکاؤنٹ کھولنا ہوگا۔ رجسٹریشن کے عمل کے ایک حصے کے طور پر،ہم آپ کو ایک نیا پے آئی ڈی (مثلاًab@nayapay) بنانے کو کہیں گے۔ یہ آئی ڈی آپ کو بطور نیاپے صارف شناخت کرنے کے لیے استعمال کی جائے گی۔ نیاپے آئی ڈی کے مکمل حقوق تمام وقت نیاپے کی ملکیت ہوں گے۔ نیاپے کوجیسے اور جب درکار ہو اور کوئی پیشگی نوٹس دیے بغیر، نیاپے آئی ڈی واپس لینے اور آپ کو اسے تبدیل کرنے کا کہنے کا اختیار ہوگا۔نیاپے تبدیلی کے طریقہ کارکے ایک حصے کے طور پرآپ کو ایک متبادل آئی ڈی منتخب کرنے کا آپشن فراہم کرے گا۔ رجسٹریشن کے عمل کے ایک حصے کے طور پر، آپ کو یہ شرائط قبول کرنے کی بھی ضرورت ہوگی اور آپ کی عمرکم ازکم اٹھارہ (18) سال ہونا اور ان شرائط کو قبول کرنے کی قانونی صلاحیت کا حامل ہونا ضروری ہے۔ براہ کرم نوٹ کریں کہ اضافیT&Cs مخصوص سروسز  پر لاگو ہوسکتے ہیں۔
3.2۔ آپ کے نیا پے اکاؤنٹ ای منی(E-Money) جمع رکھ سکتا ہے جو آپ کو نیا پے پلیٹ فارم پر دستیاب ادائیگی کی خدمات کو استعمال کرنے کے قابل بناتا ہے۔
3.3۔ آپ کا نیا پے اکاؤنٹ پاکستانی روپے میں ہے۔ یہ ہمارے ساتھ آپ کے معاہدے کی مدت کے لئے آپ کے نیا پے اکاؤنٹ کی کرنسی رہے گی۔
3.4۔ آپ کے نیا پے اکاؤنٹ میں رکھی گئی ای منی (E-Money) کی میعاد ختم نہیں ہوگی لیکن اس سے کوئی سود، مارک اپ، یا کسی اور شکل میں منافع حاصل نہیں ہوگا۔
3.5۔ نیا پے اکاؤنٹ کوئی بینک اکاؤنٹ یا ڈپازٹ نہیں ہے۔ استعمال کی ان شرائط کو قبول کرتے ہوئے آپ اس بات سے اتفاق کرتے ہیں اور تسلیم کرتے ہیں کہ بینکنگ کمپنیز آرڈیننس، 1962 آپ کے نیا پے اکاؤنٹ پر لاگو نہیں ہوتا ہے۔ آپ کے نیا پے اکاؤنٹ میں موجود ای منی کو ہر وقت فنڈز دستیاب ہوتے ہیں، جو ہمارے فنڈز سے علیحدہ، ایک ٹرسٹ اکاؤنٹ میں موجودہوتے ہیں  جس کا انتظام ایک ٹرسٹی کے ذریعہ EMI ضابطوں کے مطابق چلایا جاتاہے۔
3.6۔ نیا پے اکاؤنٹ میں ای منی کی ملکیت اس شخص یا قانونی ادارے کی ہے جو نیا پے اکاؤنٹ ہولڈر کے طور پر رجسٹرڈ ہے۔ نیا پے اکاؤنٹ ہولڈر کے علاوہ کسی بھی شخص کو نیا پے اکاؤنٹ میں رکھی ای منی کے سلسلے میں کوئی حق نہیں ہے، ماسوائے قابل اطلاق قوانین کے مطابق۔ آپ اپنا نیا پے اکاؤنٹ کسی تیسری پارٹی کو تفویض یا منتقل نہیں کرسکتے ہیں یا بصورت دیگر کسی تیسرے فریق کو اس پر قانونی یا مساوی مفاد نہیں دے سکتے ہیں۔
3.7۔ آپ کی طرف سے ہمیں واجب الادا کوئی بھی فیس یا دوسری رقم آپ کے نیا پے اکاؤنٹ میں موجود بیلنس سے کٹوتی /منہا کی جائے گی۔ اگر نیا پے اکاؤنٹ میں بیلنس ناکافی ہے تو، ہم آپ کو کسی بھی کمی کے لیے انوائس بھیجنے اور/یا کسی یا تمام سروسز کی فراہمی روکنے کا حق محفوظ رکھتے ہیں۔
3.8۔ نیا پے اکاؤنٹ کھول کر آپ ہم سے اقرار کرتے اور ضمانت دیتے ہیں کہ آپ کا نیا پے اکاؤنٹ کھولنا آپ پر لاگو کسی قانون کی خلاف ورزی نہیں ہے۔
3.9۔ سائن اپ کے عمل کے دوران یا اس کے بعد کسی بھی وقت آپ کی فراہم کردہ تمام معلومات بشمول قابل اطلاق قوانین کے مطابق درکار معلومات درست اور سچ ہونی چاہئیں اور آپ اقرار کرتے اورہمیں ضمانت دیتے ہیں کہ سائن اپ کے عمل کے حصے کے طور پر فراہم کردہ تمام معلومات سچ اور درست ہیں۔
4. اپنے نیاپے اکاؤنٹ کوبرقرار رکھنا
4.1۔ آپ کو یہ یقینی بنانا ہوگا کہ آپ کے نیا پے اکاؤنٹ میں درج معلومات ہمیشہ درست اور تازہ ترین ہوں۔ ہم آپ کو کسی بھی وقت آپ کی معلومات کی درستگی کی تصدیق کرنے یا دستاویزات یا دیگر ثبوت فراہم کرنے کے لئے کہہ سکتے ہیں۔
4.2۔ آپ صرف اسی صورت میں اپنے نیا پے اکاؤنٹ میں لوڈ کرنے کا طریقہ کارشامل کرسکتے ہیں،اگر لوڈ کرنے کے طریقہ کار کے نام کے حامل یا صارف ہوں۔ ہم اس تقاضے کی کسی بھی خلاف ورزی کو بہت سنجیدگی سے لیتے ہیں اور لوڈ کے طریقہ کار کو شامل کرنے کی کسی بھی ایسی کوشش کو،جس کے آپ حامل یا صارف نہ ہوں، دھوکہ دہی کی ایک کارروائی کے طور پر برتیں گے۔
4.3۔ نیا پے پلیٹ فارم پر ادائیگی کی خدمات کے کسی بھی استعمال کو آپ کے لین دین (ٹرانزیکشن) کی ہسٹری میں ظاہر کیا جاتا ہے۔ ہر ٹرانزیکشن کو ایک منفرد ٹرانزیکشن ID دی جاتی ہے اور اسے لین دین کی ہسٹری میں دکھایا جاتا ہے۔ ہم آپ کے لین دین کی ہسٹری میں دکھائے جانے والے معلومات میں تبدیلی یا ترمیم نہیں کریں گے۔ کسی خاص ٹرانزیکشن کے بارے میں ہم سے رابطہ کرتے وقت آپ کو متعلقہ ٹرانزیکشن ID کا حوالہ دینا ہوگا۔ آپ کو اپنا نیا پے اکاؤنٹ بیلنس اور لین دین کی ہسٹری باقاعدگی سے چیک کرنی چاہیے۔ آپ کو کسی بھی بے ضابطگی کی اطلاع کسٹمر سروس سے رابطہ کرکے جلد از جلددینی یا حاصل کرنی چاہئے۔
4.4۔ کسی غیر مجاز یا غلط ٹرانزیکشن سے آگاہ ہونے کے بعدپر آپ کو بلا تاخیر ہمیں مطلع کرنا ہوگا اور اس میں ایسے کسی لین دین کی تاریخ کے تین (3) ماہ سے زیادہ تاخیر نہیں ہونی چاہئے۔
5۔ حفاظت اور سلامتی
5.1۔ نیا پے پلیٹ فارم آپ کے نیا پے اکاؤنٹ کی سیکیورٹی کے بچاؤ میں مدد کے لئے داخلی خصوصیات(بلٹ ان فیچرز) کا استعمال کرتا ہے۔ رجسٹریشن کے عمل کے ایک حصے کے طور پر، آپ کو اپنے نیا پے پاس ورڈ اور پن کو طے کرنے کی ضرورت ہوگی۔
5.2۔ آپ کوتمام درج ذیل معقول اقدامات کرنا ہوں گے(i) نیاپے پاس ورڈ اور پن ہمیشہ محفوظ رکھیں اور انہیں کسی پر ظاہر نہ کریں (ii) ڈیبٹ کارڈ محفوظ اور اپنی تحویل میں رکھیں۔ ہمارے اہلکار آپ سے کبھی بھی نیا پے پاس ورڈ اور / یا PIN ہمیں یا کسی تھرڈ پارٹی کو فراہم کرنے کو نہیں کہیں گے۔ آپ کا وصول کردہ کوئی پیغام یانیاپے پلیٹ فارم کے علاوہ آپ کی وزٹ کی گئی کوئی ویب سائٹ آپ سے نیا پے پاس ورڈ اور / یا پن پوچھے،توآپ کو ہمیں اس کی اطلاع دینی چاہئے۔ مشورہ دیا جاتا ہے کہ اپنے نیا پے اکاؤنٹ کے سلسلے میں سیکیورٹی کی خلاف ورزی کے خطرے کو کم کرنے کے لئے اپنے نیا پے پاس ورڈ اور پن کو باقاعدگی سے (کم از کم ہر تین (3) سے چھ (6) ماہ میں) تبدیل کریں۔ہم آپ کو یہ مشورہ بھی دیتے ہیں کہ ایسے نیا پے پاس ورڈ یا پن کا انتخاب نہ کریں جس کا کوئی آپ کے بارے میں معلومات رکھنے والایا جمع کرنے والا باآسانی اندازہ لگاسکے، یا ایسانیا پے پاس ورڈ یا پن جس کا کوئی معنی ہو۔ آپ کو کسی کو بھی اجازت نہیں دینا ہوگی کہ: (i)وہ آپ کے نیا پے اکاؤنٹ تک رسائی حاصل کرے یا آپ کواپنے نیا پے اکاؤنٹ تک رسائی حاصل کرتے دیکھے۔ اور (ii) آپ کے ڈیبٹ کارڈکو اپنی تحویل میں لے۔ آپ کو سیکیورٹی کے ان طریقوں کی تعمیل کرنی ہوگی جو ہم آپ کو وقتا فوقتا بتاتے ہیں۔
5.3۔ اگر آپ کو اپنے نیا پے اکاؤنٹ، ڈیبٹ کارڈ، لاگ ان کی تفصیلات، نیا پے پاس ورڈ، پن، یا سیکیورٹی کی کسی دیگر خصوصیت کے کھو جانے، چوری ہونے، غلط استعمال ہونے، بغیراجازت استعمال کئے جانے یا کسی بھی طرح سے نقب لگنے کا کوئی اشارہ ملے یا شبہ ہو تو، آپ کو اپنا نیا پے پاس ورڈاورپن تبدیل کرنے کا مشورہ دیا جاتا ہے۔ بغیراجازت آپ کو اپنے نیا پے اکاؤنٹ، ڈیبٹ کارڈ، لاگ ان کی تفصیلات، نیا پے پاس ورڈ، پن یا دیگر حفاظتی خصوصیات سے متعلق کسی نقصان، چوری، غلط استعمال یا بغیراجازت استعمال کے بارے میں آگاہ ہونے پر بلاتاخیر کسٹمر سروس سے رابطہ کرنا چاہئے۔ ہمیں مطلع کرنے میں کسی بھی طرح کی تاخیر سے آپ کے نیا پے اکاؤنٹ کی سیکیورٹی متاثر ہوگی۔
5.4۔اگر ہمیں لگتا ہے کہ آپ کے نیا پے اکاؤنٹ میں دھوکہ دہی کی جاسکتی ہے یااس کے تحفظ کو خطرہ لاحق ہے، تو ہم آپ کی فراہم کردہ تفصیلات کا استعمال کرتے ہوئے تیز رفتار اور محفوظ ترین ذرائع کے ذریعہ آپ کو یہ بتانے کے لئے آپ سے رابطہ کرنے کی پوری کوشش کریں گے کہ آپ کواس خطرے کے حوالے سے کیا کرنے کی ضرورت ہے،سے متعلق آگاہی فراہم کرسکیں۔
5.5۔ آپ کو یہ یقینی بنانے کے لئے ہرطرح سے معقول احتیاط برتنی چاہئے کہ آپ کا ای میل اکاؤنٹ (اکاؤنٹس)، موبائل نمبر، اوررابطے کے آلات محفوظ ہیں اور صرف آپ ہی ان تک رسائی حاصل کرسکتے ہیں،جیسا کہ انہیں آپ کے نیا پے اکاؤنٹ کی سیکیورٹی میں نقب لگانے کے لئے استعمال کیا جاسکتا ہے۔ اگررابطے کے مذکورہ بالاذرائع  میں سے کسی میں نقب لگائی گئی ہوتو، اس کے بارے میں معلوم ہونے کے بعد بلا تاخیر کسٹمر سروس سے رابطہ کریں۔
5.6۔  آپ نیا پے پلیٹ فارم پرجومخصوص مصنوعات یا خدمات استعمال کرتے ہیں ان کے اضافی حفاظتی تقاضے ہوسکتے ہیں اور آپ کو ان سے خود کوواقف کرنا ہوگاجیسا کہ آپ کو مطلع کیا گیا ہے۔
6۔ اپنا نیاپے اکاؤنٹ بند کرنا
6.1۔ ہم سیکشن 17 کے مطابق آپ کا نیا پے اکاؤنٹ بند کرسکتے ہیں۔ آپ کسی بھی وقت کسٹمر سروس سے رابطہ کرکے اپنا نیا پے اکاؤنٹ بند کرسکتے ہیں۔ اگر آپ کے نیا پے اکاؤنٹ میں بندش کے وقت بیلنس موجود ہے تو، ہم آپ کو مناسب وقت کے اندر اپنی رقم واپس لینے کو کہیں گے، اس دوران آپ کا نیا پے اکاؤنٹ صرف باقی رقم کی واپسی کے مقصد کے لیے قابل استعمال ہوگا۔یہ میعاد ختم ہونے کے بعد آپ اپنے نیا پے اکاؤنٹ تک رسائی حاصل نہیں کرسکیں گے، لیکن آپ کسٹمر سروس سے رابطہ کرکے کوئی بقایا فنڈ نکال سکتے ہیں اوریہ درخواست کرسکتے ہیں کہ آپ کومتعلقہ طریقہ کار کے مطابق فنڈزبھیجے جائیں۔
6.2۔ اگر آپ ڈیبٹ کارڈ کا استعمال بند کرنے کا فیصلہ کرتے ہیں تو، ایساڈیبٹ کارڈ نیا پے کو واپس کردیا جائے گا۔قطع نظر اس کے، آپ کو جاری کردہ ڈیبٹ کارڈ ہر وقت نیا پے کی واحد ملکیت رہے گا اور ہماری درخواست کے مطابق نیا پے کے حوالے کیاجائے گا۔ نیا پے اپنی صوابدید پر آپ کو اطلاع دینے کے ذریعے کسی بھی وقت ڈیبٹ کارڈ کو منسوخ کرنے یا واپس لینے یا دوبارہ اجرا، تجدید یا تبدیل کرنے سے انکار کا  حق محفوظ رکھتا ہے۔
6.3۔ آپ کے انتقال کی صورت میں، آپ کی موت کے بارے میں نیایا پے کو تحریری طور پر آگاہ کیے جانے تک آپ کے نیا پے اکاؤنٹ میں لین دین کاسلسلہ جاری رہے گا۔ اس طرح کا نوٹس موصول ہونے پر، نیا پے نوٹس کی وصولی کی تاریخ سے کسی تازہ لین دین کو روک دے گا۔ آپ کے انتقال کی اطلاع موصول ہونے سے پہلے آپ کے پاس ورڈ، پن اور دیگر سیکیورٹی کوائف کے ذریعے کیا گیاتمام لین دین، اسی کے مطابق آپ کے نیا پے اکاؤنٹ میں جمع کرایا جائے گا۔ نیا پے کو اپنی صوابدید کے مطابق دستیاب کسی بھی تدارک کی شرط پر، آپ کے انتقال کی صورت میں، آپ کے ای منی اکاؤنٹ میں موجود فنڈز کی رقم  صرف  قابل اطلاق قوانین کے مطابق جاری شدہ جانشینی سرٹیفکیٹ کی وصولی پرآپ کے جانشینوں کے حوالے کی جائے گی۔
6.4۔ آپ اپنا نیاپے اکاؤنٹ بند ہونے کے بعدچھ (6)ماہ تک کسٹمر سروس سے رابطے اور معلومات کی درخواست کے ذریعے اپنے لین دین کی ہسٹری تک رسائی حاصل کرسکتے ہیں۔ سیکشن5میں آپ کا نیاپے اکاؤنٹ محفوظ رکھنے کے لیے طے کردہ آپ کی ذمہ داریاں بدستور لاگو رہیں گی۔
6.5۔ آپ کو کوئی بھی فنڈز واپس کرنے کے سلسلے میں آپ کے فنڈز کو واپس کرنے کی اجازت دینے سے پہلے منی لانڈرنگ، دہشت گردی کی مالی اعانت، دھوکہ دہی یا دیگر غیر قانونی سرگرمی کی جانچ پڑتال کرنے کا حق محفوظ رکھتے ہیں۔بشمول آپ کے نیاپے اکاؤنٹ کو بند کرنے کے بعد فنڈز واپسی کے۔
7۔ ای منی لوڈ کرنا
7.1۔ آپ نیا پے پلیٹ فارم پر بیان کردہ لوڈ نگ کے طریقوں کے ذریعے اپنے نیاپے اکاؤنٹ میں ای منی  لوڈ کرسکتے ہیں۔ لوڈنگ کے طریقے تھرڈ پارٹی کے ذریعہ فراہم کی جانے والی خدمات ہیں (مثال کے طور پر، ایک پارٹنر انسٹی ٹیوشن میں کیش کاؤنٹر جہاں آپ نے ای منی کو لوڈ کرنے کے لئے پاکستانی روپے  جمع کرائے ہوں یا، لنکڈ اکاؤنٹ)۔
7.2۔ ہم لوڈ کرنے کے کسی خاص طریقہ کار کی دستیابی کی ضمانت نہیں دیتے اور اپنی صوابدید پر اور / یا قابل اطلاق قوانین کی تعمیل میں لوڈ کرنے کے کسی خاص طریقہ کار میں تبدیلیاں یا قبول کرنا بند کرسکتے ہیں۔
7.3۔ ہمیں یا ہماری طرف سے متعلقہ پارٹنر انسٹی ٹیوشن کو مساوی پاکستانی روپے موصول ہونے کے بعد ای منی آپ کے نیا پے اکاؤنٹ میں جمع ہوجائے گی۔
8. ممنوعہ لین دین
8.1۔درج ذیل کی فروخت یاسپلائی کے حوالے سے ادائیگی کی خدمات کا استعمال سختی سے ممنوع ہے: منشیات اور منشیات کا سامان، اسلحہ (بشمول بغیر کسی حد کے، چاقو، بندوقیں، آتشیں اسلحہ یا گولہ بارود)، سیٹیلائٹ اور کیبل ٹی وی ڈی سکریمبلرز، فحش مواد، بالغوں کا مواد، ایسامواد جو تشدد، نفرت، نسل پرستی پر اکساتا ہے یا معیوب سمجھا جاتا ہے، سرکاری IDs اور لائسنس بشمول نقلیں اور غیرمانوس اشیاء اور کوئی جعلی مصنوعات، بغیر لائسنس یا غیر قانونی لاٹری یا جوئے کی سروسز (بشمول غیر قانونی جوئے خانوں کا استعمال کرنے یا اس میں حصہ لینا)،غیر رجسٹرڈ چیریٹی سروسز، ایسی اشیا جو غیر قانونی سرگرمیوں،کی حوصلہ افزائی کرتی ہیں اور ان کو سہولت فراہم کرتی ہیں، پری پیڈ ڈیبٹ کارڈ یا دوسرے ذخیرہ شدہ ویلیو کارڈز جو کسی خاص مرچنٹ کے ساتھ وابستہ نہیں ہیں اور کسی خاص مصنوعات یا خدمات کی خریداری تک محدود نہیں ہیں، تھرڈ پارٹی پروسیسنگ یارقوم جمع کرنے والی مصنوعات یا خدمات، ملٹی لیول مارکیٹنگ،پیرامڈ کی فروخت یا پونزی اسکیمیں، میٹرکس پروگرام یا دیگر ”فوری مالدار ہوجائیں“اسکیمیں یابھاری آمدنی والے سرمایہ کاری کے پروگرام، سامان یا خدمات جو کسی تھرڈپارٹی کی دانشورانہ املاک کے حقوق کی خلاف ورزی کرتی ہیں، یاان کوڈڈ / غلط کوڈڈ گیمنگ۔ ہم اپنی واحدصوابدید میں ان شرائط میں یا ان شرائط کے تحت آپ کو نوٹس دے کر ممنوعہ لین دین کی دیگر اقسام کو شامل کرنے کا حق محفوظ رکھتے ہیں۔
8.2۔ کسی بھی غیر قانونی مقاصد کے لئے آپ کے نیا پے اکاؤنٹ کا استعمال سختی سے منع ہے جس میں دھوکا دہی اور منی لانڈرنگ شامل ہے مگر اس تک محدودنہیں اور آپ کو اپنے نیا پے اکاؤنٹ کو لوڈ کرنے کے لئے استعمال ہونے والے فنڈز کے ذریعہ کے ثبوت پیش کرنے کی ضرورت پڑسکتی ہے۔ ہم کسی بھی مشکوک سرگرمی سے متعلق قانون نافذ کرنے والی ایجنسیز کو اطلاع دیں گے، جیسا کہ لاگو قوانین کا تقاضا ہو۔
8.3۔ یہ یقینی بنانا آپ کی ذمہ داری ہے اور ہماری ذمہ داری نہیں ہے کہ آپ صرف قابل اطلاق قوانین کی تعمیل میں پیمنٹ سروسز کا استعمال کریں۔ محض یہ حقیقت کہ کوئی شخص یا ادارہ پیمنٹ سروسز کے ذریعہ ادائیگیوں کو قبول کرتا ہے، ان کے سامان اور خدمات کی فراہمی یا بنیادی لین دین کی قانونی حیثیت کی کوئی نشان دہی نہیں ہے۔ اگر آپ کو کسی سپلائی یا خریداری یا متعلقہ لین دین کی قانونی حیثیت کے بارے میں شک ہے تو آپ کو اپنی ادائیگی آگے نہیں بڑھانی چاہیے۔
9۔ ای منی نکالنا
9.1 آپ نیا پے پلیٹ فارم میں بتائے گئے رقم نکالنے کے طریقوں کے ذریعے کسی بھی وقت اپنے نیا پے اکاؤنٹ میں رکھی ہوئی تمام یا ای منی،یااس کے کچھ حصے کی واپسی کی درخواست کرسکتے ہیں۔
9.2۔ ہم رقم نکالنے کے کسی خاص طریقے کی دستیابی کی ضمانت نہیں دیتے اور اپنی صوابدید پر کسی بھی وقت آپ کو کوئی نوٹس دیے بغیر، رقم نکالنے کے کسی خاص طریقے میں تبدیلیاں کرسکتے ہیں یا اسے بند کرسکتے ہیں۔
9.3۔ اگر آپ کسی پارٹنر ادارے کے کسی اے ٹی ایم میں اپنا ڈیبٹ کارڈ یا بائیو میٹرک استعمال کرتے ہیں جو نقد رقم جاری کرتا ہے لیکن آپ کے نیا پے اکاؤنٹ میں اس کے ذریعہ ڈیبٹ نہیں کیا جاتا ہے تو، نیا پے کوناقابل منسوخی اختیار حاصل ہے کہ ایسی نکالی گئی رقم کو قابل اطلاق چارجز اور متعلقہ نیا پے اکاؤنٹ سے ڈیبٹ کرے،قطع نظر اس کے کہ اکاؤنٹ ہولڈرکو اس کی اطلاع دی گئی یا اس کی طرف سے اختیاردیا گیا ہو یانہیں۔ قابل اطلاق چارجز اس وقت نافذ پارٹنرادارے کے شیڈیول آف چارجز کے مطابق ہوں گے۔ ایسی صورت  میں کہ اکاؤنٹ ہولڈر کے نیاپے  اکاؤنٹ  میں خاطر خواہ فنڈز نہ ہوں، تو نیاپے کو حق ہوگا کہ وہ نیاپے میں دستیاب اکاؤنٹ ہولڈر کے کسی بھی کریڈٹ بیلنس / تمسکات کی آمدنی یا کسی دوسری اشیا سے حساب بے باق کرلے۔یا وہ رقم اکاؤنٹ ہولڈر سے بازیافت کرلے۔
10۔ حدود
آپ کا نیا پے اکاؤنٹ لوڈ، ادائیگی، اوررقم نکالنے کی حدود سے مشروط ہے۔ یہ حدود متحرک طور پر ایڈجسٹ کی جاتی ہیں اوران کا انحصارقابل اطلاق قانون کے تحت مطالبات، حدود آپ کی توثیق کی حیثیت  اورہماری واحد صوابدید پرتعین کردہ دیگر مختلف عوامل پرہے۔ آپ نیا پے پلیٹ فارم پر اپنے پروفائل میں کسی بھی وقت اپنی حدود(لمٹس) دیکھ سکتے ہیں۔ اپنے نیا پے اکاؤنٹ میں کسی بھی فنڈ زکو لوڈ کرنے یا ادائیگی کی خدمات حاصل کرنے سے پہلے، آپ کو یہ یقینی بنانا ہوگا کہ آپ مذکورہ بالا حدودسے تجاوز نہیں کرتے۔
11۔ پارٹنر ادارے
11.1 پیمنٹ سروسز فراہم کرنے کے لیے ہم پارٹنر اداروں پر انحصار کرتے ہیں جوریگولیٹڈ ادارے ہوسکتے ہیں ۔
11.2 آپ اتفاق کرتے ہیں اور تسلیم کرتے ہیں کہ آپ اور اس پارٹنر ادارے کے مابین ایک معاہدہ جاتی تعلق موجود ہے،جہاں آپ نیاپے اکاؤنٹ رکھتے ہیں یا جن کی لوڈنگ کاطریقہ /رقم نکالنے کا طریقہ آپ استعمال کرتے ہیں (”تعلق“)۔ یہ آپ کی ذمہ داری ہے کہ ایسے تعلق کو چلانے والے شرائط و ضوابط اور کسی بھی خصوصیت، شرط، حد، اس سے پیدا ہونے والے چارجزسے جو آپ کی پیمنٹ سروسز کے استعمال پر اثر انداز ہوسکتے ہوں، واقف ہوں۔
11.3۔ آپ ہمارے اکاؤنٹ لنکنگ طریقہ کار کے مطابق اپنے نیا پے پلیٹ فارم میں لنکڈ اکاؤنٹ شامل کرسکتے ہیں۔
12۔ گفتگویا چیٹ(Chat)
12.1۔ نیا پے پلیٹ فارم آپ کو دوسرے صارفین /اکاؤنٹ ہولڈرزکے ساتھ بات چیت کرنے کے لئے ہمارے چیٹ فنکشن کو استعمال کرنے کے قابل بناتا ہے۔
12.2۔ آپ صرف لاگو قوانین کے تحت، ان استعمال کی شرائط اورہماری چیٹT&Cs کے مطابق منظور شدہ مقاصد کے لیے چیٹ تک رسائی اوراس کا استعمال کرسکتے ہیں۔ آپ کو استعمال کی ان شرائط کے ساتھ چیٹT&Cs کی ایک کاپی پرنٹ کرکے اپنے پاس رکھنی چاہئے۔ آپ ان طریقوں سے چیٹ کا استعمال نہیں کریں گے:
(الف) غیر قانونی، فحش، توہین آمیز، بدنامی، دھمکی دینا، دھمکانا، ہراساں کرنا، نفرت انگیز، نسلی طور پر، یا لسانی طور پر توہین آمیز، یاغیرقانونی طرز عمل کی ترغیب یا حوصلہ افزائی کرنا، بشمول پُرتشدد جرائم کو فروغ دینا (ب) جھوٹ، غلط بیانی، اسپام، یا گمراہ کن بیانات کی اشاعت کرنا (ج) کسی کی نقالی کرنا؛ (د) غیرقانونی یاممنوع مواصلات بھیجنا جیسے بلک میسجنگ، آٹو میسجنگ، اور اسی طرح  کی کوئی سرگرمی (ہ) چیٹ کا کوئی غیر ذاتی استعمال جب تک کہ ہمارے ذریعہ اس کی اجازت نہ ہو۔
13۔ ٹرانزیکشن فیس
13.1۔ ٹرانزیکشن سے متعلقہ فیسیں کسی بھی وقت نیا پے پلیٹ فارم کے”فیس“ سیکشن میں دیکھی جاسکتی ہیں۔ آپ کو ”فیس“ سیکشن،استعمال کی ان شرائط کے ساتھ پرنٹ یا ڈاؤن لوڈ کرنا چاہیے اور ان کی ایک کاپی اپنے پاس رکھنی چاہیے۔ وضاحت کے لئے،”فیس“سیکشن استعمال کی ان شرائط کا ایک حصہ ہے۔ فیس میں استعمال کی ان شرائط کے تحت تبدیلی کی جاسکتی ہے۔
13.2۔ آپ کے ذریعہ ادا کی جانے والی فیسیں آپ کے نیا پے اکاؤنٹ بیلنس سے کٹوتی کی جائیں گی اور آپ ہمیں ایسا کرنے کا اختیار دیتے ہیں۔ 
            ٹرانزیکشن مکمل کیے جانے پر ٹرانزیکشن فیس وصول کی جائے گی۔ اگر آپ کے نیا پے اکاؤنٹ میں موجودبیلنس فیسوں کو پورا کرنے کے لئے ناکافی ہے تو، ہم درخواست کردہ سروس کی انجام دہی سے انکار کر سکتے ہیں۔
13.3۔ آپ یہ یقینی بنانے کے ذمہ دار ہیں کہ کسی پارٹنر انسٹی ٹیوشن کے ساتھ تعلقات کے تحت آپ کی طرف سے پیمنٹ سروسز استعمال کرنے پر اگر کوئی چارجز لاگو ہوتے ہیں۔
14۔ ڈیٹا
14.1۔آپ ہماری رازداری کی پالیسی کے مطابق اپنی ایڈریس بک، تصاویر، پیغامات، مقام اور دیگر معلومات میں نیا پے کے دوسرے صارفین/اکاؤنٹ ہولڈرز کے فون نمبر چیک کرنے کے لئے، اپنے آلے تک رسائی حاصل کرنے کی اجازت دینے کا اقرار کرتے ہیں۔ آپ کے ڈیٹا پر کارروائی ہماری رازداری کی پالیسی کے تابع ہوتی ہے۔ استعمال کی ان شرائط کو قبول کرکے، آپ ہماری رازداری کی پالیسی کی شرائط سے بھی اتفاق کرتے ہیں۔ آپ کو استعمال کی ان شرائط کے ہمراہ رازداری کی پالیسی کی ایک کاپی پرنٹ کرکے رکھنا چاہئے۔
14.2۔نیا پے پلیٹ فارم آپریٹ کرنے اور/یا سروسز کی فراہمی کے مقصد کے لیے، لاگو قوانین کے تحت اجازت کی حد تک، نیاپے اپنے وابستہ افراد اور تھرڈ پارٹی ایجنٹس اور سروس پرووائیڈرزکی خدمات حاصل کرسکتا ہے، تصرف میں لاسکتا ہے اور استعمال کرسکتاہے۔ استعمال کی ان شرائط میں شمولیت کے ذریعے  آپ تصدیق کرتے ہیں کہ آپ پوری طرح سمجھتے، علم رکھتے اور اقرار کرتے ہیں کہ  نیا پے پلیٹ فارم کی موثر فعالیت، سروسز کی فراہمی اور قابل ِاطلاق قوانین کے تحت ہماری ذمہ داریوں کی انجام دہی کے لیے ہم، ہمارے وابستہ افراد، ہمارے متعلقہ ایجنٹوں، ذیلی ٹھیکیداروں اورتھرڈ پارٹی سروس پرووائیڈرزکو آپ کی فراہم کردہ کسی معلومات تک رسائی، پروسیسنگ اور اپنی تحویل میں رکھنے کی پوری اجازت ہے۔۔ اس سے آپ کے ڈیٹا کے تحفظ سے متعلق قابل اطلاق قانون کے تحت ہمارے متعلقہ حقوق اور ذمہ داریوں پر کوئی اثر نہیں پڑتا ہے۔ آپ اپنا نیا پے اکاؤنٹ بند کرکے اس رضامندی کو واپس لے سکتے ہیں۔ اگر آپ اس طرح سے رضامندی واپس لیتے ہیں تو، ہم اس مقصد کے لئے آپ کے ڈیٹا کا استعمال بند کردیں گے، لیکن قابل اطلاق قانون کے تحت جہاں ضرورت ہو وہاں دوسرے مقاصد کے لئے آپ کے ڈیٹا پر کارروائی جاری رکھ سکتے ہیں۔
15۔ املاکِ دانش
15.1۔ نیا پے پلیٹ فارم اور خدمات میں موجود،اور اس سے متعلق تمام املاکِ دانش (مثال کے طور پر، ہماری ایپ میں اور ہماری ویب سائٹ پر موجود مواد، ہمارے لوگو اور ڈیزائن) ہماری ملکیت ہیں۔ آپ کو ہماری  املاکِ دانش کو اپنے طور پر استعمال نہیں کرنا چاہئے، ماسوائے نیا پے پلیٹ فارم اور خدمات کی ان شرائط کے مطابق استفادے کے۔ آپ کو نیا پے پلیٹ فارم اور خدمات کے کسی بھی حصے کی ریورس انجینئرنگ نہیں کرنی چاہئے (یعنی ان کی ساخت یا تشکیل کی تفصیلی جانچ کے بعد دوبارہ پیداوار)۔
15.2۔ مزید معلومات کے لئے، براہ کرم املاکِ دانش سے متعلق ہماری پالیسیاں دیکھیں۔
16۔ ذمہ داری اور ہرجانہ
16.1۔ہم کسی بھی صورت میں درج ذیل کے باعث آپ کو ہونے والے یا ان سے پیدا ہونے والے نقصانات، اخراجات، اور ہرجانے کے لئے ذمہ دار نہیں ہوں گے:
í۔ اپنے ڈیبٹ کارڈ، نیا پے پاس ورڈ، پن، یا آپ کے نیا پے اکاؤنٹ کی ذاتی نوعیت کی دیگرسیکیورٹی خصوصیات کواستعمال کی ان شرائط کے مطابق محفوظ رکھنے میں ناکامی۔
ii۔ اگر آپ اپنے ڈیبٹ کارڈ، پاس ورڈ، پن کی گم شدگی/چوری/بلااجازت استعمال یا ایسے کسی اور واقعے،جس کے بارے میں توقع کی جاسکتی ہے کہ اس سے آپ کے نیا پے اکاؤنٹ کی سیکیورٹی میں نقب لگ گئی ہوگی، کے نتیجے میں کسی نقصان / چوری کی صورت میں کسی بلاجواز تاخیر کے بغیرہمیں مطلع کرنے میں ناکام رہتے ہیں۔
ííí۔اگرچہ لین دین غیر مجاز تھا لیکن آپ نے دھوکہ دہی کی یادانستہ یاسنگین غفلت کے تحت اپنے نیا پے اکاؤنٹ کی سکیورٹی میں نقب لگائی  ہے۔
iv۔ پاکستان یا بیرون ملک کسی بھی اے ٹی ایم میں آپ کا ڈیبٹ کارڈپھنس جانا
v۔ اگر آپ لین دین کی تاریخ سے تین (03) مہینوں کے اندر غیر مجاز یا غلط طور پر سرانجام دیئے گئے لین دین پر اعتراض اٹھاکر ہماری توجہ میں لانے میں ناکام رہیں۔
vi۔ نیا پے پلیٹ فارم پروینڈرز /مرچنٹس کی طرف سے پیش کردہ، فراہم کردہ یا فروخت کردہ کسی بھی پروڈکٹس یا خدمات کی فراہمی، معیار، مقدار یا استعمال سے متعلق مسائل یاآپ اور مرچنٹ کے مابین کوئی تنازع۔
vii۔ کوئی ٹیکسز، ڈیوٹیز یا دیگر چارجز جو آپ کی طرف سے نیا پے اکاؤنٹ یا پیمنٹ سروسز کے استعمال سے رونما ہوتے ہیں جو استعمال کی ان شرائط میں فراہم کیے گئے ہیں؛
viii۔نیاپے پلیٹ فارم یا سروسز کے استعمال سے متعلق کوئی ایسے مسائل جوآپ کی ریلیشن شپ کے حوالے سے پیدا ہورہے ہوں۔
ix۔ لنکڈ اکاؤنٹس سے متعلق حدود، پابندی، ناکامی، مسائل، خرابیاں؛
x۔ہماری خدمات میں رکاوٹ یا خرابی یاودرمیانی رابطے کی خدمات میں رکاوٹ یا خرابی کے لئے،جس پر ہم اپنی ذمہ داریوں کی انجام دہی کے لئے انحصار کرتے ہیں، بشمول لیکن ان تک ہی محدود نہیں،کسی پارٹنر انسٹی ٹیوشن، ٹرسٹی، وابستہ فرد یا تھرڈ پارٹی ایجنٹ یا سروس پرووائیڈر کی طرف سے کوئی کارروائی یا کوتاہی؛
xi۔کسی مجازاتھارٹی کی ہدایت کے مطابق نیا پے کی کوئی کارروائی یا چھوٹ؛ یا
xii۔پالیسیوں کی قابل اطلاق حد تک اور استعمال کی ان شرائط کے تحت اپنے فرائض اور ذمہ داریوں کی تعمیل میں آپ کی ناکامی۔
16.2۔ مذکورہ بالا امور پر اثر انداز ہوئے بغیر، آپ سے کہا جاتا ہے کہ آپ اپنے نیا پے اکاؤنٹ کی لین دین کی ہسٹری کو باقاعدگی سے اور کثرت سے چیک کیا کریں، اور کوئی بھی سوالات یا خدشات ہونے کی صورت میں ایپ کے ذریعے متنازع معاملہ داخل کریں اور / یا فوری طور پر کسٹمر سروسز سے رابطہ کریں۔
16.3۔ کسی غیردرست یا غلط فریق کو ادائیگی کی صورت میں، ہم آپ کو اس طرح کی ادائیگیوں کا سراغ لگانے اور بازیافت کرنے میں معاونت کریں گے۔
16.4۔ آپ تسلیم کرتے ہیں کہ کسی پارٹنر انسٹی ٹیوشن کے اے ٹی ایم پر ڈیبٹ کارڈ یا بائیومیٹرک کے ذریعہ دی گئی یاکی گئی کسی بھی ہدایات یا لین دین کے پروسیس ہونے کے بعد آپ اسے منسوخ نہیں کرسکیں گے۔
16.5۔ ہم کسی بھی کسی بالواسطہ یا نتیجتاً ہونے والے گھاٹے بشمول لیکن ان ہی تک محدودنہیں، منافع میں کمی، کاروبار میں خسارے اور ساکھ کے نقصان کے ذمہ دار نہیں ہیں۔ہم اپنی طرف سے قابل اطلاق قانون کی تعمیل سے ہونے والے کسی بھی نقصان کے لئے ذمہ دار نہیں ہوں گے۔
16.6۔ استعمال کی ان شرائط کے تحت ہماری ذمہ داری آپ کو نیا پے اکاؤنٹ اور نیا پے پلیٹ فارم فراہم کرنے تک محدود ہے اور ہم نیا پے پلیٹ فارم کے ذریعے خریدیا حاصل کردہ کسی بھی سامان یا خدمات کے معیار، حفاظت یا قانونی حیثیت سے متعلق کوئی بیان، نمائندگی، وارنٹی، یا توثیق نہیں کرتے ہیں۔
16.7۔ نیا پے کسی خاص مقصد، مہم،کاز کے فروغ  یامعاونت کے لیے اپنی خدمات کے استعمال کی حمایت یا تائید نہیں کرتا اورنیا پے پلیٹ فارم پر دستیاب ایسا کوئی مقصد، مہم،کاز ہماری رائے یا عقائد کی عکاسی نہیں کرتا ہے۔
16.8۔ آپ ہمیں اور ہمارے کارپوریٹ گروپ کی دیگر کمپنیوں کو کسی بھی دعوے، مطالبے، اخراجات یالاگتوں (قانونی فیس، جرمانے یا جرمانے سمیت) سے بے ضرر ٹھہرانے اور رکھنے، دفاع کرنے، رقم واپس لوٹانے یا تلافی کرنے کا اعتراف کرتے ہیں ، جو آپ یا آپ کے ایجنٹس کی وجہ سے یا اس کے نتیجے میں رونما ہونے ہوں یا برداشت کرنے پڑے ہوں: (i) استعمال کی ان شرائط کی خلاف ورزی۔ (ii) قابل اطلاق قانون کی خلاف ورزی۔ (iii) کسی بھی پالیسی کی خلاف ورزی،یا (iv) ہماری املاکِ دانش کے حقوق کی خلاف ورزی۔ یہ شرط آپ اور ہمارے درمیان تعلقات کے ختم ہونے پرباقی  رہے گی۔
17۔خاتمہ اور معطلی
17.1۔ ہم آپ کو دو (2) ماہ قبل کا نوٹس دے کر آپ کے نیا پے اکاؤنٹ اور نیا پے پلیٹ فارم سے وابستہ خدمات ختم کرسکتے ہیں۔ آپ کسی بھی وقت اپنے نیا پے اکاؤنٹ اور نیا پے پلیٹ فارم سے وابستہ خدمات ختم کرسکتے ہیں۔ براہ کرم نوٹ کریں کہ سیکشن 6 کا اطلاق آپ کے نیا پے اکاؤنٹ کو بند کرنے پر ہوگا۔
17.2۔ ہم بغیر کسی نوٹس کے نیا پے اکاؤنٹ اورنیا پے پلیٹ فارم سے متعلق خدمات: (i) ختم؛ (ii) عارضی طور پر معطل؛ اور / یا (iii) عارضی طور پرفعالیت محدود کرسکتے ہیں، اگر:
i۔کسی مجاز اتھارٹی کے حکم کے حوالے سے یا قابل اطلاق قانون (جس میں AML/CFT/KYC/CDD سے متعلق بھی شامل ہیں) کی تعمیل میں مطلوب ہے۔
ii۔ آپ استعمال کی ان شرائط یامخصوص خدمات پر لاگواضافی شرائط وضوابط کی خلاف ورزی کرتے ہیں۔
iii۔ ہمیں معقول طور پر شبہ ہوکہ آپ کے نیا پے اکاؤنٹ کا غیر مجاز یا جعلی استعمال ہوا ہے یا اس کی کسی حفاظتی خصوصیات میں کوئی سمجھوتاکیا گیا ہے۔
iv۔ آپ قابل اطلاق قانون کی خلاف ورزی کرتے ہیں یا ہمارے پاس یہ ماننے کی وجہ ہے کہ آپ قابلِ اطلاق قوانین کے خلاف ہیں۔ یا
v۔ ہمارے پاس یہ یقین کرنے کی وجہ ہے کہ آپ کسی بھی طرح سے کسی بھی دھوکہ دہی کی سرگرمی، منی لانڈرنگ، دہشت گردی کی مالی اعانت یا دیگر مجرمانہ سرگرمی میں ملوث ہیں۔
18. استعمال کی شرائط میں تبدیلی
18.1۔ استعمال کی یہ شرائط، اضافی شرائط وضوابط اور پالیسیاں تبدیل ہوسکتی ہیں۔ اس سیکشن میں وضع کردہ طریقہ کار کے تحت تبدیلیوں کا اطلاق ہماری طرف سے نوٹیفکیشن کے ساتھ کیا جائے گا۔
18.2۔ ہم آپ کو دفعہ 19.1 اور 19.2 کے مطابق کسی مجوزہ تبدیلی کا نوٹس دیں گے۔
18.3۔ مجوزہ تبدیلی مذکورہ نوٹس کی فراہمی کے فورا بعد نافذ ہوجائے گی۔
19۔ مواصلات
19.1۔ ہم عام طور پر آپ کو ایپ اطلاعات کے ذریعے پیغام دیتے ہیں (جس کے لیے آپ کو یہ یقینی بنانا ہوگا کہ آپ کا آلہ انٹرنیٹ سے منسلک رکھا جائے) اور ایس ایم ایس کرتے ہیں۔ آپ ہماری طرف سے ای میل کے ذریعے پیغام بھیجنے کا انتخاب کرسکتے ہیں۔ آپ کو آنے والے ان پیغامات کی باقاعدگی سے اور کثرت سے، کسی بھی صورت میں اٹھائیس (28) دن کی مدت میں لازمی طور پرکم ازکم ایک بارچیک کرنے کی ضرورت ہے۔ اس طرح کے پیغامات میں ہمارے نیا پے پلیٹ فارم پر مزید رابطے کے لنکس شامل ہوسکتے ہیں۔  نیا پے پلیٹ فارم پر آپ کے ایپ کی اطلاع کے حصے میں پہنچائی گئی کوئی بھی اطلاع کو آپ کو اسی دن موصول سمجھی جائے گی۔ ایس ایم ایس یا ای میل کے ذریعہ بھیجی جانے والی کوئی بھی مواصلت ہمارے سرورز یا کسی بھی ایسے خدمت فراہم کنندہ، جسے ہم اس طرح کی مواصلات کی خدمات کے لیے شامل کرتے ہیں،کے سرور زپر درج ہونے پرموصول شدہ تصور کی جاتی ہے۔
19.2۔ جہاں ہمیں آپ کو کسی پائیدار میڈیم پر معلومات کی فراہمی درکارہوتی ہے، ہم یا تو آپ کو اپنے پیغام کے ساتھ اٹیچمنٹ بھیجیں گے یا آپ کو نیاپے پلیٹ فارم پر معلومات کی نشاندہی کرنے والاایسا نوٹیفیکیشن بھیجیں گے جو آپ کوپرنٹ کی شکل میں معلومات کواپنے پاس رکھنے کے قابل بنائے گا یاکسی ایسی دوسری شکل میں جسے آپ مستقل طور پر مستقبل کے حوا لہ کے طور پر اپنے پاس رکھ سکیں۔ ہم آپ کو مشورہ دیتے ہیں کہ ہم جو بھی مواصلات آپ کو بھیجتے ہیں ان کی کاپیاں اپنے پاس رکھیں یا اپنی دسترس میں رکھیں۔
19.3۔ آپ موجودہ استعمال کی شرائط، اضافی شرائط وضوابط، پالیسیاں یا آپ سے متعلق کسی بھی دوسری معاہدہ جاتی دستاویز کی ایک کاپی تک  نیا پے پلیٹ فارم پررسائی حاصل کرسکتے ہیں اور کسٹمر سروس سے رابطہ کرکے بھی۔
19.4۔ ہم آپ کوقابلِ عمل فائلیں اٹیچ کرکے یا کسی بھی قابل عمل فائلوں کے لنکس کے ساتھ کبھی بھی کوئی پیغامات نہیں بھیجیں گے۔ اگر آپ کو اس طرح کی اٹیچمنٹس کے ساتھ کوئی پیغام موصول ہوتا ہے تو، آپ کو اٹیچمنٹ پر کلک کیے بغیر میسج کو حذف کردینا چاہئے۔ اگر آپ کو شبہ ہے کہ وہ پیغام ہماری طرف سے نہیں بھیجا گیا ہے،تو براہ کرم کسٹمر سروس سے رابطہ کریں۔
19.5۔ بطور ڈیفالٹ(طے شدہ امر)، آپ کو ایپ میں اطلاعات یا ای میلز(اگر قابلِ اطلاق ہوں) موصول ہوں گی جو آپ کو نئی خدمات اور ان کی خصوصیات، ایونٹس، پروموشنز، خصوصی ڈیلز وغیرہ کے بارے میں آگاہ کریں گی۔ ان استعمال کی شرائط کو قبول کرکے، آپ اس طرح کے مواصلات کوباقاعدگی سے وصول کرنے کا اقرار کرتے ہیں۔ اگر آپ اس طرح کی مواصلات کی وصولی کی اطلاعات حاصل نہیں کرنا چاہتے ہیں تو نیا پے پلیٹ فارم پر مناسب سیٹنگ کو تبدیل کرکے ان اطلاعات کو غیرفعال کرسکتے ہیں۔
19.6۔ماسوائے اس کے کہ کہیں اور مہیا کی گئی ہو، ان شرائط کے تحت آپ سے مطلوب مواصلات کو کسٹمر سروس کے ذریعے درج ذیل ذرائع کا استعمال کرکے ہم تک پہنچایا جاسکتا ہے۔
i۔ support@nayapay.com پر ای میل کریں
ii۔ ہمارے کسٹمر سروس نمبرز پر کال کریں
iii۔ نیا پے ویب سائٹ پرکنٹیکٹ فارم کے ذریعے رابطہ کریں
iv۔ نیا پلیٹ فارم کے ذریعے
20۔ شکایات اور تنازعات
20.1۔ہمارے بارے میں یاہماری طرف سے آپ کوفراہم کردہ خدمات سے متعلق کوئی بھی شکایات پہلی مرتبہ کسٹمر سروس سے رابطہ کرکے ہم تک پہنچائی جانی چاہئے۔ آپ کو واضح طور پر نشا ن دہی کرنی چاہئے کہ آپ ہم سے شکایت کرنا چاہتے ہیں یا تنازعہ داخل کرنا چاہتے ہیں۔ اس سے ہمیں شکایا ت اور تنازعات کو محض سوال سے ممتاز کرنے میں مدد ملتی ہے۔ ہماری شکایات اور تنازعات کی ہینڈلنگ کے طریقہ کار کے مطابق آپ کی شکایت موصول ہونے کے 48 گھنٹوں کے اندر اندر ہم آپ کو شکایت یا تنازعہ کی وصولی کا اعتراف بھیجتے ہیں۔ آپ نیا پے پلیٹ فارم سے یاکانٹیکٹ کسٹمر سروس کے ذریعے کسی بھی وقت ہماری شکایات اورتنازعات کی ہینڈلنگ کے طریقہ کار کی ایک کاپی تک رسائی حاصل کرسکتے ہیں۔
21۔ متفرق
21.1۔ آپ کا نیا پے اکاؤنٹ آپ کا ذاتی ہے اور آپ کسی بھی تھرڈ پارٹی کو استعمال کی شرائط کے تحت کوئی حقوق تفویض نہیں کرسکتے ہیں۔
21.2۔ آپ کا نیا پے اکاؤنٹ پاکستان میں چلتا ہے اور استعمال کی یہ شرائط اسلامی جمہوریہ پاکستان کے قوانین کے تابع ہیں اوران ہی کے مطابق ان کی تشریح کی جائے گی۔ استعمال کی ان شرائط کے تحت یا آپ کے نیا پے اکاؤنٹ کے سلسلے میں کوئی بھی تنازعہ صرف اور صرف کراچی کی عدالتوں میں لایا جائے گا۔
21.3۔ اگر ان استعمال کی شرائط کے کسی بھی حصے کو قابل اطلاق قوانین کے تحت غلط یا ناقابل اطلاق پایا جاتا ہے تو پھر اس حصے کو باقی شرائط سے منقطع کیا جائے گا، جو قابل اطلاق قوانین کے ذریعہ مکمل حد تک جائز اور قابل عمل ہوں گی۔
22۔ تشریحات
استعمال کی ان شرائط میں مختلف اصطلاحات  ایک تشریح شدہ معنی رکھتی ہیں جو درج ذیل ہیں۔
.i ”اکاؤنٹ منسلک کرنے والا پروسیس“ نیا پے کا وہ پروسیس ہے جو ادائیگی کی خدمات کے لئے لنکڈ اکاؤنٹس کے استعمال پرلاگو ہے، جو نیا پے پلیٹ فارم پر  دستیاب ہے۔
.ii ”اضافی شرائط و ضوابط“کی وضاحت شق 2 میں ہے۔
iii ”.قابل اطلاق قانون“ کا مطلب ہے کوئی ایساقانون، قانون سازی،سرکاری حکم نامہ، آرڈیننس، ضابطہ، آرڈر،ڈگری، ہدایت، عدالتی فیصلہ، فیصلہ، حکم، لائسنس، اجازت، کسی مجاز اتھارٹی کی منظوری، قاعدہ، ضابطہ، اور اس کی عدالتی تشریح، اورمذکورہ بالا میں سے کسی کے سلسلے میں کسی بھی مجاز اتھارٹی کے ذریعہ جو اس معاملے پر دائرہ کار رکھتی ہے، کوئی بھی تشریح،عہد یااقرار، جو مذکورہ کسی شخص کو پابند کرتا ہو۔
.iv ”چیٹ“کا مطلب نیا پے پلیٹ فارم کا چیٹ فنکشن ہے جو آپ کو نیا پے پلیٹ فارم کے دوسرے صارفین /اکاؤنٹ ہولڈرزکے ساتھ بات چیت کرنے کی سہولت دیتا ہے۔
.v ”کامپیٹنٹ اتھارٹی“ کا مطلب ہے کسی بھی قومی، اعلیٰ سطحی، علاقائی یا مقامی حکومت یا سرکار، انتظامی، مالی، عدالتی، یا حکومت کی ملکیت باڈی، محکمہ، کمیشن، اتھارٹی، ٹربیونل، ایجنسی یا ادارہ، یا مرکزی بینک (یا کوئی شخص، چاہے حکومت کی ملکیت ہویانہ ہو اور جیسے بھی تشکیل دیاگیا ہو یا جیسے بھی پکارا جاتاہو، جو مرکزی بینک کے فرائض بجالاتاہو) یا کسی بھی طرح کاکوئی بھی دیگر شناخت شدہ ادارہ یا کوئی اور فرد جو ایگزیکٹو، مقننہ، عدالتی، قواعد و ضوابط یا انتظامی فرائض پر عمل پیرا ہے۔
.vi ”شکایات اور تنازعات ہینڈلنگ طریقہ کار“خدمات سے متعلق شکایات اور تنازعات نمٹانے کے لیے نیا پے کا طریقہ کار ہے، جو نیا پے پلیٹ فارم پر دستیاب ہے۔
vii ”.کسٹمر سروس“کا مطلب ہے ہماری کسٹمر سروس، جس تک آپ support@nayapay.com پر ای میل بھیج کر، نیا پے ویب سائٹ پر ہم سے رابطہ فارم کو پْر کرکے، یا ہمارے کسٹمر سروس فون نمبر پر کال کرکے یا نیا پے پلیٹ فارم کے ذریعے رسائی حاصل کرسکتے ہیں۔
viii.”ڈیبٹ کارڈ“ کا مطلب ہے نیا پے کے ذریعہ جاری کردہ دستاویزی یا مجازی ڈیبٹ کارڈ جو آپ کے نیا پے اکاؤنٹ سے منسلک ہوگا۔
.ix ”ڈیوائسز“ کا مطلب ہے اسمارٹ فون، پرسنل کمپیوٹر، ٹیبلٹ، یا الیکٹرانک ڈیوائس کی کوئی اور شکل جو آپ نیاپے پلیٹ فارم تک رسائی کے لیے استعمال کرتے ہیں۔
x۔ ”ای ایم آئی ریگولیشنز“ کا مطلب ہے کہ ایس بی پی کی طرف سے پیمنٹ سسٹمز اینڈ الیکٹرانک فنڈز ٹرانسفر ایکٹ 2007کی پیروی میں جاری کردہ ریگولیشنزجن میں وقتاً فوقتاً ترمیم کی جاسکتی ہے۔
xi۔”ای منی“کا مطلب EMI ریگولیشنز کے تحت اصطلاح کی تشریح کے مطابق ہوگا۔
xii۔ ”فیس“کا مطلب ہے آپ کی طرف سے ہماری خدمات کو استعمال کرنے کے لئے ادائیگی کے معاوضے جو نیا پے پلیٹ فارم پر ”فیس“سیکشن میں فراہم کیے گئے ہیں۔
xii۔ ”لنکڈ اکاونٹ“کا مطلب ہے صارف/اکاؤنٹ ہولڈرکی طرف سے کسی پارٹنر انسٹی ٹیوشن کے پاس رکھا جانے والا پاکستانی روپے میں اکاؤنٹ جو نیا پے پلیٹ فارم پر رجسٹرڈ ہے۔
xiv۔”لوڈکرنے کا طریقہ“ کا مطلب ہے پارٹنر اداروں، ایجنٹ اور دیگر تھرڈ پارٹیز کی طرف سے نیاپے اکاؤنٹ میں ای منی لوڈ کرنے کے لیے فراہم کردہ طریقے،بشمول لنکڈ اکاؤنٹس، کیش کاؤنٹرز، اے ٹی ایمز، انٹرنیٹ بینکنگ، موبائل بینکنگ کے ذریعے۔
xv۔”پارٹنر انسٹی ٹیوشن“کا مطلب ہے پیمنٹ سروسز کی فراہمی میں نیاپے کی شراکت دار اور نیاپے پلیٹ فارم پر مندرج پارٹنر بینکنگ کمپنیز اوردیگرمالیاتی ادارے۔
xvi۔”پیمنٹ سروسز“" کا مطلب ہے نیا پے اکاؤنٹ کے حصے کے طور پرپیش کردہ، الیکٹرانک ادائیگی کے درج ذیل طریقے،بشمول بناکسی حدکے:
(i)ای منی جمع کرانا اور واپس لینا/نکالنا
(ii)نیا پے پلیٹ فارم کے ذریعے فراہم کردہ الیکٹرانک فنڈ ٹرانسفر (بشمول ای کنزیومر ٹو بزنس (C2B)، بزنس ٹو کنزیومر (B2C)، بزنس ٹو بزنس (B2B)،پرسن ٹو پرسن  (P2P)، گورنمنٹ ٹو پرسن (G2P) اور پرسن ٹو گورنمنٹ (P2G) وغیرہ)۔
(iii)ڈیبٹ کارڈ کے ذریعہ کی گئی  اے ٹی ایم، پوائنٹ آف سیل (POS)، اور ای کامرس ٹرانزیکشن،اور۔
(iv)بائیو میٹرک ٹرانزیکشنز
xvii۔”پن“ کا مطلب ہے صارف/اکاؤنٹ ہولڈر کی طرف سے طے کردہ چار(4)یا چھ (6)اعشاری ہندسوں پر مشتمل پرسنل آئیڈینٹیفکیشن نمبرجو ٹرانزیکشن کرنے کے لیے درکار ہوتا ہے (خواہ وہ نیا پے پلیٹ فارم کے ذریعے کی جائے یا ڈیبٹ کارڈ کے ذریعے)
xviii۔ "PKR"کا مطلب ہے پاکستانی روپیہ
xix۔”پالیسیز“کا مطلب ہے نیا پے کی وقتاً فوقتاً اپ ڈیٹ کی جانے والی پالیسیاں، جو AML / KYC، ڈیٹا پروٹیکشن، انفارمیشن سیکیورٹی، اور املاک ِ دانش کے استعمال کے حوالے سے ہیں، جن تک  http://www.nayapay.com پر رسائی حاصل کی جا سکتی ہے اور اس میں پرائیویسی پالیسی، انٹیلیکچوئل پراپرٹی اور ڈسپیوٹ ہینڈلنگ پالیسی شامل ہوگی۔
xx۔”پرائیویسی پالیسی“ نیا پے کی پالیسی ہے جو ذاتی ڈیٹا کی کارروائی پراختیاررکھتی ہے، اورجو نیا پے پلیٹ فارم پر دستیاب ہے۔
xxi۔”ریلیشن شپ“ کی تعریف سیکشن 11.2 میں کی گئی ہے۔
xxii۔”ایس بی پی“ کا مطلب اسٹیٹ بینک آف پاکستان ہے۔
xxiii۔”ٹرانزیکشن“ سے مراد ادائیگی کی خدمات کا ایک مرتبہ استعمال ہے۔
xxiv۔”ٹرسٹی“ کا مطلب ہے کہ EMI ریگولیشنزکی پیروی میں ٹرسٹی کے طور پر مقرر بینکنگ کمپنی۔
xxv۔ "نیا پے" کا مطلب ہے نیا پے (پرائیویٹ) لمیٹڈ، پاکستان کے قوانین کے تحت شامل ایک کمپنی جس کا رجسٹرڈ دفتر دوسری منزل، 14 علی بلاک، نیو گارڈن ٹاؤن، لاہور اور ہیڈ آفس 10ویں منزل، لکسن اسکوائر بلڈنگ نمبر 3 سرور شہید روڈ، صدر، کراچی 74200، پاکستان میں ہے اورجس کا CUIN نمبر 0104200 ہے۔
xxvi۔”نیا پے اکاؤنٹ“کا مطلب ہے وہ ای منی اکاؤنٹ جسے آپ نیا پے پلیٹ فارم کے ذریعہ کھولتے، چلاتے اور برقرار رکھتے ہیں۔
xxvii۔ ”نیا پے پاس ورڈ“ کا مطلب کسی ڈیوائس پر نیا پے پلیٹ فارم تک رسائی حاصل کرنے کے لئے پاس ورڈہے، جو رجسٹریشن کے وقت آپ کی طرف سے طے کیا گیا تھا۔
xxviii۔”نیا پے پلیٹ فارم“ کا مطلب الیکٹرانک پلیٹ فارم ہے، چاہے اس تک موبائل ایپلی کیشن، ہاتھ میں پکڑنے والی ڈیوائسز، پورٹلز۔ پیمنٹ گیٹ ویز یا ویب سائٹ  کے ذریعہ رسائی حاصل کی جائے یا دوسرے ذرائع سے، جسے نیاپے اکاؤنٹس کھولنے اور خدمات فراہم کرنے کے لئے نیا پے کی طرف سے تیار کیاگیا ہے اور چلایا جاتا ہے۔
xxix۔”سروسز“ کا مطلب ہے ادائیگی کی خدمات، چیٹ، اور دیگر خدمات جو استعمال کی ان شرائط، اضافی شرائط وضوابط، اور پالیسیوں کے مطابق نیا پے پلیٹ فارم پر دستیاب ہیں۔
xxx "۔”استعمال کی شرائط“ کا مطلب ہے استعمال کی یہ شرائط، جو نیا پے پلیٹ فارم پر شائع ہوئی ہیں اور جن میں وقتاً فوقتاً ترمیم کی جاسکتی ہیں۔
xxxi۔”ہم“، ”ہمیں“،”ہمارے“ کا مطلب نیاپے ہے۔
xxxii۔”رقم نکالنے کے طریقے“ کا مطلب ہے ای منی کی وصولی کے پارٹنر اداروں اور دیگر ایجنٹس اور تھرڈ پارٹیز کی طرف سے فراہم کردہ طریقے بشمول کیش کاؤنٹرز، ATMsیا لنکڈ اکاؤنٹ کو منتقلی۔
xxxiii۔”آپ“،”آپ کے“ کا مطلب ہے آپ،ایک انسان یا قانونی ادارہ جس کے نام پر نیا پے اکاؤنٹ کھولا اور برقرار رکھا جاتا ہے۔
Last Updated: 29 Oct 2021
1. DEFINITIONS AND INTERPRETATION
1.1. The following terms when used in these NayaPay Standard Merchant Terms and Conditions or any document referred to herein shall have the following meaning:
a)
“Acceptance Notification”
means the notification for a successful execution of Transaction shared by NayaPay with the Merchant in accordance with the Manual;
b)
“Agreed Terms”
is defined in Clause 2;
c)
“AML KYC Regulations”
means the Applicable Law in respect of “Anti-Money Laundering”, “Customer Due Diligence” , “Know-Your-Customer”, and “Combating the Financing of Terrorism”  requirements as may be applicable over the matter in question and binding on a given person (including NayaPay and the Merchant), including but not limited to the Anti-Money Laundering Act, 2010 (along with the rules/regulations issued thereunder), the Anti-Terrorism Act, 1997 (along with the rules/regulations issued thereunder), and rules, regulations and guidelines issued by the SBP;
d)
“Applicable Law”
means any law, legislation, statute, ordinance, code, order, decree, directive, judgment, decision, injunction, license, permit, approval of any Competent Authority, rule, regulation, and judicial interpretation thereof, and any interpretation of or determination in respect of any of the foregoing, by any Competent Authority having jurisdiction over the matter in question and binding on a given person (including NayaPay and the Merchant), including, but not limited to, the Payment Systems and Electronic Fund Transfers Act, 2007, EMI Regulations, Electronic Transactions Ordinance, 2002, and the Prevention of Electronic Crimes Act, 2016;
e)
“Banking Company(ies)”
means a company licensed for the purpose of carrying out the business of banking in Pakistan under the Banking Companies Ordinance, 1962;
f)
“Business Day”
means a day on which Banking Companies in Pakistan are open for general banking business;
g)
“Competent Authority”
means any national, supranational, regional or local government or governmental, administrative, fiscal, judicial, or government-owned body, department, commission, authority, tribunal, agency or entity, or central bank (or any person, whether or not government owned and howsoever constituted or called, that exercises the functions of a central bank) or other recognized entity of any kind or other person exercising executive, legislative, judicial, regulatory or administrative functions;
h)
“Customer”
means a consumer who opens and maintains an electronic money account with NayaPay and is registered on the NayaPay Platform;
i)
“EMI Regulations”
means the Regulations for Electronic Money Institutions issued by the SBP pursuant to the Payment Systems and Electronic Funds Transfer Act, 2007, as amended from time to time;
j)
“Intellectual Property”
means and includes any and all intellectual property of whatever nature and kind, including without limitation, patents, registered designs, logos, trademarks and service marks (whether registered or not), rights in the nature of unfair competition rights, copyrights, database rights, design rights, and all similar property rights (whether tangible or intangible);
k)
“Manual”
means the technical manual issued by NayaPay and applicable to the provision of the NayaPay Services, as amended from time to time and accessible  on the NayaPay Merchant Portal;
l)
“Merchant”
means the Person who is in the business of providing goods and/or service to consumers and who has accepted the Agreed Terms for NayaPay Services;
m)
“MDR”
shall mean the charges payable to NayaPay by the Merchant in respect of a successful Transaction;
n)
“Merchant Account”
may refer to either the Merchant E-Money Account or the Merchant Bank Account, or both as the context may require;
o)
“Merchant Bank Account”
means the bank account(s) opened and maintained by a Merchant with a Banking Company, and which is registered  on the NayaPay Merchant Portal;
p)
“Merchant E-Money Account”
means, where applicable, the  electronic money account(s) opened and  maintained by a Merchant with NayaPay in accordance with and subject to the Terms of Use, and registered on the NayaPay Merchant Portal;
q)
“Merchant Participation Agreement”
means the agreement entered into between NayaPay and the Merchant for participation and registration with the NayaPay Platform;
r)
“Merchant Product/Service”
means any good and/or service offered by a Merchant and which is ordered, purchased, leased, or otherwise provided to a Customer using the NayaPay Services;
s)
“Merchant T&C’s”
means these NayaPay Standard Merchant Terms and Conditions;
t)
“Merchant Website/Application”
means the official website and/or mobile application maintained and operated by or on behalf of the Merchant for the provisions of the Merchant Product/Service;
u)
“Merchant Payable Balance”
has been defined in Clause 4.1;
v)
“NayaPay”
means NayaPay (Private) Limited, whose registered office is at 10th Floor, Lakson Building 3, Sarwar Shaheed Road, Karachi – 74200, Pakistan;
w)
“NayaPay Merchant Portal”
means the web-portal operated by NayaPay (as amended from time to time) for Merchants to access NayaPay Services, currently accessible at https://merchant.nayapay.com, excluding any external websites to which the website points by way of hyperlink or otherwise;
x)
“NayaPay Platform”
means the electronic platform, whether accessed through a mobile application, web-portal, or other means, developed and operated by NayaPay to open electronic money accounts of Customers and  provide electronic payment and other services, including but not limited to, deposit and redemption of  electronic money, and Electronic Fund Transfers (inter-se Consumer-to-Business (C2B), Business-to-Consumer (B2C), Business-to-Business (B2B), Person-to-Person (P2P), Government-to-Person (G2P), Person-to-Government (P2G) etc.);
y)
“NayaPay Services”
means the service of acquiring and facilitating electronic payments to the Merchant, as further described in Clause 4, including, but not limited to, the following: (i) provision of electronic payment gateway on the Merchant Website / Application; (ii) in-app payments on the NayaPay Platform; and (iii) point of sale transactions at the Merchant’s premises; and (iv) such other services as may be agreed between NayaPay and the Merchant;
z)
“NayaPay System”
means the infrastructure established by NayaPay for providing electronic payment services and comprising of software, formulas, algorithms, APIs, hardware, servers, networks, grids or such other systems, assets, or facilities;
aa)
“Person”
means an individual, a body corporate, an association, a partnership, a trust or any other entity or organisation;
bb)
“Policies”
means the policies of NayaPay, as updated from time to time, in respect of AML/KYC, data protection, information security, and usage of Intellectual Property, which may be accessed at http://www.nayapay.com;
cc)
“Reserve”
means an amount which is determined by NayaPay (in its sole discretion) in accordance with clause 6, for the purpose of securing any claims of NayaPay or NayaPay Customers against the Merchant;
dd)
“SBP”
means the State Bank of Pakistan;
ee)
“Security”
means any form of security requested by NayaPay (in its sole discretion) from the Merchant to secure the obligations of the Merchant under the Agreed Terms, and shall include a Reserve, bank guarantee or such other security as may be required by NayaPay;
ff)
“System Breach”
means any compromise, disruption, failure, loss of control of the financial infrastructure and/or information systems of an entity due to, inter alia, any unauthorized access to, interception of, interference with, the software, hardware, servers, networks, grids or such other systems, assets, or facilities, of such entity;
gg)
“Terms of Use”
means the terms and conditions available at www.nayapay.com, as amended from time to time in accordance with the terms thereof, and which, inter alia, govern the use of the Merchant E-Money Account (so far as applicable);
hh)
“Transaction”
refers to a single instance of use of the NayaPay Services by a Customer for a Merchant Product/Service; and
ii)
“Transaction Data”
means any data that is exchanged between the Merchant and NayaPay for execution of Transactions and records of the same.
1.2. Headings are for convenience only and shall not affect the construction or interpretation of these Merchant T&C’s.
1.3. Unless the contrary intention appears, words in the singular include the plural and vice versa; and words importing the masculine gender include the feminine and neuter and vice versa.
1.4. Any phrase introduced by the term "included", "including", "in particular" or any similar expression will be construed as illustrative only and will not limit the sense of the words preceding that term.
2. SCOPE
The provision of the NayaPay Services and the Merchant E-Money Account shall be governed by the Merchant T&C’s, as supplemented and modified by the Merchant Participation Agreement, the Manual, the Terms of Use (if applicable), and the Policies
(“Agreed Terms”).
3. TERM
The Agreed Terms will continue in full force and effect unless and until terminated in accordance with the terms hereof.
4. REGISTRATION OF MERCHANT AND OPERATION OF SERVICES
4.1. In order to avail the NayaPay Services and/or open a Merchant E-Money Account, you must, in addition to executing the Merchant Participation Agreement, first register on the NayaPay Merchant Portal. As part of the registration process, we will ask you to create a NayaPay ID (for e.g. ab@nayapay). This ID will be used to identify you as a NayaPay Merchant. At all times NayaPay shall hold full rights of the NayaPay ID. As and when required by NayaPay and without giving prior notice, NayaPay shall have the authority to revoke the NayaPay ID and ask you to change it. NayaPay will provide an option to you to choose an alternate NayaPay ID as part of the change procedure. As part of the registration process, you will also need to accept the Agreed Terms and will be required to provide such documents and information as may be required to comply with NayaPay on-boarding processes and Applicable Law (in particular, AML KYC Regulations).
4.2. The NayaPay Services facilitate the use of the NayaPay Platform by a Customer to make payments to the Merchant. In respect of a Transaction for which an Acceptance Notification has been issued, funds collected from Customers and held by NayaPay after deduction of MDR (“Merchant Payable Balance”) shall be credited into the Merchant Account as per the frequency agreed in the Merchant Participation Agreement.
4.3. The Merchant is aware that credit into the Merchant Account does not amount to the receipt of cleared funds. The Merchant remains liable to NayaPay for the full amount of the payment and any MDR deducted therefrom if the payment is later reversed for any reason (the “Reversal Amount”). In the event of a chargeback/payment reversal, NayaPay will, in accordance with the Manual, recover the Reversal Amount and any applicable third-party chargeback or reversal fee from the Merchant Payable Balance and/or by debiting the Merchant E-Money Account (if applicable). If NayaPay is unable to fully set-off the Reversal Amount and the applicable third-party chargeback or reversal fee from the Merchant Payable Balance and/or the Merchant E-Money Account (if applicable), the Merchant is required to credit or load sufficient funds into the Merchant Account. Failure to do so is a breach of these Agreed Terms. NayaPay reserves the right, at any time, to send reminders or take debt collection measures permitted under Applicable Law. NayaPay reserves the right to charge the Merchant the expenses reasonably incurred in connection with any debt collection or enforcement efforts.
4.4. In relation to the Merchant E-Money Account (if applicable), NayaPay reserves the right to (at its sole discretion) not offer and/or provide any of the services and/or functionalities associated therewith or otherwise available on the NayaPay Platform in accordance with the Terms of Use.
4.5. NayaPay reserves the right to suspend or limit the NayaPay Services pending full payment of any outstanding claims, charges, penalties, costs or charges by the Merchant.
4.6. NayaPay reserves the right to suspend and/or close, at any time and at its sole discretion, the Merchant E-Money Account (or certain functionalities thereof such as loading, receiving, sending and/or withdrawing electronic money) and the NayaPay Services:
4.6.1. where NayaPay believes it is necessary or desirable to protect the security of the Merchant Account;
4.6.2. if any Transactions are made which NayaPay, in its sole discretion, deems to be (a) made in breach of these Agreed Terms (including  security requirements of the Merchant Account); or (b) suspicious, unauthorised or fraudulent, including without limitation under the AML/KYC Regulations or otherwise in relation to  fraud or other illegal activities;
4.6.3. in the event of a potential or actual System Breach of the Merchant;
4.6.4. if any potential or actual compromise of the Transaction Data occurs;
4.6.5. upon the insolvency, liquidation, winding up, bankruptcy, administration, receivership or dissolution of the Merchant, or where NayaPay reasonably considers that there is a threat of the same in relation to the Merchant;
4.6.6. where anything occurs which, in the opinion of NayaPay, suggests that the Merchant shall be unable to provide the Merchant Products/Services and/or otherwise fulfil the contracts that it has with its customers;
4.6.7. if the Transactions are for the sale of goods and/or services which fall outside of the agreed business activities of the Merchant, or where the Merchant presents a Transaction and fails to deliver the Merchant Products/Services  and/or where the Merchant is third party processing and not delivering Merchant Products/Services  itself;
4.6.8. where there is a change in the Merchant circumstances (including a deterioration in or change to the Merchant’s financial position), or a change in the Merchant’s business or in the Merchant Products/Services which NayaPay considers, in its sole discretion, material to the continuation of the NayaPay Services; or
4.6.9. if NayaPay considers, in its sole discretion, that the level of payment reversals/chargebacks or number of claims for non-delivery of Merchant Product/Service that are being incurred in respect of the Merchant are unreasonable; and NayaPay will make reasonable efforts to inform the Merchant of any such suspension in advance, or if this is not practicable, immediately afterwards and give its reasons for such suspension unless informing the Merchant would compromise security measures or is otherwise prohibited by Applicable Law; or
4.6.10. where required under Applicable Law or by an order of a Competent Authority.
4.7. Where NayaPay suspends the Merchant E-Money Account and/or the NayaPay Services, NayaPay shall reinstate the same and where necessary, provide new security details, such as a password, as soon as practicable after the reasons for the suspension cease to exist.
4.8. The Merchant acknowledges and agrees that the NayaPay operates solely as a payment intermediary and that NayaPay: (a) under no circumstances functions as a seller, buyer, dealer, middleman, retailer, auctioneer, supplier, distributor, manufacturer, broker, agent or merchant of Merchant Product/Service; and (b) makes no representations or warranties and does not ensure the quality, safety or legality of any Merchant Product/Service.
4.9. The Merchant acknowledges and agrees that any dispute regarding any Merchant Product/Service is between the Customer and the Merchant. Any Transaction connected with the Merchant Products/Services shall only obligate the Merchant. NayaPay shall not be a party to any resulting dispute including but not limited to disputes over performance and liability issues relating to the delivery, quality, quantity or use of the Merchant Products/Services.
5. OBLIGATIONS
At all times during the term of the Agreed Terms, the Merchant shall:
5.1 comply with the Agreed Terms;
5.2 if required by NayaPay or under Applicable Law, open and maintain a Merchant E-Money Account in accordance with the Agreed Terms;
5.3 provide complete and accurate information on the NayaPay Merchant Portal in compliance with Applicable Laws;
5.4 only utilize the NayaPay Services for genuine Transactions in relation to its main business and not use the NayaPay Services to receive funds in connection with any illegal, fraudulent, deceptive or manipulative act or practice;
5.5 permit Customers to make payments for Merchant Product/Services through the NayaPay Platform as per the NayaPay Services availed by the Merchant;
5.6 provide the Merchant Product/Services to the Customer only after receipt of the Acceptance Notification;
5.7 ensure all marketing and promotional activities on the Merchant Website, at any of its premises, and hosted on the NayaPay Platform (if applicable) are in compliance with Applicable Laws, the Manual and the Policies;
5.8 grant NayaPay the right to access the Merchant Website for the purpose of conducting manual checks or automated searches in order to investigate the accuracy of information contained on the Merchant Website and make necessary modifications as recommended by NayaPay, so far as in relation to the NayaPay Services, provided that (i) NayaPay shall be under no obligation to conduct such searches or checks; and (ii) any such searches shall under no circumstances be deemed an approval of any contents of the Merchant Website/Application;
5.9 comply with the security obligations provided under the Manual;
5.10 without prejudice to payments prohibited under the Terms of Use, the Merchant shall not receive payments as consideration for the delivery of pornographic content or services, illegal downloads, gambling, or for any other goods or services the offering or provision of which is illegal/regulated under Applicable Law;
5.11 for purposes of complying with AML KYC Regulations and other Applicable Laws, provide NayaPay with such information as NayaPay may request, including information about the Merchant’s business, corporate structure and constitution, shareholders, partners, members, directors, key employees or, in the case of a trust, its beneficiaries and provide, upon request by NayaPay, copies of financial information and other information on the business of the Merchant, including bank and/or trade references;
5.12 not charge Customers a processing fee, mark-up or other surcharge for Merchant Product/Services paid for through the NayaPay Platform and shall not use any other means to discourage Customers from using the NayaPay Platform;
5.13 provide Customers with a clear and fair return and refund policy and, upon request by NayaPay, provide a copy of its return and refund policy and shall notify NayaPay of any subsequent change to such policy;
5.14 comply with all Applicable Laws, including but not limited to AML KYC Regulations, and maintain all regulatory approvals required from and comply with all directions of any Competent Authority for the purposes of its obligations hereunder;
5.15 in accordance with the Manual and Applicable Law, implement and maintain a comprehensive written information security program with appropriate technical and organizational procedures, controls, and other measures to ensure a level of security appropriate to the risk of compromise of the Transaction Data or any other form of System Breach, and permit NayaPay to, directly or through a third-party contractor of its choosing, conduct inspections/assessments of the security measures established by the Merchant;
5.16 maintain and operate its information technology systems in order to ensure continued and uninterrupted connectivity with the NayaPay System, and agree to pay a down-time penalty in accordance with thresholds and rates which may be as specified in the Manual;
5.17 maintain all records in relation to the NayaPay System (including but not limited to all information relating to Customers and Transactions) for ten (10) years or such extended period as may be required under Applicable Laws;
5.18 notify NayaPay immediately in the event of: (a) any System Breach or other compromise of the Transaction Data; (b) any actual or potential regulatory action against the Merchant by any Competent Authority; (c) any actual or potential change of control of the Merchant; (d) any suspension of activities which would affect the NayaPay System; or (e) an occurrence (other than force majeure) leading to its inability to perform any of its obligations under the Agreed Terms;
5.19 provide all assistance and information required by NayaPay, or a third-party appointed by NayaPay, in respect of any audit, investigation, inspection, or inquiry conducted by any Competent Authority;
5.20 not directly or indirectly engage in or facilitate any action that is illegal or that, in the reasonable opinion of NayaPay and whether or not addressed elsewhere in the Agreed Terms, damages or may damage the goodwill or reputation of NayaPay and, upon the request of NayaPay, promptly cease engaging in or facilitating any such action; and
5.21 in respect of any dispute arising out of the NayaPay System or Transactions, follow the Manual and shall not take any action seeking to interfere with the processes of the NayaPay System.
6. RESERVE AND SECURITY
6.1  NayaPay may require a Merchant to provide Security  for the purpose of securing the Merchant’s obligations under the Agreed Terms and for providing a source of funds to pay NayaPay for any and all, actual and reasonably anticipated claims, losses, cost, penalties and expenses.
6.2  If NayaPay elects that the relevant Security shall include the establishment of a Reserve of a sum determined by NayaPay (in its sole discretion), then NayaPay shall be entitled to: (i) not credit the equivalent portion of the Merchant Payable Balance in the Merchant Account; and/or (ii) prevent the Merchant from withdrawing the equivalent sum from the Merchant E-Money Account (if applicable). Alternatively, at NayaPay' sole discretion, NayaPay may elect for the Security to be a bank guarantee in which case the Merchant shall, upon request, procure a bank guarantee in favour of NayaPay by a reputable bank and in a form acceptable to NayaPay and in an amount determined by NayaPay. The Security shall remain in place regardless of any termination of the Agreed Terms for as long as there are residual or contingent liabilities of the Merchant to NayaPay. The amount of the Reserve (either expressed as an absolute amount or as a percentage of past payments into the Merchant Account) shall be determined by NayaPay from time to time in its sole discretion. Where a Reserve has not been established at the commencement date of the Agreed Terms, NayaPay shall notify the Merchant of the imposition of a Reserve, its method of calculation, its amount as well as any increase or reduction of the Reserve without undue delay in writing at any time during the term of the Agreed Terms.
6.3 Without restricting NayaPay’ discretion under clauses 6.1 and 6.2, NayaPay may take into account, amongst others, the following factors when determining the amount to be secured in a Reserve:
6.3.1 the risk of the Merchant ceasing or transferring its business or a substantial part thereof;
6.3.2   the risk of the Merchant materially altering the nature of its business;
6.3.3   if the Merchant’s business activities carry a higher than normal risk of payment reversals/chargebacks or other reversals of customer payments;
6.3.4   the Merchant’s overall financial standing;
6.3.5   the risk of the Merchant becoming insolvent or otherwise unable to pay debts as they fall due;
6.3.6   where NayaPay receives a disproportionate number of customer complaints, chargebacks or other payment reversals, fines, penalties or other liability related to the Merchant Account; or
6.3.7   where NayaPay reasonably believes that the Merchant will not be able to perform its obligations under these Agreed Terms.
6.4  The Merchant agrees to provide NayaPay, upon reasonable request and at the Merchant’s expense, with information about its financial and operational status, including but not limited to the most recent financial statements and management accounts. The Merchant shall also undertake, at its own expense, any further action (including executing any necessary documents and registering any form of document) necessary to establish such Security as is reasonably required by NayaPay.
6.5  NayaPay shall have the right, at any time, without notice to offset any claims, costs, charges, penalties and expenses from any Security, Reserve, Merchant Payable Balance, or the Merchant E-Money Account (if applicable). In addition, the Merchant shall pay such amounts as NayaPay notifies it into the Reserve to replenish any deducted amount. If required by NayaPay, the Merchant shall pay such amounts into its Merchant E-Money Account (if applicable) as reasonably determined by NayaPay to fund a Reserve or to react to any increased risk of payment reversals that are not covered by the Merchant E-Money Account’s then balance or the Merchant Payable Balance.
7. WARRANTIES
Each party warrants and represents to the other party that:
7.1  unless the party is a natural person, it is validly incorporated and/or existing and in good standing under the laws of Pakistan;
7.2  it has the power, licenses, and authority to own its property and assets and to transact the business in which it is engaged;
7.3  it is not in bankruptcy or liquidation nor to its knowledge is threatened with the same; and
7.4  it has complete power and authority to enter into and deliver the Agreed Terms.
8. ADDITIONAL MERCHANT WARRANTIES
8.1. it has the requisite resource and skills to deliver its obligations under these Agreed Terms;
8.2. the manufacture, sale, and distribution of the Merchant Products/Services comply with Applicable Law and the Merchant has all requisite licenses, approvals, and permits for the same;
8.3. the Merchant has full right, title, and interest in the Intellectual Property which it will license to NayaPay hereunder for the purpose of NayaPay Services and there is no pending third-party infringement claim in respect of the same.
9. MERCHANT DISCOUNT RATE
9.1  The MDR payable by the Merchant for the NayaPay Services will be as set out in Account Opening Form.
9.2  The MDR is quoted exclusive of value added tax. In case value added tax or any other sales tax is or become chargeable, NayaPay will add such tax to the amount payable but shall, where required, provide information on the net amount, the amount of tax and the tax rate applied.
9.3  The MDR is subject to change pursuant to clause 10.
9.4  Where NayaPay is unable to otherwise recover the MDR, NayaPay shall issue an invoice for the amount owed. Invoices are payable within fifteen (15) days of the date of the invoice. In case of overdue payments, NayaPay reserves the right to (i) charge late payment charges in the amount of KIBOR plus 2% for overdue days; and/or (ii) terminate the Agreed Terms with immediate effect by giving written notice to the Merchant in accordance with Clause 17.
10. CHANGE OF TERMS AND CONDITIONS
These Agreed Terms are subject to change from time to time. Unless otherwise agreed, changes may be made by notice from NayaPay to the Merchant under the following procedure:
10.1. NayaPay shall give the Merchant notice of any proposed change to the Agreed Terms (a
“Change Notice”
).
10.2. A Change Notice may be given to the Merchant in accordance with clause 17.
10.3. The proposed change shall come into effect automatically two (2) weeks after the date of receipt of the Change Notice unless the Merchant gives written notice to NayaPay that it objects to the proposed changes within such time frame as may be stipulated in the Change Notice(
“Objection Notice”
).
10.4. NayaPay may stipulate in a Change Notice a different time period for the coming into effect of any change.
10.5. If no Objection Notice is received by NayaPay within the stipulated time frame, the Merchant is deemed to have accepted the change.
10.6. The Merchant has the right to terminate the Agreed Terms with immediate effect at any time and without charge after receiving a Change Notice and before any change stipulated in the Change Notice becomes effective.
10.7. If the  parties are unable to resolve and address, through mutual agreement, the Merchant’s objections as communicated vide the Objection Notice, and without prejudice to  clause 10.6, a Merchant’s Objection Notice shall be deemed to constitute a notice to terminate these Agreed Terms with the termination effective immediately before the date on which the proposed change would otherwise come into effect under clause 10.3.
11. TAXES
It is the Merchant’s responsibility to determine which, if any, taxes apply to the payments received, and to report and remit the correct tax to the relevant Competent Authority, subject to Applicable Law. NayaPay is not obligated to determine whether taxes apply, and is not responsible to collect, report, or remit any taxes arising from any Transaction.
12. INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY
12.1. For the duration and strictly for the purpose of the Agreed Terms and the NayaPay Services, the Merchant grants to NayaPay a non-exclusive, worldwide, royalty-free, non-transferable licence to copy, use and display its logo, trademark, trade name, and other Intellectual Property owned by it.
12.2. Nothing in the Agreed Terms shall grant or be deemed to grant to the Merchant any right, title or interest in any logos, trademarks, trade names or other Intellectual Property of NayaPay other than as permitted for the purpose of marketing in compliance with the Manual and the Policies.
12.3. The Merchant may not use the license granted to it in terms of Clause 12.2 above for any purpose other than as provided in the Agreed Terms and subject to the Policies pertaining to use of NayaPay’s Intellectual Property.
12.4. Upon termination of the Agreed Terms, all licenses granted by any party to the other shall immediately terminate without notice required, and each party shall return the other party’s Intellectual Property and all copies or derivative works made thereof, to the extent specifically permitted hereunder. Each party shall have no further rights or licenses to use the party’s Intellectual Property or any such copies or derivative works, except as specifically agreed between the parties in writing.
13. LIMITATION OF LIABILITY & INDEMNITY
13.1. Neither party shall be liable in contract, tort (including negligence or breach of statutory duty) or otherwise for any indirect or consequential loss or damage of any kind including punitive or exemplary damages or for any loss of profit or loss of contract, loss of goodwill or reputation, loss of opportunity, loss of revenue or third party loss whether foreseeable or otherwise.
13.2. Subject to clauses 13.3, 13.4 and 13.5 and any other clause explicitly excluding the effect of this clause, the aggregate liability of NayaPay in contract, tort, negligence or otherwise arising out of or in connection with the Agreed Terms (including any indemnities provided thereunder) in any period of 12 months from the commencement date or any anniversary thereof (each a
“Contract Year”
) shall be limited to the lower of (i) PKR 10,000 or (ii) the total amount of fees received by NayaPay from the Merchant in the previous Contract Year (or, in the first Contract Year, the fees received to date).
13.3. NayaPay shall not be liable for any of the following:
13.3.1. acts or omissions of or any fees charged by third parties, such as Banking Companies, who participate in the NayaPay System and/or otherwise provide facilities or services, as agents or service providers, in relation to the NayaPay Platform and NayaPay Services;
13.3.2. any actions taken by NayaPay for the performance of the NayaPay Services in reliance of any information received from third parties, such as Banking Companies (regardless of whether such transmission was a result of a System Breach);
13.3.3. any dispute arising from the suspension or refusal to process Transactions which NayaPay reasonably believes to be made fraudulently or without proper authorisation; or
13.3.4. unavailability of the NayaPay Services due to hardware, software or internet connection not functioning properly or System Breach.
13.3.5. unforeseen circumstances preventing the proper performance, despite any reasonable precautions taken by NayaPay. Such circumstances may include but are not limited to acts of God, power outages, fire, flood, theft, equipment breakdowns, hacking attacks, internal mechanical or systems failures as well as downtimes of the NayaPay Platform; and
13.3.6. issues relating to the delivery, quality, quantity or use of the Merchant Products/Services.
13.4 Without prejudice to any other remedy available to NayaPay under these Agreed Terms or under Applicable Laws, the Merchant shall keep indemnified, defend, and hold harmless NayaPay from any actual or threatened claim, demand, obligation, loss, cost, liability and/or expense (including, without limitation, actual attorneys’ fees, costs of investigation, and disbursements) (
“Losses”
) resulting from and/or arising in connection with:
13.4.1. any breach by the Merchant of: (i) any covenant, undertaking, representation, warranty, or other provision of these Agreed Terms; or (ii) its obligations under Applicable Laws;
13.4.2. actual or potential System Breach of the Merchant;
13.4.3. any third-party claims against NayaPay in respect of suspension, failure, or other form of cessation of the Merchants operations;
13.4.4. any claims of infringement in respect of the Intellectual Property of the Merchant; and
13.4.5. the Merchant Products/Services.
14. CONFIDENTIALITY & DATA PROTECTION
14.1 For the purposes of this clause 14, the following terms will have the definitions set forth below:
(1)
“Proprietary Information”
means Confidential Business Information and NayaPay Data.
(2)
“Confidential Business Information”
means: (i) any valuable, secret business information that is designated or identified as confidential at the time of the disclosure or is by its nature clearly recognizable as confidential information to a reasonably prudent person with knowledge of the Disclosing Party’s business and industry; and (ii) for the purposes hereof, shall include the Agreed Terms.
(3)
“Disclosing Party”
means the Party disclosing any Proprietary Information hereunder, whether such disclosure is directly from or through the Disclosing Party’s personnel or through any other automated means.
(4)
“Receiving Party”
means the Party receiving any Proprietary Information hereunder, whether such disclosure is received directly from or through the Receiving Party’s personnel or through other automated means.
(5)
“NayaPay Data”
means all data and information relating to Customers, Merchants, and Transactions which includes Transaction Data.
14.2 Notwithstanding the definition of Proprietary Information in clause 14.1 above, Proprietary Information does not include any information that:
(a) was in the Receiving Party’s possession before disclosed to it by the Disclosing Party without a duty of confidentiality on the Receiving Party;
(b) is or becomes a matter of public knowledge through no fault of the Receiving Party;
(c) is rightfully received by the Receiving Party from a third party without a duty of confidentiality;
(d) is independently developed by the Receiving Party without use of or reference to the Disclosing Party’s Proprietary Information; or
(e) is disclosed by the Receiving Party with the Disclosing Party’s prior written approval.
14.3 In the performance of the Agreed Terms, each Party may disclose to the other Party certain Proprietary Information.
14.4 The Receiving Party acknowledges and agrees that except to the extent otherwise expressly provided herein, the Proprietary Information of the Disclosing Party will remain the sole and exclusive property of the Disclosing Party or a third party providing such information to the Disclosing Party, and the disclosure of such information to the Receiving Party does not confer upon it any license, interest, or right of any kind in or to the Proprietary Information, except as provided under the Agreed Terms.
14.5    At all times and notwithstanding any termination of the Agreed Terms, the Receiving Party agrees that it will:
(a) hold in strict confidence and not disclose to any third party the Proprietary Information of the Disclosing Party, except as approved in writing by the Disclosing Party;
(b) only permit access to the Proprietary Information of the Disclosing Party to those of its personnel who have a need to know and have signed confidentiality agreements or are otherwise bound by confidentiality obligations substantially similar to those contained in the Agreed Terms;
(c) be responsible to the Disclosing Party for any third party’s use and disclosure of the Proprietary Information provided to such third party by the Receiving Party
(d) only use the Proprietary Information that is receives to carry out the purposes of this Agreed Terms and for no other purpose whatsoever; and
(e) use at least the same degree of care it would use to protect its own Proprietary Information of like importance, but in no event less than a reasonable degree of care, including maintaining information security standards for such Proprietary Information as are commercially reasonable and customary for the type of information.
14.6    Notwithstanding clause 14.5, a Party may disclose the Proprietary Information in the following events:
(a) if required by Applicable Laws;
(b) if required by an order of a Competent Authority; or
(c) if required to its professional advisors (including attorneys, lawyers, and accountants) and/or consultants and/or agents, subject to appropriate confidentiality obligations.
14.7 If the Receiving Party is required to disclose Proprietary Information pursuant to clause 14.6 (a) or (b), it shall, to the extent legally permissible, provide written notice of such required disclosure to the Disclosing Party prior to making such disclosure.
14.8 Each Party to the Agreed Terms will immediately notify the other Parties in writing about discovery of any loss or unauthorized disclosure of the Proprietary Information of the other Party.
14.9 The Receiving Party will not reproduce the Disclosing Party’s Proprietary Information in any form, except as reasonably necessary to fulfil such Party’s duties and obligations and otherwise comply with the agreements of such Party under the Agreed Terms. Any reproduction of any Proprietary Information by the Receiving Party will remain the property of the Disclosing Party and will contain any and all confidential or proprietary notices or legends that appear on the original, unless otherwise authorized in writing by the Disclosing Party.
14.10    Except as otherwise set forth in the Agreed Terms, upon the termination of the Agreed Terms, each Receiving Party will either upon written instruction from the other Party, promptly return to the Disclosing Party all documents and other tangible (including electronic) materials containing the Disclosing Party’s Proprietary Information, including all copies thereof in its possession or control, or erase or destroy all such materials.
14.11    The Merchant shall comply with all data protection and security obligations in respect of the NayaPay Data as specified in the Manual and the Policies.
15. TERMINATION
15.1. Without prejudice to termination rights under the Terms of Use in respect of the Merchant E-Money Account (if applicable), NayaPay may terminate these Agreed Terms immediately by written notice:
15.1.1. if the Merchant files a petition for bankruptcy, becomes insolvent, or makes any arrangement or composition with or assignment for the benefit of its creditors, or a receiver is appointed for the Merchant or its business, or the Merchant goes into liquidation either voluntarily (otherwise than for reconstruction or amalgamation) or compulsorily;
15.1.2. upon the occurrence of a material breach of these Agreed Terms by the Merchant;
15.1.3. if the Merchant violates or fails to comply with Applicable Law or any order by a Competent Authority;
15.1.4. if the Merchant: (i) directly or indirectly engages in or facilitates any action or activity that is illegal, or that, in the reasonable opinion of NayaPay, and whether or not addressed elsewhere in these Agreed Terms, has damaged or threatens to damage the goodwill or reputation of NayaPay; or (ii) makes or continues an association with a person or entity which association, in the good faith opinion of NayaPay, has damaged or threatens to damage the goodwill or reputation of NayaPay; or
15.2. NayaPay may terminate these Agreed Terms at any time without reason by giving fifteen (15) days’ notice.
16. RELATIONSHIP OF THE PARTIES
Nothing contained in the Agreed Terms will be construed to create a partnership, joint venture or agency relationship between the Merchant NayaPay. Neither party has authority to enter into agreements of any kind on behalf of the other.
17. NOTICES
Any notice or communication to be given under the Agreed Terms must be given in writing and delivered either: (i) by hand, first class prepaid post or other recognised courier service to the current or last known address of the Merchant as registered with the NayaPay Merchant Portal;(ii) by email to any of the emails registered on the NayaPay Merchant Portal; or (iii) by notification on the NayaPay Merchant Portal. Any communication sent by hand shall be deemed received on delivery, and if sent by first class post or other courier service, shall be deemed received within two (2) Business Days of the communication being posted or couriered. Any communication sent by in-app notification will be deemed received by the Merchant on the same day if it is delivered to the Merchant’s in-app notification area on the NayaPay Merchant Portal. Any communication sent by email is deemed to be received as recorded on our servers or the servers of any service provider we engage for such communication services.
18. WAIVER
Any waiver of a right under these Agreed Terms shall only be effective if agreed or declared in writing. A delay in exercising a right or the non-exercise of a right shall not be deemed a waiver and shall not prevent a party from exercising that right in the future.
19. SEVERABILITY
If any part of these Agreed Terms is found by a court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, unlawful or unenforceable then such part shall be severed from the remainder of the Agreement, which shall continue to be valid and enforceable to the fullest extent permitted by law.
20. ENTIRE AGREEMENT
The Agreed Terms represents the entire agreement of the parties in relation to its subject matter. Each party acknowledges that it has entered into the Agreed Terms in reliance only on the representations, warranties, promises and terms contained in the Agreed Terms and, save as expressly set out in the Agreed Terms, neither party shall have any liability in respect of any other representation, warranty or promise made prior to the date of the Agreed Terms unless it was made fraudulently.
21. GOVERNING LAW & JURISDICTION
21.1 These Agreed Terms and any legal relationship between the parties arising out of or in connection with it shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of Islamic Republic of Pakistan.
21.2 Each party hereby irrevocably submits to the exclusive jurisdiction of the Courts in Karachi.
1. تعریفیں اور تشریحات
1.1۔ درج ذیل اصلاحات،جب انہیں ان نیاپے مروجہ شرائط و ضوابط برائے مرچنٹ میں استعمال کیا گیاہے یا کسی دستاویز میں ان کا حوالہ دیا گیا ہو، ان کے معنی درج ذیل ہوں گے۔
الف) ”قبولیت کی اطلاع“ کا مطلب ضابطہ عمل کے مطابق مرچنٹ کے ساتھ نیا پے کے ذریعہ کیے گئے لین دین کی کامیاب تکمیل کی اطلاع۔
ب) شق 2 میں ”متفقہ شرائط“ کی تعریف دی گئی ہے۔
ج)”اے ایم ایل کے وائی سی ضوابط“کا مطلب ہے ”اینٹی منی لانڈرنگ“ اور ”اپنے صارف سے واقفیت“اور”دہشت گردی کی مالی اعانت کا مقابلہ کرنا“کے تقاضوں کے سلسلے میں قابل اطلاق قانون، جو متعلقہ معاملے پر قابلِ اطلاق اور کسی متعلقہ شخص پر لاگو ہوں (بشمول نیا پے اور مرچنٹ)، بشمول لیکن اسی تک محدود نہیں اینٹی منی لانڈرنگ ایکٹ 2010، (یہاں جاری کردہ قوانین / قواعد و ضوابط کے ہمراہ) انسداد دہشت گردی ایکٹ، 1997 (یہاں جاری کردہ قواعد و ضوابط کے ہمراہ)،اور اسٹیٹ بینک آف پاکستان کی طرف سے جاری کردہ قوانین، ضوابط اور ہدایات۔
د) ”قابل اطلاق قانون“ کا مطلب ہے کوئی قانون، قانون سازی، مخصوص قانون، آرڈیننس، ضابطہ، آرڈر، فرمان، ہدایت، فیصلہ، فیصلہ، حکم امتناع، لائسنس، اجازت، کسی مجاز اتھارٹی کی منظوری، قاعدہ، ضابطہ، اور اس کی عدالتی تشریح، اور مذکورہ بالا میں سے کسی کے بارے میں کوئی تشریح یاتعین، کسی قابل مجاز اتھارٹی کے ذریعہ،جسے معاملے پر دائرہ اختیار ہے اور کسی متعلقہ شخص پرلاگو ہے، (بشمول نیا پے اور مرچنٹ)،بشمول لیکن اسی تک محدود نہیں، ادائیگی کے نظام اور الیکٹرانک فنڈ ٹرانسفر ایکٹ2007 ،EMIضوابط، الیکٹرانک ٹرانزیکشن آرڈیننس، 2002، اورپریوینشن آف الیکٹرانک کرائم ایکٹ، 2016 شامل ہیں۔
ہ)”بینکنگ کمپنی (کمپنیز)“ کا مطلب ہے کہ بینکنگ کمپنیز آرڈیننس، 1962 کے تحت پاکستان میں بینکنگ کے کاروبار کو چلانے کے مقصد کے لئے لائسنس یافتہ کمپنی۔
و)”بزنس ڈے“ کا مطلب ایک ایسا دن ہے جس دن پاکستان میں بینکنگ کمپنیاں عام بینکنگ کاروبار کے لیے کھلی ہوئی ہوں۔
ز) ”مجاز اتھارٹی“کا مطلب ہے کوئی بھی قومی، اعلیٰ سطحی، علاقائی یا مقامی حکومت یا حکومتی، انتظامی، مالی، عدالتی، یا حکومت کی ملکیتی باڈی، محکمہ، کمیشن، اتھارٹی، ٹریبونل، ایجنسی یا ادارہ، یا مرکزی بینک (یا حکومت کی ملکیت یا غیر ملکیت، غیر تشکیل شدہ یاباعنوان،کوئی بھی ایسا شخص، جو کسی مرکزی بینک کے فرائض پر عمل پیرا ہے) یا کسی بھی نوعیت کا کوئی منظورشدہ ادارہ یافردہے جو ایگزیکٹیو، قانون سازی، عدالتی، ریگولیٹری یا انتظامی فرائض پر عمل کرتاہے۔
ح)”کسٹمر“سے مراد وہ صارف ہے جو نیا پے کے ساتھ الیکٹرانک منی اکاؤنٹ کھولتا ہے اور برقرار رکھتا ہے اور نیا پے پلیٹ فارم پر رجسٹرڈ ہے۔
ط)”ای ایم آئی ریگولیشنز“کا مطلب ہے ایس بی پی کی طرف سے پیمنٹ سسٹمز اینڈ الیکٹرانک فنڈز ٹرانسفر ایکٹ2007کی پیروی میں جاری کردہ  الیکٹرانک منی انسٹیٹیوشن کے ضوابط، جن میں وقتاً فوقتاً ترمیم کی جاسکتی ہے۔
ی)” املاکِ دانش“ کا مطلب اور اس میں کسی بھی نوعیت اور قسم کی کوئی بھی اور تمام املاک ِ دانش، بغیر کسی حدکے،شامل ہیں مثلاً پیٹنٹس،رجسٹرڈ ڈیزائنز، لوگوز، ٹریڈ مارکس اور سروس مارکس(خواہ رجسٹرڈ ہوں یا نہ ہوں)، ان فیئر کمپیٹیشن رائٹس کی نوعیت میں رائٹس، کاپی رائٹس، ڈیٹا بیس رائٹس، ڈیزائن رائٹس اور اسی طرح کے تمام پراپرٹی رائٹس(خواہ وہ مادی ہوں یا غیر مادی)۔
ک) ”مینول“ کا مطلب ہے نیا پے کی طرف سے جاری کردہ نیاپے سروسز کی فراہمی پر لاگو ٹیکنیکل مینول، جس میں وقتا فوقتا ترمیم کی جاتی ہے اور جونیا پے مرچنٹ پورٹل پر قابلِ رسائی ہے۔
ل) ”مرچنٹ“سے مراد وہ شخص ہے جو صارفین کو سامان اور / یا خدمات کی فراہمی کے کاروبارسے وابستہ ہے اور جس نے نیا پے خدمات کے لئے معاہدہ کی طے شدہ شرائط کو قبول کیا ہے۔
م) ”MDR“ کا مطلب وہ چارجز ہیں جو کامیاب ٹر انزیکشنز کے حوالے سے مرچنٹ کی طرف سے نیاپے کو قابلِ ادائیگی ہوں گے۔
ن) ”مرچنٹ اکاؤنٹ“ کا مطلب مرچنٹ ای منی اکاؤنٹ یا مرچنٹ بینک اکاؤنٹ، یا حسب موقع دونوں ہوسکتاہے۔
س) ”مرچنٹ بینک اکاؤنٹ“ کا مطلب ہے کسی مرچنٹ کی طرف سے کسی بینکنگ کمپنی میں کھولا اور برقراررکھاگیا اکاؤنٹ (اکاؤنٹس)جو نیا پے مرچنٹ پورٹل پررجسٹرڈ ہے۔
ع)”مرچنٹ ای منی اکاؤنٹ“ کا مطلب ہے، جہاں قابل اطلاق ہوتا ہو، مرچنٹ کی طرف سے نیا پے کے پاس استعمال کی شرائط کے مطابق اور مشروط کھولا اور برقرار رکھا گیاالیکٹرانک منی اکاؤنٹ ہے جو نیا پے مرچنٹ پورٹل پررجسٹرڈ ہے۔
ف)”مرچنٹ پارٹیسپیشن ایگریمنٹ“کا مطلب وہ معاہدہ ہے جو نیاپے پلیٹ فارم میں شمولیت اور رجسٹریشن کے لیے نیاپے اور مرچنٹ کے مابین ہوا ہو۔
ص) ”مرچنٹ پروڈکٹ / سروس“ کا مطلب ہے کسی مرچنٹ کی طرف سے پیش کردہ کوئی سامان اور/ یا خدمت اور جس کا آرڈر دیا گیا ہو، خریداری کی گئی ہو، لیز پر لیا گیا ہویا جسے کسی اور طرح صارف کونیاپے کی سروسز استعمال کرتے ہوئے فراہم کیا گیا ہو۔
ق) ”مرچنٹ ٹی اینڈ سیز“ کا مطلب ہے نیاپے مروجہ شرائط و ضوابط برائے مرچنٹ۔
ر) ”مرچنٹ ویب سائٹ / ایپلیکیشن“کا مطلب ہے آفیشیل ویب سائٹ اور / یا مرچنٹ پروڈکٹ/سروس کی فراہمی کے لیے مرچنٹ کی طرف سے یا اس کے لیے مینٹین اور آپریٹ کی جانے والی موبائل ایپلیکیشن۔
ش) ”مرچنٹ پے ایبل بیلنس“ کی شق 4.1 میں تعریف کی گئی ہے۔
ت) ”نیاپے“ کا مطلب نیا پے (پرائیویٹ) لمیٹڈ ہے، جس کا رجسٹرڈ آفس 10واں فلور، لیکسن بلڈنگ نمبر3، سرور شہید روڈ، کراچی 74200-، پاکستان میں واقع ہے۔
ث) ”نیا پے مرچنٹ پورٹل“ کا مطلب ہے نیا پے کی طرف سے تاجروں کو نیا پے سروسز تک رسائی فراہم کرنے کے لئے آپریٹ کیا جانے والاویب پورٹل(جس میں وقتاً فوقتاً ترمیم کی جاتی ہے) ہے، جو فی الحالhttps://merchant.nayapay.comپر قابل رسائی ہے، ماسوائے کسی بیرونی ویب سائٹ کے جس کی طرف ویب سائٹ ہائپر لنک کے ذریعہ یا کسی اور طرح ویب سائٹ اشارہ کرتی ہے۔
ث)”نیا پے پلیٹ فارم“کا مطلب وہ الیکٹرانک پلیٹ فارم ہے، چاہے اس تک کسی موبائل ایپلیکیشن، ویب پورٹل یا کسی اور ذریعہ سے رسائی حاصل ہو، جو کسٹمرز کے الیکٹرانک منی اکاؤنٹس کھولنے اور الیکٹرانک پیمنٹ اور دیگر خدمات کی فراہمی، بشمول لیکن محدود نہیں، الیکٹرانک منی ڈپازٹ اور ریڈیمپشن اور فنڈٹرانسفرز (صارف سے کاروبار (C2B)، کاروبار سے صارف (B2C)، کاروبار سے کاروبار (B2B)، فرد سے فرد (P2P)، حکومت سے فرد (G2P)، فرد سے حکومت (P2G) وغیرہ کے مابین) کے لیے نیا پے کی طرف سے تیارکیا گیا ہے اورآپریٹ کیا جاتا ہے۔
خ)”نیا پے سروسز“ کا مطلب ہے مرچنٹ کو الیکٹرانک ادائیگیوں کے حصول اور سہولت فراہم کرنا، جیسا کہ شق 4 میں مزید بیان کیا گیا ہے، بشمول، لیکن ان تک محدود نہیں ہے: (i) مرچنٹ ویب سائٹ / ایپلی کیشن پر الیکٹرانک ادائیگی کے گیٹ وے کی فراہمی۔ (ii) نیا پے پلیٹ فارم پر ایپ میں ادائیگیاں؛ اور (iii) مرچنٹ کے مقام پر پوائنٹ آف سیل ٹرانزیکشنزاور(iv)کوئی دیگر ایسی خدمات جن پر نیا پے اور مرچنٹ کے درمیان اتفاق ہوا ہو۔
ذ)”نیا پے سسٹم“ کا مطلب ہے نیا پے کی طرف سے سافٹ ویئر، فارمولوں، الگورتھم، APIs، ہارڈ ویئر، سرورز، نیٹ ورکس، گرڈ یا اس طرح کے دوسرے سسٹم، اثاثہ جات یا سہولیات پر مشتمل الیکٹرانک پیمنٹ سروسز کی فراہمی کے لیے قائم کردہ انفرااسٹرکچر(بنیادی ڈھانچہ)۔
(الف الف)”پرسن“ کا مطلب کوئی ایک فرد،ایک کاروباری ادارہ،ایک ایسوسی ایشن، ایک پارٹنرشپ، ایک ٹرسٹ یا کوئی اور ادارہ یا تنظیم ہے۔
ب ب)”پالیسیاں“ کا مطلب ہے نیا پے کی پالیسیاں، جن کی وقتا ًفوقتاً AML / KYC، ڈیٹا پروٹیکشن، انفارمیشن سیکیورٹی، اور انٹلیکچوئل پراپرٹی کے استعمال کے سلسلے میں تجدید کی جاتی ہے، جن تکhttp://www.nayapay.com پررسائی حاصل کی جاسکتی ہے۔
ج ج)”ریزرو“ سے مراد وہ رقم ہے جو نیا پے (اپنے واحد صوابدید میں) تاجر کے خلاف نیا پے یا نیا پے صارفین کے کسی دعوے کے تحفظ کے مقصد کے لیے شق 6 کے مطابق طے کرتا ہے۔
دد) ”SBP“ سے مراد اسٹیٹ بینک آف پاکستان ہے۔
ہ ہ)”سیکیورٹی“کا مطلب ہے کسی بھی قسم کی سیکیورٹی (ضمانت) ہے جو نیا پے (نیاپے کی واحد صوابدید میں)کی طرف سے مرچنٹ سے منظور شدہ شرائط کے تحت مرچنٹ کی ذمہ داریوں کی  انجام دہی کے لئے طلب کی گئی ہو، اور اس میں ریزرو، بینک گارنٹی یانیاپے کی طرف سے مطلوب اس طرح کی کوئی دوسری سکیورٹی شامل ہو گی۔
وو)”سسٹم میں رخنہ اندازی“ کا مطلب بشمول دیگر امور،سافٹ ویئر، ہارڈ ویئر، سرورز، نیٹ ورکس، گرڈ یا اس طرح کے دوسرے سسٹمز، اثاثوں، یا سہولیات تک کسی بھی طرح کی غیر مجاز رسائی، راستے میں روک لینے، مداخلت کی وجہ سے کسی ادارے کے مالیاتی انفرااسٹرکچر اور/یا انفارمیشن سسٹم میں کوئی نقب زنی، تعطل یا کنٹرول کاچھن جانا ہے۔
زز) ”استعمال کی شرائط“کا مطلب ہے www.nayapay.omپر دستیاب شرائط و ضوابط، جن میں ضوابط کے مطابق وقتا ًفوقتا ً ترمیم کی جاتی ہے، اورجو بشمول دیگر، تاجروں کے ای منی اکاؤنٹ (جہاں تک قابل اطلاق ہو) کے استعمال پر لاگو ہیں۔
ح ح)”ٹرانزیکشن“ کا مطلب ہے کسی کسٹمر کی طرف سے کسی مرچنٹ پروڈکٹ / سروس کے لیے نیا پے سروس کا ایک مرتبہ استعمال۔
ط ط)”ٹرانزیکشن ڈیٹا“کا مطلب ہے کوئی بھی ایسا ڈیٹا جس کا مرچنٹ اورنیا پے نے باہمی لین دین کو عمل میں لانے کے لئے تبادلہ کیا ہو اور اس کے ریکارڈز۔
1.2۔ عنوانات صرف سہولت کے لئے ہیں اور مرچنٹ سے متعلق ان شرائط وضوابط کی تشکیل یا تعبیر پر کوئی اثرمرتب نہیں کریں گے۔
1.3۔ جب تک کہ اس کے برعکس ارادہ ظاہر نہ ہوجائے، واحد کے الفاظ میں جمع اور اس کے برعکس شامل ہیں۔ مذکر صنف ظاہر کرنے والے الفاظ میں نسوانی اور بے جنس اور اس کے برعکس شامل ہیں۔
1.4۔”شامل شدہ“،”بشمول“،”خاص طور پر“ یا اس سے ملتے جلتے کوئی بھی اظہارصرف بطوروضاحت سمجھے جائیں گے اور اس اصطلاح سے پہلے والے الفاظ کے مفہوم کو محدود نہیں کریں گے۔
2۔دائرہ کار
نیا پے خدمات اورمرچنٹ ای منی اکاؤنٹ کی فراہمی مرچنٹ شرائط وضوابط،جیسا کہ ان میں مرچنٹ شراکتی معاہدہ کے ذریعے اضافہ یا ترمیم کی جاتی ہے، مینویل، استعمال کی شرائط (اگر قابل اطلاق ہوں) اور پالیسیوں (”متفقہ شرائط“) کے تابع ہیں۔
3۔ میعاد
متفقہ شرائط اس وقت تک پوری طاقت اور اثر کے ساتھ جاری رہیں گی جب تک کہ درج ذیل شرائط کے مطابق ختم نہ کردی جائیں۔
4۔ مرچنٹ کی رجسٹریشن اور خدمات پر عمل درآمد
4.1۔ نیا پے خدمات حاصل کرنے اور / یا مرچنٹ ای منی اکاؤنٹ کھولنے کے لیے، آپ کو مرچنٹ شراکتی معاہدے پر عمل درآمد کرنے کے علاوہ پہلے نیا پیے مرچنٹ پورٹل پر اندراج کرانا ہوگا۔ رجسٹریشن کے عمل کے ایک حصے کے طور پر، ہم آپ سے نیاپے آئی ڈی بنانے کے لئے کہیں گے (مثال کے طور پر ab@nayapay)۔یہ آئی ڈی آپ کو نیا پے مرچنٹ کے طور پر شناخت کرانے کے لیے استعمال کی جائے گی۔ نیا پے ہمیشہ نیا پے آئی ڈی کے مکمل حقوق کا حامل ہوگا۔ نیا پے کو جیسے اور جب بھی ضرورت ہو اور پیشگی اطلاع دیئے بغیر، نیا پے کو اختیار ہوگا کہ وہ نیا پے آئی ڈی کوواپس لے لے اور آپ کو اسے تبدیل کرنے کا کہے۔ نیا پے تبدیلی کے طریقہ کار کے ایک حصے کے طور پر آپ کو متبادل نیا پے آئی ڈی منتخب کرنے کا ایک آپشن فراہم کرے گا۔ رجسٹریشن کے عمل کے ایک حصے کے طور پر، آپ کو معاہدہ کی شرائط کو بھی قبول کرنے کی ضرورت ہوگی اور آپ کو ایسی دستاویزات اور معلومات فراہم کرنی ہوں گی جو نیا پے آن بورڈنگ پروسیسز اور قابل اطلاق قانون (خاص طور پرAML KYCضوابط) کی تعمیل کے لیے درکار ہوں گی۔
4.2۔ نیا پے سروسز تاجر کو ادائیگی کرنے کے لئے کسی کسٹمر کو نیا پے پلیٹ فارم کے استعمال میں آسانی فراہم کرتی ہے۔ اسے لین دین کے سلسلے میں جس کے لئے قبولیت کی اطلاع جاری کردی گئی ہے، ایم ڈی آرکی کٹوتی کے بعدکسٹمرز سے وصول کردہ اور نیا پے کے پاس رکھے گئے فنڈز(”مرچنٹ کا قابل ادائیگی بیلنس“) مرچنٹ شراکتی معاہدے میں متفقہ تسلسل کے مطابق مرچنٹ اکاؤنٹ میں جمع کردیے جائیں گے۔
4.3۔ مرچنٹ باخبر ہے کہ مرچنٹ اکاؤنٹ میں جمع کرنا کلیئر فنڈز کی وصولی کے برابر نہیں ہے۔کسی بھی ادائیگی کو واپس لوٹانے (”رقم واپس لوٹانا“) کی صورت میں پوری رقم کی اور اور اس میں سے کٹوتی کیے جانے والے کسی ایم ڈی آر کی نیاپے کی طرف ذمہ داری مرچنٹ کی ہے۔چارج بیک / ادائیگی کی واپسی کی صورت میں، نیا پے، مینویل کے مطابق،واپسی رقم اور کوئی قابل اطلاق تھرڈ پارٹی چارج بیک یاریورسل فیس مرچنٹ کے قابل ادائیگی بیلنس سے اور / یا مرچنٹ ای منی اکاؤنٹ (اگر قابل اطلاق ہو)ڈیبٹ کرکے وصول کی جائے گی۔
اگر نیا پے رقم واپسی اور قابل اطلاق تھرڈ پارٹی چارج بیک یا ریورسل فیس مرچنٹ کے قابلِ ادائیگی بیلنس اور / یا مرچنٹ ای منی اکاؤنٹ (اگر قابل اطلاق ہو) سے مکمل طور پربازیافت کرنے سے قاصرہو تو، مرچنٹ کو مناسب فنڈز مرچنٹ ای منی اکاؤنٹ میں جمع کرانے پڑیں گے۔ اس میں ناکام ہونا ان متفقہ شرائط کی خلاف ورزی ہوگی۔ نیا پے کے پاس قابل اطلاق قانون کی اجازت کے تحت کسی بھی وقت، یاددہانی کے پیغامات بھیجنے یا قرضوں کے وصولی کے اقدامات کرنے کا حق محفوظ ہے۔ نیا پے مرچنٹ سے کسی بھی قرض کی وصولی یا عمل درآمد کی کوششوں کے سلسلے میں ہونے والے معقول اخراجات وصول کرنے کا حق محفوظ رکھتا ہے۔
4.4۔مرچنٹ ای منی اکاؤنٹ (اگر قابل اطلاق ہو) کی مناسبت سے نیاپے (اپنی واحد صوابدید میں) ان شرائط کے مطابق نیا پے پلیٹ فارم پر موجود کچھ سروسز اور/یا ان سے منسلک افعال کی عدم فراہمی اور/یا عدم دستیابی کا حق محفوظ رکھتا ہے۔
4.5۔ نیا پے مرچنٹ کی طرف سے کسی بھی واجب الادا دعووں،چارجز، جرمانوں، اخراجات یا چارجز کی مکمل ادائیگی تک، نیا پے خدمات معطل یا محدود کرنے کا حق محفوظ رکھتا ہے۔
4.6۔ نیا پے کسی بھی وقت اور اپنی صوابدید پر، مرچنٹ ای منی اکاؤنٹ (یا اس کی کچھ خصوصیات جیسے ای منی لوڈ کرنا، وصول کرنا، بھیجنا اور / یا نکالنا) اور نیا پے سروسز کو معطل اور / یا بند کرنے کا حق محفوظ رکھتاہے:
4.6.1. جہاں نیاپے کو یقین ہو کہ مرچنٹ اکاؤنٹ کی سیکیورٹی کے تحفظ کے لیے ایسا کرنا ضروری یا مناسب ہے۔
4.6.2. اگر کوئی ایسا لین دین کیا گیا ہے جو نیا پے اپنی صوابدید کے مطابق سمجھتا ہے کہ (الف) ان متفقہ شرائط(بشمول مرچنٹ اکاؤنٹ کی سیکیورٹی کے تقاضوں) یا (ب) مشکوک، غیر مجاز یا دھوکہ دہی پر مبنی، بشمول بلا حدکے AML/KYCضوابط کے تحت یا ان کے علاوہ، دھوکہ دہی یا دیگر غیر قانونی سرگرمیاں۔
4.6.3۔ مرچنٹ کی طرف سے نظام میں ممکنہ یا اصل رخنہ اندازی؛
4.6.4۔ اگر ٹرانزیکشن ڈیٹا میں کوئی ممکنہ یا اصل نقب زنی ہوتی ہے۔
4.6.5۔تصفیہ، تحلیل، کام کی بندش، دیوالیہ پن، انتظامیہ،مرچنٹ کے عدالتی تولیت(receivership) میں ہونے یا معاہدہ شکنی کی صورت میں، یا جہاں نیاپے معقول حد تک مناسب سمجھے کہ مرچنٹ کے سلسلے میں اس کا خطرہ ہے۔
4.6.6۔ جہاں کچھ ایسا ہوتا ہے جس سے نیا پے کی رائے میں یہ ظاہر ہوتا ہے کہ مرچنٹ کامصنوعات / خدمات مہیا کرنا اور / یا بصورت دیگر اپنے صارفین کے ساتھاپنے معاہدوں کو پورا کرنا مرچنٹ کے لیے ممکن نہیں ہوگا۔
4.6.7۔ اگر لین دین ایسے سامان اور / یا خدمات کی فروخت کے لئے ہے جو مرچنٹ کی منظور شدہ کاروباری سرگرمیوں سے باہر ہیں، یا جہاں مرچنٹ ٹرانزیکشن پیش کرتا ہے اور مرچنٹ پروڈکٹس/ سروسز مہیاکرنے میں ناکام ہوجاتا ہے اور / یا جہاں مرچنٹ تھرڈپارٹی پروسیسنگ کرتا ہے اور مرچنٹ پروڈکٹس/ سروسز خودفراہم نہیں کرتاہے۔
4.6.8۔ جہاں مرچنٹ کے حالات میں (بشمول مرچنٹ کی مالی حیثیت میں ابتری یاتبدیلی بھی شامل ہے)، یا مرچنٹ کے کاروبار میں یا مرچنٹ کی پروڈکٹس / سروسز میں تبدیلی ہوتی ہے جسے نیا پے اپنی واحد صوابدید کے مطابق نیا پے خدمات کے تسلسل میں اہم سمجھتا ہے۔
4.6.9۔ اگر نیا پے اپنی صوابدید پرسمجھتا ہے کہ مرچنٹ کے حوالے سے واپسیوں /چارج بیکس ادائیگی کی سطح یا مرچنٹ پروڈکٹ/سروس کی عدم فراہمی کے دعووں کی تعداد غیر معقول ہے اور نیا پے مرچنٹ کو ایسی کسی معطلی سے پہلے ہی مطلع کرنے کی معقول کوشش کرے گا، یا اگر یہ قابل عمل نہیں ہے تو، فورا بعد اور اس طرح کی معطلی کی وجوہات بتائے گا، ماسوائے اس کے کہ مطلع کرنے سے سیکیورٹی اقدامات کو نقصان پہنچنے کا خطرہ ہو یا قابل اطلاق قانون کی طرف سے ممنوع ہو، یا
4.6.10۔ جہاں یہ قابل اطلاق قانون کے تحت یا کسی مجاز اتھارٹی کے حکم کے ذریعہ ایسا کرنا ضروری ہو۔
4.7۔جہاں نیا پے نے مرچنٹ ای منی اکاؤنٹ اور / یا نیا پے سروسز کو معطل کردیا ہو، معطلی کی وجوہات ختم ہونے کے بعد جیسے ہی عملی طور پرممکن ہوا،نیاپے اس کو دوبارہ بحال کرے گا اور جہاں ضروری ہو،سیکیورٹی کی نئی تفصیلات مثلاً ایک پاس ورڈ فراہم کرے گا۔
4.8۔ مرچنٹ تسلیم کرتا ہے اور اس پر اتفاق کرتا ہے کہ نیا پے صرف ادائیگی کے درمیانی ذریعے کے طور پر کام کرتا ہے اور نیاپے: (ا) کسی بھی حالت میں پروڈکٹ / سروس فروخت کنندہ، خریدار، ڈیلر، مڈل مین، خوردہ فروش، نیلام کنندہ، سپلائر، تقسیم کار،مینوفیکچرر، بروکر، ایجنٹ یا مرچنٹ کے طور پر کام نہیں کرتا ہے۔ (ب) کوئی نمائندگی اور ضمانت نہیں دیتا اور نہ ہی کسی مرچنٹ پروڈکٹ / سروس کے معیار، حفاظت یا قانونی حیثیت کو یقینی بناتا ہے۔
4.9۔ مرچنٹ تسلیم کرتا ہے اور اس سے اتفاق کرتا ہے کہ کسی بھی تجارتی پروڈکٹ / سروس سے متعلق کوئی تنازعہ گاہک اور مرچنٹ کے درمیان ہوتا ہے۔ مرچنٹ مصنوعات / خدمات کے ساتھ منسلک کوئی بھی لین دین صرف مرچنٹ کی ذمہ داری ہوگا۔ نیا پے کسی ایسے تنازعہ کا فریق نہیں ہوگا جس میں مرچنٹ مصنوعات / خدمات کی فراہمی، معیار، تعداد یا مرچنٹ پروڈکٹ/سروسزکے استعمال سے متعلق کارکردگی اور واجبات کے معاملات سمیت تنازعات شامل ہیں۔
5۔ذمہ داریاں
متفقہ شرائط کی مدت کے دوران مرچنٹ ہر وقت درج ذیل امور پر عمل پیرا ہوگا:
5.1 متفقہ شرائط کی تعمیل۔
5.2 اگر قابل اطلاق قوانین یا نیاپے کو مطلوب ہو تو، متفقہ شرائط کے مطابق ایک مرچنٹ ای منی اکاؤنٹ کھولے اور برقرار رکھے؛
5.3  قابل اطلاق قوانین کی تعمیل میں نیا پے مرچنٹ پورٹل پرمکمل اور درست معلومات فراہم کرے۔
5.4 نیا پے خدمات کوصرف اپنے مرکزی کاروبار کے سلسلے میں حقیقی لین دین کے لئے استعمال کرے اور نیا پے خدمات کو کسی غیر قانونی، دھوکہ دہی پر مبنی، فریب دہندگی یا جوڑ توڑ سے متعلق فعل یا عمل کے سلسلے میں رقوم وصول کرنے کے لئے استعمال نہ کرے۔
5.5 مرچنٹ کی طرف سے حاصل کردہ نیا پے سروسز کے مطابق نیا پے پلیٹ فارم کے ذریعے مرچنٹ پروڈکٹس / خدمات کے لئے گاہکوں کوادائیگی کرنے کی اجازت دے۔
5.6 قبولیت کی اطلاع موصول ہونے کے بعد ہی گاہک کو مرچنٹ پروڈکٹ / خدمات مہیا کرے۔
5.7 اس بات کو یقینی بنائے کہ مرچنٹ ویب سائٹ مرچنٹ کے کسی احاطے اورنیا پے پلیٹ فارم (اگر قابل اطلاق ہو)پرموجود تمام مارکیٹنگ اور پروموشنل سرگرمیاں قابل اطلاق قوانین، مینویل اور پالیسیوں کی تعمیل میں ہوں۔
5.8 مرچنٹ ویب سائٹ پر موجود معلومات کی درستگی کی جانچ پڑتال اوردستی چیک کرنے یا آٹو میٹڈ سرچزکے مقصد کے لئے مرچنٹ ویب سائٹ تک رسائی حاصل کرنے کا حق دے اورنیا پے سروسز کے حوالے سے نیا پے کی طرف سے تجویز کردہ ضروری ترمیم کرے، بشرطیکہ (i) نیاپے اس طرح کی سرچز یا چیک کرنے کا پابند نہیں ہوگا اور (ii) ایسی کسی بھی سرچز کو کسی بھی حالت میں مرچنٹ ویب سائٹ/ایپلیکیشن کے کسی بھی مواد کی منظوری نہیں سمجھا جائے گا۔
5.9مینویل کے تحت فراہم کردہ سیکیورٹی ذمہ داریوں کی تعمیل۔
5.10 استعمال کی شرائط کے تحت ممنوع ادائیگیوں کو متاثر کیے بغیر، مرچنٹ فحش مواد یا خدمات کی فراہمی، غیر قانونی ڈاؤن لوڈ ز، جوا، یا قابل اطلاق قانون کے تحت غیرقانونی /ریگولیٹڈ کسی اور سامان یا خدمات کی پیش کش یا فراہمی کے لئے ادائیگیاں وصول نہیں کرے گا۔
5.11 اے ایم ایل کے وائی سی قواعد و ضوابط اور دوسرے قابل اطلاق قوانین کی تعمیل کرنے کے مقصد کے لئے، نیا پے کو اس کی طلب کردہ معلومات مہیا کرے بشمول مرچنٹ کے کاروبار، کاروباری ڈھانچے اور آئین، حصص یافتگان، شراکت داروں، ممبروں، ڈائریکٹرز، اہم ملازمین یا، کسی ٹرسٹ کی صورت اس کے استفادہ کنندگان کی معلومات اورنیاپے کی طرف سے درخواست پر، مرچنٹ کے کاروبار سے متعلق مالی معلومات اور دیگر معلومات کی کاپیاں، بشمول بینک اور / یا تجارتی حوالہ جات۔
5.12 صارفین سے نیاپے پلیٹ فارم کے ذریعے ادائیگی کی جانے والی مرچنٹ پروڈکٹ / خدمات کے لیے پروسیسنگ فیس، مارک اپ یا دیگر سرچارج وصول نہیں کرے گا اور نیا پے پلیٹ فارم کے استعمال کے حوالے سے صارفین کی حوصلہ شکنی کے لئے کوئی دوسرا ذریعہ استعمال نہیں کرے گا۔
5.13 صارفین کو ایک واضح اور منصفانہ ریٹرن اور ریفنڈ(پروڈکٹ اور رقم کی واپسی) کی پالیسی مہیا کرے اور نیا پے کی درخواست پر، اپنی ریٹرن اور ریفنڈ پالیسی کی ایک کاپی فراہم کرے اور اس پالیسی میں اس کے بعد ہونے والی کسی تبدیلی کے بارے میں نیا پے کو مطلع کرے۔
5.14 تمام قابل اطلاق قوانین بشمول مگراسی تک محدود نہیں، اے ایم ایل کے وائی سی قواعد و ضوابط کی تعمیل کرے اور تمام مطلوبہ اریگولیٹری ذمہ داریاں برقرار رکھے اپنی ذمہ داریوں کے مقاصد کے لیے کسی بھی مجاز اتھارٹی کی تمام ہدایتوں کی تعمیل کرے۔
5.15 مینویل اور قابل اطلاق قانون کے مطابق، ٹرانزیکشن ڈیٹاکی چوری اور سسٹم میں رخنہ اندازی کی کسی اور شکل کے خطرے کے لیے سیکیورٹی کی ایک مناسب سطح یقینی بنانے کے لیے مناسب تکنیکی اور تنظیمی طریقہ کار، کنٹرولز اور دیگر اقدامات کے ساتھ ایک جامع تحریری انفارمیشن سیکیورٹی پروگرام کو نافذ اور برقرار رکھے اور نیا پے کو براہ راست یا اس کے منتخب کردہ کسی تھرڈ پارٹی کنٹریکٹرکے ذریعہ، مرچنٹ کے قائم کردہ حفاظتی اقدامات کا معائنہ / جائزہ لینے کی اجازت دے۔
5.16  نیا پے سسٹم کے ساتھ مستقل اور بلا تعطل رابطے کو یقینی بنانے کے لیے اپنے انفارمیشن ٹیکنالوجی سسٹم کو برقرار رکھے اور چلائے اور مینویل میں مخصوص کردہ حدوں اور شرحوں کے مطابق ڈاؤن ٹائم جرمانہ ادا کرنے پر تیار ہو۔
5.17 نیا پے سسٹم کے حوالے سے تمام ریکارڈز (جس میں صارفین اور لین دین سے متعلق تمام معلومات شامل ہیں لیکن ان تک محدود نہیں ہے) دس (10) سال یا اس طرح کی توسیع شدہ مدت کے لئے برقراررکھے جو قابل اطلاق قانون کے تحت درکار ہوسکتی ہے۔
5.18درج ذیل صورتوں میں نیا پے کو فوری طور پرمطلع کریں: (ا) سسٹم میں کوئی رخنہ اندازی یا ٹرانزیکشن ڈیٹا کی چوری (ب) کسی مجاز اتھارٹی کی طرف سے مرچنٹ کے خلاف کوئی حقیقی یا ممکنہ انضباطی کارروائی(ج)مرچنٹ کے کنٹرول میں کوئی حقیقی یا ممکنہ تبدیلی۔ (د) سرگرمیوں کی معطلی جونیا پے سسٹم کو متاثر کرے، یا (ہ) کوئی ایساواقعہ (فورس میجور کے معاملے کے علاوہ) جس کا نتیجہ اس کی طرف سے معاہدہ شدہ شرائط کے تحت اپنی ذمہ داریوں میں سے کسی کی انجام دہی میں نااہلی کی شکل میں سامنے آئے۔
5.19 کسی بھی مجاز اتھارٹی کی طرف سے کیے جانے والے آڈٹ، تفتیش، معائنہ، یا انکوائری کے سلسلے میں نیا پے، یا نیا پے کی طرف سے مقرر کردہ کسی تھرڈ پارٹی کو مطلوب تمام معاونت اور معلومات فراہم کرے۔
5.20 کسی بھی ایسی کارروائی میں براہ راست یا بالواسطہ طور پرملوث یا معاون نہ بنے جو غیر قانونی ہے یا نیا پے کی معقول رائے کے مطابق، خواہ معاہدہ شدہ شرائط میں اس کا ذکر کیا گیا ہویانہ کیا گیاہو، اس سے نیا پے کی ساکھ یا وقار کو نقصان پہنچ سکتاہو،اور نیا پے کی درخواست پر فوری طور پر اس طرح کی کسی کارروائی میں شمولیت یامعاونت ترک کردے۔ اور
5.21 نیا پے سسٹم یا لین دین سے پیدا ہونے والے کسی بھی تنازعے کے سلسلے میں، مینویل کی پیروی کرے اور نیاپے سسٹم کے طریقوں میں مداخلت کے لئے کوئی کارروائی نہ کرے۔
6. ریزرو اور سیکورٹی
6.1 نیا پے متفقہ شرائط کے تحت مرچنٹ کی ذمہ داری کی انجام دہی کے لیے اور ایک یا تمام، حقیقی یا معقول حد تک متوقع دعووں، خساروں، لاگت، جرمانوں اور اخراجات کی ادائیگی کے لئے نیا پے کوفنڈز کاکوئی ذریعہ فراہم کرنے کے مقصد کے لئے نیا پے کسی مرچنٹ سے سیکیورٹی طلب کرسکتا ہے۔
6.2 اگر نیاپے انتخاب کرے کہ متعلقہ سیکیورٹی میں نیا پے کی متعین کردہ رقم (اپنی صوابدیدپر)کے ریزرو(ذخیرے) کا قیام شامل ہوگا، تو نیاپے کو حق حاصل ہوگاکہ: (i) مرچنٹ اکاؤنٹ میں،مرچنٹ کو قابل ادائیگی بیلنس کا ریزرو کے مساوی حصہ کریڈٹ نہ کرے، اور / یا (ii) مرچنٹ کو مرچنٹ ای منی اکاؤنٹ (اگر قابل اطلاق ہو) سے ریزرو کے مساوی رقم واپس لینے سے روک دے۔ متبادل کے طور پر، نیا پے کی صوابدید پر، نیا پے بینک گارنٹی کا بطورسیکیورٹی انتخاب کرسکتاہے،ایسی  صورت میں مرچنٹ درخواست کیے جانے پرکسی معروف بینک سے نیا پے کے حق میں،نیاپے کے لیے قابلِ قبول شکل میں، نیا پے کی تعین کردہ رقم کی گارنٹی حاصل کرے گا۔ معاہدہ شدہ شرائط کے خاتمے سے قطع نظریہ سیکیورٹی اس وقت تک برقرار رہے گی جب تک کہ مرچنٹ کے ذمہ نیا پے کی بقیہ یا ہنگامی ادائیگی موجود ہو۔ ریزرو رقم کا تعین(خواہ وہ مطلق رقم کے طور پر ظاہر کی گئی ہو یا مرچنٹ اکاؤنٹ میں سابقہ ادائیگیوں کی شرح فیصد کے طور پر) نیا پے اپنی صوابدید کے مطابق وقتا فوقتا کرے گا۔ متفقہ شرائط کے آغاز کی تاریخ میں،جب ریزرو قائم نہیں ہوا، نیا پے مرچنٹ کو طے شدہ شرائط کی مدت کے دوران کسی بھی وقت، کسی بلاوجہ تاخیر کے بغیرتحریری طورپر ریزرو کے اطلاق، اس کے حساب کتاب کا طریقہ، اس کی رقم کے ساتھ ساتھ ریزرو میں کسی اضافے یا کمی کی اطلاع دے گا۔
6.3 شق 6.1 اور 6.2 کے تحت نیا پے کی صوابدید کو محدود کیے بغیر، نیاپے ریزرو کی رقم متعین کرنے کے لئے دیگر عوامل کے علاوہ مندرجہ ذیل عوامل کو مد نظر رکھ سکتاہے:
6.3.1 مرچنٹ کی طرف سے کاروبارکی بندش یا اس کے پورے کاروبار یا کاروبار کے کافی حصے کی منتقلی کا خطرہ۔
6.3.2 مرچنٹ کی طرف سے اس کے کاروبار کی نوعیت میں بھاری تبدیلی کا خطرہ۔
6.3.3 اگر مرچنٹ کی کاروباری سرگرمیاں پیمنٹ ریورسل(رقم واپسی) / چارج بیک یا کسٹمرپیمنٹس کی دیگرریورسلز(رقم واپسی)کے ضمن میں معمول سے زیادہ خطرہ کی حامل ہوں۔
6.3.4 مرچنٹ کی مجموعی مالی حیثیت؛
6.3.5 مرچنٹ کے دیوالیہ یا دوسری صورت میں قرضوں کی ادائیگی کرنے سے قاصر بن جانے کا خطرہ۔
.6.3.6 جہاں نیا پے کو کسٹمر کی مرچنٹ اکاؤنٹ سے متعلق غیرمتناسب تعداد میں شکایات، چارج بیکس یا ادائیگی کی دیگر واپسی، جرمانے، سزا یا دیگرواجبات کی غیر متناسب تعداد موصول ہوتی ہیں۔ یا
6.3.7 جہاں نیا پے کو معقول طور پر یقین ہو کہ مرچنٹ ان طے شدہ شرائط کے تحت اپنی ذمہ داریوں کو انجام نہیں دے سکے گا۔
.4 6مرچنٹ مناسب درخواست پر اور مرچنٹ کے اخراجات پر، نیا پے کو اپنی مالی اور آپریشنل حیثیت بشمول مگر اسی تک محدود نہیں،حالیہ مالی گوشواروں اور انتظامی اکاؤنٹس کے بارے میں معلومات فراہم کرنے کا اقرار کرتا ہے۔مرچنٹ اپنے اخراجات پر، اس طرح کی سیکیورٹی کے قیام کے لیے،جو نیا پے کے لیے معقو ل حد تک ضروری ہے،کوئی بھی مزید کارروائی (جس میں کسی بھی ضروری دستاویزات پر عملدرآمد اور دستاویز کی کسی بھی شکل کا اندراج شامل ہے) کرے گا۔
6.5 نیا پے کومرچنٹ کی کسی بھی سیکیورٹی، ریزرو، مرچنٹ کو قابلِ ادائیگی بیلنس یا مرچنٹ ای منی اکاؤنٹ (اگر قابل اطلاق ہو) سے کسی بھی دعوے، اخراجات، چارجز، جرمانوں اور اخراجات کی رقم کی پیشگی اطلاع کے بغیر کسی بھی وقت کٹوتی کاحق ہوگا۔اس کے علاوہ مرچنٹ کٹوتی کی گئی کسی رقم کو پورا کرنے کے لیے ریزرو میں ایسی رقوم ادا کرے گا جس کا نوٹس نیا پے  کی جانب سے دیا گیا ہو۔اگر نیا پے کا تقاضاہو تو مرچنٹ ریزرو میں رقم جمع کرانے  کے لیے یا پیمنٹ ریورسلز کے کسی ایسے بڑھے ہوئے خطرے کے جواب میں، جسے مرچنٹ ای منی اکاؤنٹ کے اس وقت کے بیلنس یا مرچنٹ کو قابلِ ادائیگی بیلنس کا کور حاصل نہیں ہے، نیاپے کی طرف سے معقول حد میں تعین کردہ رقم مرچنٹ ای منی اکاؤنٹ (اگر قابل اطلاق ہو) میں جمع کرائے گا۔
7۔ وارنٹیز
ہرپارٹی دوسری پارٹی کو ضمانت دیتی اوراقرار کرتی ہے کہ:
7.1 ماسوائے اس کے کہ پارٹی ایک فطری فرد ہے،یہ پاکستان کے قوانین کے تحت قانونی طور پرقائم شدہ اور/یا موجوداور اچھی حیثیت کی حامل ہے۔
7.2 اس کے پاس اپنی جائیداد اور اثاثوں کا مالک ہونے اور جس کاروبار میں مشغول ہے اسے سرانجام دینے کا اختیار، لائسنس اوراجازت حاصل ہے۔
7.3 یہ دیوالیہ پن یا تحلیل  کے عمل سے نہیں گزررہی ہے اور نہ ہی اس کے علم کے مطابق اسے ایساکوئی خطرہ ہے۔ اور
7.4 وہ متفقہ شرائط میں شامل ہونے اوران پر عمل کرنے کے لئے مکمل طاقت اور اختیاررکھتی ہے۔
8۔ اضافی تجارتی وارنٹی
مرچنٹ ضمانت دیتا ہے اوراقرار کرتا ہے:
8.1 اس کے پاس ان متفقہ شرائط کے تحت اپنی ذمہ داریوں کی انجام دہی کے لئے ضروری وسائل اور صلاحیتیں موجودہیں۔
8.2۔ مرچنٹ پروڈکٹس / سروسز کی تیاری، فروخت اور تقسیم قابل اطلاق قانون کی تعمیل کرتی ہے اور مرچنٹ کے پاس اس کے لئے تمام مطلوبہ لائسنسز، منظوریاں اور اجازت نامے ہیں۔
8.3۔ مرچنٹ دانشورانہ املاک(انٹیلیکچویل پراپرٹیز) میں پورے حق، ٹائٹل اور مفادکا حامل ہے جو یہ نیا پے سروسز کے مقصد کے تحت نیاپے کو لائسنس پہ دے گا اور جس کے سلسلے میں کسی تیسری پارٹی کاخلاف ورزی کا دعویٰ زیرالتوا نہیں ہے۔
9۔ مرچنٹ ڈسکاؤنٹ کی شرح
9.1 نیاپے خدمات کے لیے مرچنٹ کی طرف سے قابل ادا ئیگی MDR وہی ہوگا جواکاؤنٹ اوپننگ فارم میں طے کیاگیا ہے۔
9.2  MDR کا حوالہ ویلیو ایڈڈ ٹیکس  کے علاوہ دیا گیا ہے۔ اگر ویلیو ایڈڈ ٹیکس یا کوئی اورسیلز ٹیکس قابل وصول ہے یا ہوجاتا ہے تو، نیا پے اس طرح کا ٹیکس قابل ادائیگی رقم میں شامل کرے گا، لیکن، جہاں ضرورت ہو، خالص رقم، ٹیکس کی رقم اور ٹیکس کی لاگوہونے والی شرح کی  معلومات فراہم کرے گا۔
9.3  MDR شق 10 کے مطابق قابل تبدیلی ہے۔
9.4 بصورت دیگرجہاں نیا پےMDRکی وصولی کرنے سے قاصر ہے، نیا پے واجب الادا رقم کے لئے انوائس جاری کرے گا۔ انوائس کی ادائیگی انوائس کی تاریخ کے پندرہ (15) دن کے اندر اندر ہوگی۔ معیادسے زائد ادائیگیوں کی صورت میں، نیاپے حق محفوظ رکھتا ہے کہ(i) KIBORپلس 2فی صدلیٹ پیمنٹ چارجز وصول کرے؛ اور / یا (ii) شق 17کے مطابق مرچنٹ کو تحریری نوٹس دے کر فوری طور پر متفقہ شرائط ختم کردے۔
10۔شرائط اور ضوابط میں تبدیلی
یہ متفقہ شرائط وقتا فوقتا تبدیل ہوسکتی ہیں۔ ماسوائے اس کے کہ بصورت دیگر اتفاق نہ کیا گیا ہو، نیا پے کی طرف سے مندرجہ ذیل طریقہ کار کے تحت تاجر کو نوٹس کے ذریعہ تبدیلیاں کی جاسکتی ہیں:
10.1۔ نیا پے متفقہ شرائط  میں کسی تجویز کردہ تبدیلی کا مرچنٹ کو نوٹس (”تبدیلی کا نوٹس“) دے گا۔
10.2۔ شق17کے مطابق مرچنٹ کو تبدیلی کا نوٹس دیاجاسکتا ہے۔
10.3۔ تبدیلی کے نوٹس کی وصولی کی تاریخ کے دو (2) ہفتوں بعد مجوزہ تبدیلی از خود نافذ ہوجائے گی ماسوائے اس کے کہ مرچنٹ نیا پے کوتبدیلی نوٹس میں مقررکردہ وقت کے اندر تحریری نوٹس (”اعتراض کا نوٹس“)دے کہ اسے مجوزہ تبدیلیوں پر اعتراض ہے۔
10.4۔ نیا پے کسی تبدیلی کے موثر ہونے کے لئے تبدیلی کے نوٹس میں ایک مختلف وقت کی مدت مقرر کرسکتا ہے۔
10.5۔ اگر نیا پے کو مقررہ مدت کے اندر کسی اعتراض کا نوٹس موصول نہیں ہوتا ہے تو یہ سمجھ لیا جائے گا کہ مرچنٹ نے اس تبدیلی کو قبول کرلیا ہے۔
10.6۔ مرچنٹ کو یہ حق ہے کہ تبدیلی کا نوٹس موصول ہونے اور اس سے پہلے کہ تبدیلی کے نوٹس میں طے شدہ کوئی تبدیلی موثر ہوجائے، کسی بھی وقت اور بغیر کسی چارج کے متفقہ شرائط کو ختم کردے۔
10.7۔ اگر فریقین باہمی اتفاق سے مرچنٹ کے اعتراض کے نوٹس کے ذریعے اٹھائے گئے اعتراض کو حل کرنے اور نمٹنے میں ناکام رہیں تو اور شق 10.6 کو متاثر کیے بغیر،مرچنٹ کے اعتراض کا نوٹس ان متفقہ شرائط کے ختم ہونے کا نوٹس تصور کیا جائے گااور تبدیلی کی اس تاریخ سے قبل مؤثر قرار دیا جائے گا جس پر مجوزہ تبدیلی دوسری صورت میں شق 10.3 کے تحت عمل میں آئے گی۔
11۔ ٹیکس
مرچنٹ کی ذمہ داری ہے کہ وہ اس بات کا تعین کرے کہ وصول کردہ ادائیگیوں پر کون سے، اگر کوئی ہے تو، ٹیکس کا اطلاق ہوتا ہے، اور قابل اطلاق قانون کے تابع، متعلقہ مجاز اتھارٹی کو صحیح ٹیکس کی اطلاع دے اور بھیجے۔ نیا پے یہ طے کرنے کا پابند نہیں ہے کہ آیا ٹیکس لاگو ہوتے ہیں، اور کسی بھی لین دین سے پیدا ہونے والے ٹیکسوں کو جمع کرنے، اس کی اطلاع دینے، یا ٹیکس کی رقم بھیجنے کا ذمہ دار نہیں ہے۔
12. دانش ورانہ  املاک
12.1۔ مرچنٹ  متفقہ شرائط کے  دورانیے اور سختی سے صرف متفقہ شرائط اور نیا پے سروسز کے مقصد کے لئے، نیاپے کو اپنے لوگو، ٹریڈ مارک، تجارتی نام،اور دیگر دانشورانہ املاک کوجو اس کی ملکیت میں ہیں، کو نقل، استعمال اور ڈسپلے کرنے کا غیرمخصوص، عالمگیر،رائلٹی فری، ناقابلِ منتقلی لائسنس دیتا ہے۔
12.2۔ معاہدہ کی شرائط میں کسی بھی چیز مرچنٹ کونیا پے کے کسی بھی لوگو، ٹریڈ مارک، تجارتی ناموں یا دیگر دانشورانہ املاک میں کوئی حق، عنوان یامفادات نہیں دے گا یا نہ دیا گیا تصورکیا جائے گاماسوائے جیسا کہ مینول اور پالیسیوں کی تعمیل میں مارکیٹنگ کے مقصدکے لیے اجازت ہے۔
12.3۔ مرچنٹ مذکورہ بالا شق 12.2 کی شرائط کے تحت اس کو دیا گیا لائسنس متفقہ شرائط میں فراہم کردہ مقصد کے سوا کسی اور مقصد کے لئے استعمال نہیں کرسکتا ہے اور یہ نیاپے کی دانشورانہ املاک کے استعمال سے متعلق پالیسیوں سے مشروط ہے۔
12.4۔ متفقہ شرائط کے خاتمے کے بعد، کسی بھی پارٹی کی طرف سے دوسرے کو دیئے گئے تمام لائسنس فوری طور پرکسی نوٹس کی ضرورت کے بغیر ختم ہو جائیں گے، اور ہرپارٹی دوسری پارٹی کی دانشورانہ املاک اور اس کی درج ذیل خصوصی اجازت کی حد تک کی گئی تمام نقول یا اخذشدہ کام، واپس کردے گی۔ کسی پارٹی کے پاس دوسری پارٹی کی دانشورانہ املاک اور اس کی تمام نقول یا اخذشدہ کام مزید استعمال کرنے کے لئے حقوق یا لائسنس نہیں ہوں گے، ماسوائے اس کے کہ جن پر پارٹیوں کے مابین تحریری طور پرخصوصی اتفاق کیا گیا ہو۔
13۔ ذمہ داری اورہرجانے کی حد
13.1دونوں پارٹیوں میں سے کوئی بھی معاہدے،غلط فعل (بشمول غفلت یا قانونی فرض کی خلاف ورزی)یا بصورت دیگرکسی بھی قسم کے بالواسطہ یا ضمنی گھاٹے یا نقصان بشمول بطور سزا یا بطور مثل نقصانات یا منافع کے کسی نقصان یا معاہدے کے نقصان، ساکھ یا شہرت کے نقصان، موقع کے نقصان، آمدنی کے نقصان، یا تھرڈ پارٹی نقصان، خواہ وہ قابلِ پیش بینی ہو یا نہ ہو، کے لیے ذمہ دار نہیں ہے۔
13.2 شق 13.3، 13.4 اور 13.5 اور کسی بھی دوسری شق سے مشروط طور پر اس شق کے اثر کو واضح طور پر چھوڑ کر، آغاز کی تاریخ یا اس کی کسی سالگرہ (ہر ایک”معاہدہ سال“) سے لے کر 12 مہینوں کی کسی بھی مدت میں متفقہ شرائط (بشمول اس کے تحت فراہم کردہ ہرجانوں) سے رونما ہونے یا اس سے متعلق معاہدے،خسارے کے حوالے سے، خواہ وہ بوجہ غفلت ہو یا نہ ہو، نیاپے کی مجموعی ذمہ داری ان دونوں رقوم میں سے جو کم ہو (i)دس ہزار (10,000) پاکستانی روپے یا (ii) مرچنٹ کی طرف سے نیا پے کومعاہدے کے گزشتہ سال میں وصول شدہ فیس (یا معاہدے کے پہلے سال میں اس تاریخ تک وصول شدہ فیس)تک محدود ہوگی۔
13.3۔ نیا پے درج ذیل میں سے کسی کے لئے ذمہ دار نہیں ہوگا:
13.3.1 نیا پے سسٹم میں حصہ لینے اور/یا بصورت دیگرنیاپے پلیٹ فارم اور نیا پے سروسز کے حوالے سے بطور ایجنٹ یا سروس پرووائیڈرز سہولیات یا خدمات فراہم کرنے والی تھرڈ پارٹیز، مثلاًبینکنگ کمپنیوں کی طرف سے کی جانے والی کارروائیاں یا غلطیاں یا وصول کی جانے والی کوئی فیس۔
13.3.2 تھرڈ پارٹیزمثلاًبینکنگ کمپنیوں سے موصول شدہ کسی بھی معلومات پرانحصارکرتے ہوئے نیا پے سروسز انجام دینے کے لئے نیا پے کی طرف سے اٹھائے گئے کوئی بھی اقدامات (اس سے قطع نظر کہ اس طرح کی ٹرانسمشن سسٹم میں نقب زنی کا نتیجہ ہو)۔
13.3.3 لین دین کی کارروائی میں ایسی معطلی یا عمل درآمد سے انکار سے پیدا ہونے والا کوئی تنازعہ جسے نیا پے معقول حد تک دھوکہ دہی کے ساتھ کی گئی یا مناسب اجازت کے بغیر مانتاہو۔
13.3.4 ہارڈ ویئر، سافٹ ویئر یا انٹرنیٹ کنکشن کے صحیح طریقے سے کام نہیں کرنے یا سسٹم میں نقب زنی کی وجہ سے نیا پے سروسز کی عدم دستیابی۔
13.3.5 نیا پے کی جانب سے کی گئی معقول احتیاطی تدابیر کے باوجود مناسب کارکردگی کو روکنے والے غیر متوقع حالات۔ ایسے حالات میں قدرتی آفت،، بجلی کی بندش، آگ، سیلاب، چوری، سازوسامان کی خرابی، ہیکنگ حملوں، داخلی میکانکی یا سسٹم کی ناکامیوں کے ساتھ ساتھ نیا پے پلیٹ فارم کی خرابی شامل ہوسکتی ہیں تاہم یہ ان ہی تک محدود نہیں۔ اور
13.3.6 مرچنٹ پروڈکٹس /سروسزکی فراہمی، معیار، مقدار یا استعمال سے متعلق مسائل۔
13.4 نیاپے کو ان متفقہ شرائط کے تحت یا قابل اطلاق قانون کے تحت دستیاب کسی بھی دوسرے حل کو متاثر کیے بغیر، مرچنٹ نیاپے کو درج ذیل امور کے نتیجے میں اور /یا ان سے سامنے آنے والے کسی بھی اصل یا دھونس والے دعوے، مطالبے، ذمہ داری، نقصان، لاگت، واجبات اور / یا کسی اخراجات (بشمول، کسی حد کے بغیر، وکیلوں کی اصل فیس، تحقیقات کے اخراجات، اور اخراجات) (”نقصانات“) کی تلافی کرے گا، دفاع کرے گا اور ضر ر سے محفوظ رکھے گا:
13.4.1. مرچنٹ کی طرف سے ان میں سے کوئی بھی خلاف ورزی: (i) کوئی معاہدہ،اقرار نامہ،بیان، وارنٹی، یا ان متفقہ شرائط کی کوئی اور شق، یا (ii) قابل اطلاق قوانین کے تحت اپنی ذمہ داریاں
13.4.2مرچنٹ کے سسٹم میں کوئی حقیقی یا ممکنہ نقب زنی
13.4.3۔مرچنٹ کی کاروباری سرگرمیوں کے تعطل، خرابی، یا کسی اور طرح کی بندش کے سلسلے میں کوئی تھرڈ پارٹی نیا پے کے خلاف دعویٰ کرتی ہے۔
13.4.4۔ تاجر کیِ دانش ورانہ املاک کے سلسلے میں خلاف ورزی  کے کوئی دعوے۔ اور
13.4.5. مرچنٹ مصنوعات / خدمات۔
14۔رازداری اور ڈیٹا کی حفاظت
14.1 اس شق 14 کے مقاصد کے لئے، درج ذیل شرائط کی تشریح بمطابق ذیل ہوگی:
(1)”ملکیتی معلومات“کا مطلب خفیہ کاروبار ی معلومات اور نیا پے ڈیٹا ہے۔
(2)”خفیہ کاروباری معلومات“ کا مطلب ہے: (i) کوئی قیمتی، خفیہ کاروباری معلومات جو انکشاف کے وقت خفیہ کے طور پر نامزد یا شناخت کی گئی ہوں  یا جنہیں اپنی نوعیت کے اعتبار سے انکشاف کرنے والی پارٹی کے کاروبار اور انڈسٹری سے واقف کوئی بھی سمجھ دار انسان خفیہ معلومات کے طور پر واضح طور پر پہچاننے کے قابل ہو، اور (ii) ان مقاصد کے لیے متفقہ شرائط بھی ان میں شامل ہوں گی۔
(3)”انکشاف کرنے والی پارٹی“کا مطلب ایسی پارٹی ہے جوذیل کے تحت کسی بھی ملکیتی معلومات کا انکشاف کرے، خواہ ایسا انکشاف براہ راست انکشاف کرنے والے کی طرف سے یااس کے کارندوں کے ذریعے ہو یا کسی اور خود کار طریقے سے۔
(4)”وصول کنندہ پارٹی“کا مطلب ایسی پارٹی ہے جوذیل کے تحت کوئی بھی ملکیتی معلومات وصول کرتی ہے، خواہ ایسا انکشاف وصول کنندہ پارٹی کو براہ راست موصول ہواہو یااس کے کارندوں کے ذریعے یا کسی اور خود کار طریقے سے۔
(5)”نیا پے ڈیٹا“ کا مطلب ہے صارفین، مرچنٹس، اور لین دین سے متعلق تمام ڈیٹا اور معلومات جس میں ٹرانزیکشن ڈیٹا شامل ہوتا ہے۔
14.2 مذکورہ بالا شق 14.1 میں ملکیتی معلومات کی تعریف سے قطع نظر، ملکیتی معلومات میں ایسی کوئی معلومات شامل نہیں ہیں جو:
(الف)  انکشاف کرنے والی پارٹی کی طرف سے وصول کنندہ پارٹی پر رازداری کی ذمہ داری کے بغیر انکشاف کیے جانے سے پہلے وصول کنندہ پارٹی کے قبضے میں تھا۔
(ب) وصول کنندہ پارٹی کی کسی غلطی کے بغیرمعاملہ عوام کے علم میں آجا تا ہے۔
(ج) وصول کنندہ پارٹی نے اسے رازداری کی ذمہ داری کے بغیر کسی تھرڈ پارٹی سے درست انداز میں وصول کیا ہے۔
(د)  وصول کنندہ پارٹی نے اسے انکشاف کرنے والی پارٹی کی ملکیتی معلومات کے استعمال یا حوالہ کے بغیر آزادانہ طور پر تیار کیا ہے۔ یا
(ہ) وصول کنندہ پارٹی نے انکشاف کرنے والی پارٹی کی پیشگی تحریری منظوری کے ساتھ انکشاف کیا ہے۔
14.3 متفقہ شرائط پرعمل درآمدمیں، ہر پارٹی دوسری پارٹی پر کچھ خاص ملکیتی معلومات ظاہر کر سکتی ہے۔
14.4 وصول کنندہ پارٹی  تسلیم کرتی ہے اور اس سے اتفاق کرتی ہے کہ ماسوائے اس کے کہ جس حدتک یہاں کچھ اور واضح طور پر بیان کیا گیا ہو، انکشاف کنندہ پارٹی کی ملکیتی معلومات انکشاف کنندہ پارٹی یا کسی ایسی تھرڈ پارٹی کی واحد اور خاص ملکیت رہیں گی جو انکشاف کنندہ پارٹی کو ایسی معلومات فراہم کرتی ہے، اور وصول کنندہ پارٹی پر ایسی معلومات کے انکشاف کو اس طرح کی ملکیتی معلومات کا کسی بھی قسم کا کوئی لائسنس، مفاد یا کسی بھی قسم کا حق تصور نہیں کیاجائے گا، ماسوائے معاہدہ شدہ شرائط کے تحت فراہمی کے۔
14.5 ہر وقت اور متفقہ شرائط میں سے کسی  بھی خاتمے سے قطع نظر، وصول کنندہ جماعت اس پر اتفاق کرتی ہے کہ وہ:
(الف) انکشاف کنندہ پارٹی کی ملکیتی معلومات کو کڑے صیغہ راز میں رکھے گی اور کسی تھرڈ پارٹی کو انکشاف نہیں کرے گی،ما سوائے اس کے کہ انکشاف کنندہ پارٹی کی طرف سے تحریری منظوری دی گئی ہو؛
(ب) وصول کنندہ پارٹی صرف اپنے ان اہلکاروں کو انکشاف کنندہ پارٹی کی ملکیتی معلومات تک رسائی کی اجازت دے گی جن کے لیے جاننا ضروری ہواور جو رازداری کے معاہدوں پر دستخط کرچکے ہوں یا رازداری کی ویسی ہی ذمہ داریوں کے پابند ہوں، جو متفقہ شرائط میں شامل ہیں۔
(ج) کسی تھرڈپارٹی کے استعمال اور ایسی تھرڈ پارٹی کو وصول کنندہ پارٹی کے ذریعہ فراہم کردہ ملکیتی معلومات کے انکشاف کے لئے انکشاف کنندہ پارٹی کوذمہ دار ہوں۔
(د) وصول شدہ ملکیتی معلومات کو ان متفقہ شرائط کے مقاصدکے لیے استعمال کریں گے، کسی بھی دوسرے مقصد کے لئے نہیں۔ اور
(ہ) کم از کم اسی درجے کی احتیاط برتیں گے جو وہ اپنی اتنی ہی اہم ذاتی ملکیتی معلومات کے تحفظ کے لیے استعمال کرتے ہوں، لیکن کسی بھی صورت میں، مناسب درجے کی احتیاط سے کم نہیں، بشمول اس طرح کی ملکیتی معلومات کے لئے انفارمیشن سیکیورٹی اسٹینڈرڈ برقرار رکھنا جو اس قسم کی معلومات کے لیے تجارتی لحاظ سے معقول اوررائج ہیں۔
14.6 شق 14.5 سے قطع نظر، ایک پارٹی درج ذیل صورتوں میں ملکیتی معلومات کا انکشاف کر سکتی ہے:
(الف) اگر قابل اطلاق قوانین کاتقاضا ہو۔
(ب) اگر کسی مجاز اتھارٹی کے حکم کا تقاضا ہو۔ یا
(ج) اگر اس کے پیشہ ور مشیروں (بشمول مشیرانِ قانون، وکلا، اور اکاؤنٹنٹس) اور / یا کنسلٹنٹس اور / یا ایجنٹوں کو مطلوب ہوں جو رازداری کی مناسب ذمہ داریوں سے مشروط ہے۔
14.7 اگر وصول کنندہ پارٹی کو شق 14.6 (a) یا (b) کے تحت ملکیتی معلومات کا انکشاف مطلوب ہے تو وہ قانونی طور پر جائز حد تک اس طرح کے انکشاف سے قبل انکشاف کنندہ پارٹی کو اس طرح کے انکشاف کا تحریری نوٹس فراہم کرے گی۔.
14.8 متفقہ شرائط کی ہرپارٹی کسی نقصان یا ملکیتی معلومات  کے نقصان یا بلااجازت انکشاف کا پتہ لگنے پر فورا ہی دوسری پارٹی کو تحریری طور پراطلاع دے گی۔
4.9 1وصول کنندہ پارٹی  انکشاف کنندہ پارٹی کی ملکیتی معلومات کو ری پروڈیوس نہیں کرے گی، ما سوائے اس کے کہ پارٹی کو اس کے فرائض اور ذمہ داریوں کو نبھانے یابصورت دیگرمتفقہ شرائط کے تحت ایسی پارٹی کو معاہدوں کی تعمیل کے لیے معقول حد تک ضرورت ہو۔ وصول کنندہ پارٹی کے ذریعہ کسی بھی ملکیتی معلومات کی ری پروڈکشن انکشاف کنندہ پارٹی کی ملکیت رہے گی اور اس میں ایسی کوئی یا تمام خفیہ یا ملکیتی نوٹسزیاشرحیں شامل ہوں گی جو اصل میں موجود ہوں، بشرطیکہ انکشاف کنندہ پارٹی کی طرف سے تحریری طور پر اس کے برعکس اختیار دیا گیا ہو۔
14.10 ماسوائے اس کے کہ متفقہ شرائط میں کسی اور طرح طے کیا گیا ہو،متفقہ شرائط کے خاتمے کے بعد، ہر وصول کنندہ پارٹی  یا تو دوسری پارٹی کی تحریری ہدایت پر، فوری طور پر انکشاف کنندہ پارٹی کی ملکیتی معلومات کی حامل تمام دستاویزات اور دیگر ٹھوس (بشمول الیکٹرانک) مواد، بشمول اپنی تحویل یا کنٹرول میں موجود تمام کاپیاں  انکشاف کنندہ پارٹی کو واپس کرے گی یا اس طرح کے تمام مواد کو زائل یا تلف کردے گی۔
14.11 مرچنٹ نیا پے ڈیٹا کے سلسلے میں مینویل اور پالیسیوں میں بیان کردہ، ڈیٹا کے تحفظ اور سیکیورٹی سے متعلق تمام ذمہ داریوں کی تعمیل کرے گا۔
15۔ خاتمہ
15.1۔ مرچنٹ ای منی اکاؤنٹ (اگر قابل اطلاق ہو) کے سلسلے میں استعمال کی شرائط کے تحت خاتمہ کے حقوق کو متاثر کیے بغیر، نیا پے تحریری نوٹس کے ذریعہ ان متفقہ شرائط کو فوری طور پر ختم کرسکتا ہے:
15.1.1. اگر مرچنٹ دیوالیہ پن کے لئے درخواست دائر کرتا ہے، کنگال ہوجاتا ہے، یا اپنے قرض دہندگان کے فائدے کے لئے کوئی انتظام یا معاہدہ تشکیل دیتا ہے، یا مرچنٹ یا اس کے کاروبار کے لئے کوئی وصول کنندہ مقرر کیا جاتا ہے، یا مرچنٹ رضاکارانہ طور پر یا مجبوراًتصفیہ میں جاتا ہے (بصورت دیگرتعمیر نو یا انضمام کے علاوہ)۔
15.1.2. مرچنٹ کی طرف سے ان متفقہ شرائط کی اہم  خلاف ورزی کی صورت میں۔
15.1.3۔ اگر مرچنٹ کسی لاگو قانون کی خلاف ورزی کرتا ہے یاکسی مجازاتھارٹی کے کسی حکم کی تعمیل کرنے میں ناکام ہو جاتا ہے۔
15.1.4۔ اگر مرچنٹ: (i) براہ راست یا بالواسطہ طور پر کسی ایسے عمل یا سرگرمی میں ملوث ہوتا ہے یا سہولت فراہم کرتا ہے جوغیر قانونی ہے یا نیا پے کی معقول رائے میں، اور چاہے ان متفقہ شرائط میں کہیں طے کیا گیا ہویا نہ کیا گیا ہو، اس سے نیا پے کی ساکھ یانیک نامی کو نقصان پہنچنے کا خطرہ ہو، یا (ii) کسی ایسے شخص یا ہستی کے ساتھ تعلقات قائم کرتایا جاری رکھتا ہے جس نے نیا پے کی نیک نیتی پر مبنی رائے میں، نیا پے کی ساکھ یا نیک نامی کو نقصان پہنچایا ہے یاپہنچانے کی دھمکی دی ہے۔
15.2۔ نیا پے پندرہ (15) دن کا نوٹس دے کر بغیر کسی وجہ کے ان متفقہ شرائط کو کسی بھی وقت ختم کر سکتا ہے۔
16۔پارٹیز کا تعلق
متفقہ شرائط میں شامل کسی بھی چیز کو مرچنٹ اور نیا پے کے مابین شراکت، مشترکہ منصوبے یا ایجنسی کا تعلق بنانے کے لئے نہیں سمجھا جائے گا۔ کسی بھی پارٹی کو یہ اختیار نہیں ہے کہ وہ دوسرے کی طرف سے کسی بھی طرح کے معاہدوں میں شامل ہو۔
17۔ نوٹسز
متفقہ شرائط کے تحت جو بھی نوٹس یا مراسلت کی جائے اسے تحریری طور پرکیا جانا چاہیے اور اسے لازماً یاتو((i دستی، فرسٹ کلاس پری پیڈ پوسٹ یا دیگر تسلیم شدہ کوریئر سروس کے ذریعے تاجر کے اس موجودہ یا گزشتہ معلوم پتے پرجو نیا پے مرچنٹ پورٹل پر رجسٹرڈہو۔ (ii) نیا پے مرچنٹ پورٹل پر رجسٹرڈ کسی بھی ای میل ایڈریس پر ای میل کے ذریعے، یا (iii) نیا پے مرچنٹ پورٹل پر نوٹیفکیشن کے ذریعے۔ کوئی بھی مراسلت دستی طور پر بھیجے جانے پر، اگراسے فرسٹ کلاس پوسٹ یا کسی دوسرے کورئیر سروس کے ذریعہ بھیجاگیا ہے تو، اسے پوسٹ کیے جانے یا کورئیر ہونے کے دوکاروباری دن (2)کے  اندر وصول شدہ سمجھا جائے گا۔اِن ایپ اطلاع کے ذریعے بھیجی گئی کوئی بھی مراسلت کومرچنٹ کو اسی دن وصول شدہ سمجھا جائے گا اگروہ نیاپے مرچنٹ پورٹل پر مرچنٹ کے اِن ایپ اطلاعاتی علاقے پر ڈلیورہو گیا ہو۔ ای میل کے ذریعہ بھیجی جانے والی کوئی بھی مراسلت ہمارے سرورز یا کسی بھی ایسے سروس پرووائیڈر کے سرور پرریکارڈ ہوتے ہی وصول شدہ تصور کی جائے گی، جس کی خدمات ہم اس طرح کی مواصلاتی خدمات کے لئے حاصل کرتے ہیں۔
18۔چھُوٹ
ان متفقہ شرائط کے تحت کسی بھی حق کی چھوٹ صرف اس صورت میں مؤثر ہوگی جب تحریری طور پر اس پر اتفاق یا اعلان کیا گیا ہو۔ کسی حق کو استعمال کرنے میں تاخیر یا کوئی بھی حق بروئے کارنہ لانے کو چھوٹ نہیں سمجھا جائے گا اوریہ آئندہ بھی کسی پارٹی کویہ حق استعمال کرنے سے نہیں روکے گا۔
19۔قابلِ علیحدگی
اگر ان متفقہ شرائط کا کوئی بھی حصہ کسی مجاز دائرہ اختیار کی عدالت کی طرف سے ناجائز، غیر قانونی یاناقابلِ نفاذ پایا جائے تو ایسے حصے کو معاہدے کے بقیہ حصے سے علیحدہ کردیا جائے گا، جو قانون کی طرف سے دی گئی اجازت کی پوری حد تک بدستورمؤثر اور قابل عمل ہوگا۔
20۔ مکمل معاہدہ
یہ متفقہ شرائط، اس موضوع کے سلسلے میں پارٹیوں کے پورے معاہدے کی نمائندگی کرتی ہیں۔ ہر فریق تسلیم کرتا ہے کہ اس نے ان اقرار ناموں میں صرف ان معاہدے کی شرائط میں موجود معروضات، ضمانتوں، وعدوں اور شرائط پر انحصار کے ساتھ شمولیت اختیار کی ہے اور ماسوائے اس کے کہ ان متفقہ شرائط میں واضح طور پر بیان کیا گیا ہو، کوئی بھی فریق ان شرائط کی تاریخ سے پہلے کی کسی دیگرمعروضات، ضمانتوں، وعدوں اور شرائط کا پابند نہیں ہوگا ماسوائے اس کے کہ اسے دھوکہ دہی سے تیارکیا گیا ہو۔
21۔لا گوقانون اور دائرہ اختیار
21.1 یہ متفقہ شرائط اوراس کے نتیجے میں یا اس کے حوالے سے فریقین کے مابین قائم ہونے والا قانونی تعلق اسلامی مملکتِ پاکستان کے قوانین کے تابع ہوگا اور ان کے مطابق تصور کیا جائے گا۔
21.2 ہرپارٹی بذریعہ ہٰذا کراچی میں عدالتوں کے خصوصی دائرہ اختیار کوقبول کرنے کا ناقابلِ تنسیخ اقرارکرتی ہے۔
Last Updated: 29 Oct 2021
1.  ABOUT NAYAPAY
NayaPay is licensed by the SBP as an Electronic Money Institution under the EMI Regulations.
2.  SCOPE
These Chat Terms and Conditions (Chat T&Cs) govern the Chat Service provided by NayaPay, in conjunction with NayaPay Terms of Use (hereinafter referred to as “Terms”) and Policies, as updated from time to time. In the event of any inconsistency between the Terms and these Chat T&Cs, the latter will prevail.
3.  DEFINITIONS
Any and all capitalized terms mentioned herein shall have the same meaning as ascribed to them in the Terms.
4.  PERMITTED USAGE OF CHAT SERVICE
4.1 As mentioned in our Terms, you should print and keep a copy of the Terms together with these Chat T&Cs.
4.2 You should use Chat only for purposes permitted under the Terms, these Chat T&Cs and Applicable Laws. Any breach of said Terms, Chat T&Cs and Applicable Laws, may, without prejudice to any other remedies or actions that NayaPay may (in its sole discretion) exercise or take in accordance with the Terms, result in the immediate suspension or termination of Chat Service and may also be reported to law enforcement agencies or any regulatory authority, depending on the severity of such breach.
4.3 You agree will not use (or assist others in using) Chat Service in ways that:
(a) violate, misappropriate, or infringe the rights of NayaPay, our users, or other third parties, including privacy, publicity, intellectual property, or other proprietary rights;
(b) are illegal, obscene, blasphemous, defamatory, threatening, intimidating, harassing, hateful, racially, or ethnically offensive, or instigate or encourage conduct that would be illegal, violative of the dignity of others, violative of national security sensitivities, or is otherwise inappropriate, including promoting violent crimes;
(c) involve publishing falsehoods, misrepresentations, spam, or misleading statements;
(d) impersonate someone;
(e) involve sending illegal or impermissible communications such as bulk messaging, auto-messaging, and the like; or
(f) involve any non-personal use of Chat Service unless otherwise authorized by us.
4.4 We reserve the right (with or without notice) to remove, suspend, or disable access to any and all content that is shared or disseminated using our Chat Service if:
(a) in our reasonable opinion, it is violative of the Terms, these Chat T&Cs, Policies or Applicable Laws; or
(b) we our directed by any government agency, regulatory authority or other law enforcement agency or any Court of law to remove, filter, block or restrict any consent under Applicable Laws.
4.5 You can report potentially violating content posted or shared by any particular User or being shared in any particular group Chats, to us in accordance with section 19.6 of the Terms for necessary action.
5.  USER RESPONSIBILITIES AND UNDERTAKINGS
5.1 You are responsible for keeping your device and your NayaPay Account safe and secure, and you must notify us promptly of any unauthorized use or security breach of your NayaPay Account or our Chat Service.
5.2 Our Chat Service may allow you to access, use, or interact with third-party websites, apps, content, and other products and services. For example, you may choose to use third-party data backup services (such as iCloud or Google Drive) or interact with a share button on a third party’s website / application that enables you to send information to your NayaPay contacts. Please note that when you use third-party services, their own terms and policies will govern your use of those services.
6.  ACCESS TO CHAT SERVICE
6.1 Our Chat Service may be interrupted, including for maintenance, repairs, upgrades, or network or equipment failures. We may discontinue some or all of our Chat Service, including certain features and the support for certain devices and platforms, at any time. Events beyond our control may affect our Chat Service, such as events in nature and other force majeure events
6.2 We may modify, suspend, or terminate your access to or use of our Chat Service anytime for any reason, such as if you violate (in letter or spirit) our Terms or create harm, risk, or possible legal exposure for us, our users, or others.
6.3 There are important differences between NayaPay Chat Service and your mobile/fixed-line telephone and SMS services. Our Chat Service does not provide access to emergency services or emergency services providers, including the police, fire departments, or hospitals, or otherwise connect to public safety answering points. You should ensure you can contact your relevant emergency services providers through a mobile, fixed-line telephone, or other service.
7.  CHANGE IN TERMS OF USE
7.1. The Chat T&Cs are subject to change. Changes will be implemented with notification from us under the procedure, and come into effect, in accordance with section 18 of the Terms.
1۔ نیاپے کے بارے میں
نیا پےSBP کی طرف سے EMI ریگولیشنز کے تحت بطورالیکٹرانک منی انسٹی ٹیوشن لائسنس یافتہ ہے۔
2۔ دائرہ کار
چیٹ کی یہ شرائط و ضوابط (Chat T&Cs) نیا پے کی طرف سے فراہم کردہ چیٹ سروس پر نیا پے کے استعمال کی شرائط (اس کے بعد "شرائط" کہا جائے گا) اور پالیسیزکے ساتھ لاگو ہیں، جن کی وقتاً فوقتاً تجدید کی جاتی ہے۔ شرائط اور چیٹ کی ان شرائط و ضوابط کے مابین کسی قسم کے تضاد کی صورت میں، مؤخر الذکر کو فوقیت حاصل ہوگی۔
3۔ تشریحات
یہاں درج کسی بھی یا تمام اہم شرائط کا وہی مطلب ہوگا جوان کے لیے شرائط میں بیان کیا گیاہے۔
4۔چیٹ سروس کامنظور شدہ استعمال
4.1 جیسا کہ ہماری شرائط میں ذکر کیا گیا ہے، آپ کو چیٹ کی ان شرائط و ضوابط کے ساتھ شرائط کی ایک کاپی پرنٹ کرکے اپنے پاس رکھنی چاہئے۔
4.2 آپ کو صرف ان شرائط،  چیٹ کی شرائط وضوابط اور قابل اطلاق قوانین کے تحت منظورشدہ مقاصد کے لئے چیٹ کا استعمال کرنا چاہئے۔ شرائط، چیٹ کی  شرائط وضوابط اور قابل اطلاق قوانین کی کوئی خلاف ورزی کا نتیجہ، نیا پے کی طرف سے (اپنی صوابدید کے مطابق) ان شرائط کے مطابق عمل میں لائی گئی کسی تدارکی اقدامات یا کارروائیوں سے قطع نظر، چیٹ سروس کو فوری طور پر معطل یاختم کرنے کی صورت میں نکل سکتا ہے اور اس طرح کی خلاف ورزی کی شدت کے مطابق، قانون نافذ کرنے والے اداروں یا کسی ریگولیٹری اتھارٹی کو بھی رپورٹ کی جاسکتی ہے۔
4.3 آپ چیٹ سروس کو ان طریقوں سے استعمال نہ کرنے (یا استعمال میں دوسروں کی مددنہ کرنے)کا اقرار کرتے ہیں:
(الف) نیا پے، ہمارے صارفین، یاکسی دیگر تھرڈ پارٹی کے حقوق کی خلاف ورزی، ناجائز استعمال یا ان کی خلاف ورزی کرنا، بشمول رازداری، تشہیر، دانشورانہ ملکیت، یا دوسرے ملکیتی حقوق۔
(ب) غیر قانونی، فحش، توہین آمیز، بدنام کرنے والی، دھمکی دینے،خوف دلانے والے، ہراساں کرنے والے، نفرت انگیز، نسلی طور پر، یا لسانی طور پر توہین آمیزہوں، یا ایسے اقدام کی ترغیب دیتے یا حوصلہ افزائی کرتے ہوں جو غیر قانونی ہوں، دوسروں کے وقار کی پامالی، قومی سلامتی کے حساس امورکی خلاف ورزی کرتے ہوں، یا پرتشدد جرائم کو فروغ دینے سمیت،کسی دوسری صورت میں نامناسب ہوں۔
(ج) جھوٹ، غلط بیانی، اسپام، یا گمراہ کن بیانات کی اشاعت کرنا۔
(ح) کسی کی نقالی کرنا؛
(و) غیر قانونی یا ناقابل معافی  پیغامات بھیجنا شامل ہے جیسے بلک میسجنگ، آٹو میسیجنگ، اور اس طرح کے دیگر پیغامات؛ یا
(ض) چیٹ سروس کاکوئی بھی غیر ذاتی استعمال،ماسوائے اس کے کہ ہمارے طرف سے اس کی اجازت دی گئی ہو۔
4.4 ہم اپنی چیٹ سروس کے ذریعے شیئرکئے یا پھیلائے جانے والے کسی بھی مواد کو ہٹانے، معطل کرنے یا رسائی روکنے کا حق (اطلاع کے ساتھ یا اس کے بغیر) محفوظ رکھتے،اگر:
(ا) ہماری معقول رائے میں، یہ شرائط، چیٹ کی شرائط وضوابط، پالیسیوں یا قابل اطلاق قوانین کی خلاف ورزی ہے، یا
(ب) ہمیں کسی بھی سرکاری ایجنسی، ریگولیٹری اتھارٹی یا قانون نافذ کرنے والے کسی دوسرے ادارے یا کسی بھی عدالت کی طرف سے قابل اطلاق قوانین کے تحت کسی بھی مواد کو ہٹانے، فلٹر کرنے، روکنے یا بلاک کرنے کی ہدایت کی گئی ہو۔
4.5 آپ ہمارے ضروری کارروائی کی شرائط کے سیکشن 19.6 کے مطابق کسی خاص صارف کی طرف سے ممکنہ طور پر خلاف ورزی والا مواد پوسٹ کرنے یا کسی خاص گروپ چیٹس میں شیئر کیے جانے کی اطلاع دے سکتے ہیں۔
5. صارف کی ذمہ داریاں اور اقرارنامے
5.1 آپ اپنے ڈیوائس اور اپنے نیا پے اکاؤنٹ کے تحفظ اور دیکھ بھال کے ذمہ دار ہیں اور آپ کو اپنے نیا پے اکاؤنٹ یا ہماری چیٹ سروس کے کسی بھی غیر مجاز استعمال یا حفاظتی خلاف ورزی کے بارے میں ہمیں فوری طور پر مطلع کرنا چاہئے۔
5.2 ہماری چیٹ سروس آپ کو تھرڈ پارٹی ویب سائٹس، ایپس، مواد، اور دیگر مصنوعات اور خدمات تک رسائی، استعمال اور بات چیت کرنے کی اجازت دے سکتی ہے۔ مثال کے طور پر، آپ تھرڈ پارٹی کی ڈیٹا بیک اپ سروسز (جیسے آئی کلاؤڈ یا گوگل ڈرائیو) کو استعمال کرنے کا انتخاب کرسکتے ہیں یا کسی تھرڈپارٹی کی ویب سائٹ / ایپلی کیشن پر شیئر بٹن کے ساتھ رابطہ کرسکتے ہیں جو آپ کو اپنے نیا پے رابطوں کو معلومات بھیجنے کے قابل بناتا ہے۔ براہ کرم نوٹ کریں کہ جب آپ تھرڈ پارٹی کی خدمات استعمال کرتے ہیں تو، ان کی اپنی شرائط اور پالیسیاں آپ کی طرف سے ان کی خدمات کے استعمال پر لاگو ہوں گی۔
6. چیٹ سروس تک رسائی حاصل کریں
6.1 ہماری چیٹ سروس میں مختلف وجوہات کے باعث رکاوٹ پیدا ہوسکتی ہے، بشمول مینٹیننس، مرمت، اپ گریڈ، یا نیٹ ورک یا آلات کی خرابی۔ ہم کسی بھی وقت اپنی کچھ یا ساری چیٹ سروس بند کرسکتے ہیں، جس میں کچھ مخصوص ڈیوائسز اور پلیٹ فارمز کے لئے مخصوص فیچرزاور سپورٹ شامل ہے۔ ہمارے کنٹرول سے باہرواقعات ہماری چیٹ سروس پر اثر انداز ہوسکتے ہیں، جیسے قدرتی عوامل اور دیگر مجبور کردینے والے واقعات۔
6.2 ہم کسی بھی وجہ سے کسی بھی وقت ہماری چیٹ سروس تک آپ کی رسائی یا استعمال میں ردوبدل،تعطل کرسکتے ہیں یا اسے ختم کرسکتے ہیں، جیسے کہ اگر آپ ہماری شرائط کی(لفظی و معنوی اعتبار سے) خلاف ورزی کرتے ہیں یا ہمارے لئے، ہمارے صارفین کے لیے، یادیگر افراد کے لئے نقصان، خطرہ، یا ممکنہ قانونی خطرات پیدا کرسکتے ہیں۔
6.3 نیا پے چیٹ سروس اور آپ کے موبائل / فکسڈ لائن ٹیلیفون اور ایس ایم ایس خدمات کے مابین اہم فرق موجود ہیں۔ ہماری چیٹ سروس ہنگامی خدمات یا ہنگامی خدمات فراہم کرنے والوں،بشمول پولیس، فائر ڈپارٹمنٹ، یا اسپتال تک رسائی فراہم نہیں کرتی ہے ، یابصورتِ دیگر عوامی تحفظ کے جواب دینے والے پوائنٹس سے منسلک نہیں۔ آپ کو یقینی بنانا چاہئے کہ آپ موبائل، فکسڈ لائن ٹیلیفون، یا کسی اور خدمت کے ذریعے اپنے متعلقہ ہنگامی خدمات فراہم کرنے والوں سے رابطہ کرسکتے ہیں۔
7۔ استعمال کی شرائط میں تبدیلی
7.1 چیٹ شرائط و ضوابط  تبدیل کرنے سے مشروط  ہیں۔، تبدیلیوں کا اطلاق طریقہ کار کے تحت شرائط کے سیکشن 18 کے مطابق ہماری طرف سے اطلاع کے ساتھ نافذ العمل ہوگا۔
Last Updated: 29 Oct 2021
CONTACT US
You can either call NayaPay customer services helpline (111-222-729) to lodge a complaint/dispute or can file a dispute through the in-app dispute center.
HOW TO LODGE A DISPUTE?
A dispute can be lodged against any transaction through the NayaPay app or the NayaPay helpline (please refer User T&Cs for definition of ‘Transaction’), whereas complaint can be filed against any issue you are facing while accessing our Services through the NayaPay helpline.
Step 1: Initiate a ticket by tapping ‘Dispute Resolution’ in Menu bar.
Step 2: Select type of dispute.
Step 3: Upload evidence to support your claim (image).
Step 4: Provide a description of exactly what happened.
Step 5: Ticket may be lodged through the NayaPay helpline as well.
Step 6: Once a ticket is lodged, you can view the status of your dispute at any point of time.
FOR YOUR ASSISTANCE, IF YOU ARE FILING A COMPLAINT THROUGH NAYAPAY HELPLINE
S.No.
Type of Complaint
Brief Description of the complaint
Standard Turnaround time
1
Unable to link a bank account
If you are facing any issue when trying to link a partner bank’s account
10 business days
2
Not receiving OTP for linked account services
If you are not receiving the OTP sent by the partner bank for account linking or while making a transaction using its linked account
3
Unable to delink a bank account
If you are facing issues to delink your linked bank account from NayaPay app
4
Debit card not received
Debit card is not received within the TAT on registered address
5
Any other complaint
Please call our customer support
FOR YOUR ASSISTANCE, IF YOU ARE LODGING A DISPUTE THROUGH NAYAPAY APPLICATION / HELPLINE
S.No.
Type of disputes
Brief Description of the dispute
Standard Turnaround time
1
Multiple Charge
In case you have been charged multiple times against a single transaction performed by you.
10 business days
(Card related disputes: 60 business days)
2
Unrecognized transaction
In case your account has been debited for a transaction which you have not performed
10 business days
(Card related disputes: 60 business days)
3
Recipient did not receive money
In case you performed a transaction and intended recipient did not receive the money while your account has been debited for the same.
10 business days
(Card related disputes: 60 business days)
4
Service not received against a payment
In case you didn’t receive the service for which you initiated a request through NayaPay, and your account has been debited for the same.
10 business days
(Card related disputes: 60 business days)
5
Wallet load through linked bank account failed
In case money was debited from your linked bank account but is not credited into your NayaPay wallet.
10 business days
6
Withdrawal to linked bank account failed
In case money was debited from your wallet/e-money account but is not credited into your linked bank account
10 business days
7
Wallet load through cash deposit failed
In case you deposited the cash at bank branch but the same has not been credited into your wallet
10 business days
8
Loading through agents
In case you deposited the cash at authorized agent but the same has not been credited into your wallet
10 business days
9
Cash not dispensed
In case of cash withdrawal at any ATM, cash is not dispensed but your wallet is debited.
10 business days
(Card related disputes: 60 business days)
10
Card related disputes
In case of any possible disputes for transactions performed using your NayaPay debit card:
Cash not dispensed
Duplicate Processing
Paid by other means
Transaction amount differ
Transaction not recognized
Fraudulent transaction
Goods/services not in accordance with the request
60 business days
11
Any other dispute
Please write a brief description of issue you are facing
10 business days
Note: Saturdays, Sundays and Public Holidays will not be considered as Business Days.
ہم سے رابطہ کریں
آپ شکایت / تنازعہ کا اندراج کرانے کے لئے نیا پے کسٹمر سروسز ہیلپ لائن ( 729 222 111) پر کال کرسکتے ہیں یااِن ایپ ڈسپیوٹ سینٹر کے ذریعے تنازع کا اندراج کراسکتے ہیں۔
تنازع کا اندراج کیسے کروائیں؟
نیا پے ایپ یا نیا پے ہیلپ لائن کے ذریعے کسی بھی لین دین(ٹرانزیکشن) کے خلاف تنازع درج کرایاجاسکتا ہے (براہ کرم 'ٹرانزیکشن' کی تعریف کے لیے شرائط وضوابط برائے صارف سے رجوع کریں)، جبکہ ہماری خدمات تک رسائی حاصل کرنے کے دوران آپ کو جو بھی مسئلہ درپیش ہے اس کے خلاف نیا پے ہیلپ لائن کے ذریعے شکایت درج کرائی جاسکتی ہے۔
مرحلہ 1: مینو بار میں 'Dispute Resolution' پر ٹیپ کرکے ایک ٹکٹ کا آغاز کریں۔
مرحلہ 2: تنازع کی قسم منتخب کریں۔
مرحلہ 3: اپنے دعویٰ کی حمایت میں ثبوت(تصویر) اپ لوڈ کریں۔
مرحلہ 4: درحقیقت جو کچھ رونما ہوا،اس کی تفصیل فراہم کریں۔
مرحلہ 5: نیاپے ہیلپ لائن کے ذریعے بھی ٹکٹ جمع کرایا جاسکتا ہے۔
مرحلہ 6: ایک بار ٹکٹ جمع کروانے کے بعد، آپ کسی بھی وقت اپنے تنازع کی صورتِ حال دیکھ سکتے ہیں۔
آپ کی مدد کے لئے،اگر آپ نیا پے ہیلپ لائن کے ذریعے شکایت درج کرا رہے ہیں
شکایت کے ازالے کامعیاری وقت(ٹرن اراؤنڈ ٹائم)
شکایت کی تفصیل
شکایت کی قسم
نمبرشمار
10کاروباری دن
اگرآپ کو پارٹنر بینک کے اکاؤنٹ کے منسلک ہونے میں کسی مسئلے کا سامنا کرنا پڑتا ہو
کسی بینک اکاؤنٹ کے منسلک ہونے میں ناکامی
1
اگر آپ کو پارٹنر بینک کی طرف سے اکاؤنٹ لنک کرنے یا اس کے منسلک اکاؤنٹ کا استعمال کرکے لین دین کرتے ہوئے بھیجا ہوا او ٹی پی موصول نہیں ہورہا
منسلک اکاؤنٹ کی خدمات کے لئے او ٹی پی وصول نہ کرنا
2
اگر آپ کو نیا پے ایپ سے منسلک شدہ بینک اکاؤنٹ کو ڈی لنک کرنے کے لئے مسائل درپیش ہیں
آپ بینک اکاؤنٹ کوغیر منسلک (ڈی لنک) کرنے سے قاصر ہیں
3
ٹرن اراؤنڈ ٹائم کے اندر رجسٹرڈ ایڈریس پر ڈیبٹ کارڈ موصول نہیں ہوا
آپ کو ڈیبٹ کارڈ موصول نہیں ہوا
4
براہ کرم ہمارے کسٹمر سپورٹ کو کال کریں
کوئی اور شکایت
5
آپ کی مدد کے لئے،اگر آپ نیا پے ایپلیکیشن/ ہیلپ لائن کے ذریعے تنازع کااندراج کرا رہے ہیں
تناز ع کے حل کامعیاری وقت (ٹرن اراؤنڈ ٹائم)
تنازع کی تفصیل
تنازع کی قسم
نمبرشمار
10 کاروباری دن
(کارڈ سے متعلق تنازعات: 60 کاروباری دن)
اگر آپ کی طرف سے کی گئی کسی ٹرانزیکشن کے مقابل آپ کومتعدد بار چارج کیا گیا ہو۔
ایک سے زائد مرتبہ چارج ہونا
1
10 کاروباری دن
(کارڈ سے متعلق تنازعات: 60 کاروباری دن)
آپ کے اکاؤنٹ کو اس ٹرانزیکشن کے لئے ڈیبٹ کردیا گیا ہے جو آپ نے نہیں کی ہے۔
غیر تسلیم شدہ ٹرانزیکشن کی صورت میں
2
10 کاروباری دن
(کارڈ سے متعلق تنازعات: 60 کاروباری دن)
اگر آپ نے کوئی ٹرانزیکشن کی ہو اور متعلقہ وصول کنندہ کورقم موصول نہیں ہوئی جبکہ وہ آپ کے اکاؤنٹ سے ڈیبٹ ہوچکی ہے۔
وصول کنندہ کو رقم موصول نہیں ہوئی
3
10 کاروباری دن
(کارڈ سے متعلق تنازعات: 60 کاروباری دن)
اگر آپ کو وہ خدمت حاصل نہیں ہوئی جس کے لئے نیا پے کے ذریعہ درخواست شروع کی تھی اور اس کے لیے آپ کے اکاؤنٹ میں سے رقم ڈیبٹ کردی گئی ہے۔
کسی ادائیگی کے مقابل سروس حاصل نہیں ہوئی
4
10کاروباری دن
اس صورت میں جب آپ کے منسلک شدہ بینک اکاؤنٹ سے رقم ڈیبٹ ہوجاتی ہے لیکن آپ کے نیا پے والٹ میں رقم جمع نہیں ہوتی ہے۔
منسلک شدہ اکاؤنٹ کے ذریعے والیٹ لوڈ کرنے میں ناکامی
5
10کاروباری دن
ایسی صورت میں کہ آپ کے والیٹ/ای منی اکاؤنٹ سے رقم ڈیبٹ ہوگئی لیکن آپ کے منسلک شدہ اکاؤنٹ میں کریڈٹ نہیں ہوئی۔
منسلک شدہ بینک اکاؤنٹ تک رقم نکالنے میں ناکامی
6
10کاروباری دن
اگر آپ بینک برانچ میں نقد رقم جمع کرواتے ہیں لیکن وہ آپ کے والٹ میں جمع نہیں ہوتی
کیش ڈپازٹ کے ذریعہ والٹ لوڈ کرنے میں ناکامی
7
10کاروباری دن
اگر آپ نے مجاز ایجنٹ کے پاس نقد رقم جمع کروادی لیکن وہ رقم آپ کے نیاپے والٹ میں کریڈٹ نہیں ہوئی۔
ایجنٹس کے ذریعے لوڈنگ
8
10 کاروباری دن
(کارڈ سے متعلق تنازعات: 60 کاروباری دن)
آپ نےکسی اے ٹی ایم ے کیش نکلوانے کی ناکام کوشش کی لیکن آپ کا والٹ ڈیبٹ ہوگیا ہو۔
کیش حاصل نہ ہونا
9
60  کاروباری دن
آپ کے نیا پے ڈیبٹ کارڈ کے استعمال کے ذریعے ٹرانزیکشن سے متعلق کسی بھی ممکنہ تنازعہ کی صورت میں:
- کیش نہیں نکلا۔
- ڈپلیکیٹ پروسیسنگ
- دوسرے طریقوں سے اداکیا گیا
- ٹرانزیکشن کی رقم مختلف ہے
- ٹرنزیکشن تسلیم نہیں کی گئی
- دھوکا دہی سے کی گئی
ٹرانزیکشن
سامان / خدمات درخواست کے مطابق نہیں
کارڈ سے متعلق تنازعات
10
10کاروباری دن
براہ کرم آپ کو درپیش مسئلے کی مختصر تفصیل7دن تک درج کریں
کوئی اور تنازع
11
نوٹ: ہفتہ ، اتوار اور عوامی تعطیلات کو کاروباری دن نہیں سمجھا جائے گا
Last Updated: 19 Nov 2024
1.	Definitions
Unless specified otherwise, capitalized terms shall have the meaning ascribed to such terms in the Terms of Use (defined below).
Chat Service
means the chat functionality of the NayaPay Platform which allows you to communicate with other users/account holders of the NayaPay Platform;
Customer
means a consumer who opens and maintains a NayaPay Account and is registered on the NayaPay Platform;
Merchants
means the person who is in the business of providing goods and/or services to consumers and who has accepted NayaPay Merchant T&C’s for receiving payments from Customers utilizing the NayaPay Platform;
NayaPay Platform
means the electronic platform, whether accessed through a mobile application, handheld devices, portals, payment gateways or websites, or other means, developed and operated by NayaPay to open NayaPay Accounts and provide Services, and shall, for the purposes of this Privacy Policy, include the NayaPay Merchant Portal;
Personal Data
personal information that can be associated with an identified or identifiable person. “Personal Data” can include name, postal address (including billing and shipping addresses), telephone number, email address, payment card number, other financial account information, biometric data, account number, date of birth, and government-issued credentials (e.g., driver’s license number, CNIC Number, , passport, and Taxpayer IDs).  Personal Data does not include information that does not identify a specific individual;
Privacy Policy
means this NayaPay Privacy Policy as amended from time to time;
Terms of Use
means the terms and conditions applicable to Users and which may be accessed at
here
;
User
refers to Customers and Merchants collectively.
2.	Objective
The purpose of this Privacy Policy is to explain how we may collect, retain, process, share and transfer your Personal Data when you use our Services. This Privacy Policy applies to your Personal Data when you use our Services and does not apply to online websites or services that we do not own or control, including websites or services of Merchants.
This Privacy Policy is designed to help you understand our privacy practices in relation to the collection, use, processing, and, disclosure of your Personal Data and to help you understand your privacy choices when you use our Services.
Please contact us if you have questions about our Privacy Policy.
Our contact information is as follows:
Email address:
legal@nayapay.com
Telephone number:
+9221-111-222-729
+1-650-468-2078
Address:
NayaPay (Private) Limited
Head Office – 10th Floor, Lakson Square Building 3
Sarwar Shaheed Road, Karachi – 74200, Pakistan
Attention: Legal Department
3.	Legal Requirements
NayaPay is licensed as an Electronic Money Institution by the SBP and is bound by its confidentiality obligations under Applicable Laws including, but not limited to the EMI Regulations, Payment Systems and Electronic Fund Transfers Act, 2007, and Protection of Electronic Crimes Act, 2016.
4.	Scope
This Privacy Policy shall apply to all departments of the Company and employees of such departments who have access to Personal Data of the Users.
5.	Policy Statement
Respect for your privacy is coded into our DNA. Since inception, we have aspired to build our Services with a set of strong privacy principles in mind.
NayaPay provides digital payment services, messaging, and other services to the Customers across Pakistan. Our, inter alia, Privacy Policy helps explain our information (including messages, transaction histories etc.) practices. For example, we talk about what information we collect and how this affects you. We also explain the steps we take to protect your privacy – like building NayaPay so that messages that have been delivered through our Chat Service are not stored, and giving you control over who you communicate with on our Services.
When we say “our,” “we,” or “us,” we refer to NayaPay. This Privacy Policy (“Privacy Policy”) applies to all of our Services, unless specified otherwise.
Please also read NayaPay’s Terms of Use, which describe the terms under which you use our Services.
What Personal Data do we collect?
NayaPay receives or collects information when we operate and provide our Services, including when you install, access, or use our Services. The information may have been provided by you or automatically collected by us, subject to your acceptance of our Terms of Use. The information consists of information you provide and/or information we collect and includes, but is not limited to, the following:
Your Account information
– When you register to use our Services by creating a Chat profile and establishing a NayaPay Account, we will collect Personal Data as necessary to offer and fulfill the Services you request.
That information would include all necessary details required for the purpose of activating Chat profile and Payment Services, as required by the relevant regulations to perform customer due diligence, which would include the name, phone number, address, national identification documents, etc.
We may require you to provide us with additional Personal Data as you continue to use our Services.
Transaction and experience information
– When you use our Payment Services, whether to send money to friends and family, to receive money, to make purchases from Merchants, or to process payments, we collect and save information about the Transaction, as well as other information associated with the Transaction such as amount sent or requested, amount paid for products or services, Merchant information, including information about source of funds used to complete the Transaction, device information, technical usage data, and geolocation and / or other relevant information.
Participant information
– When you use our Services, we collect and save Personal Data you provide to us about the other participants associated with the Transaction or Chat.
Send or request money:
When you send or request money through the Services, we collect Personal Data about the participant who is receiving money from you or sending money to you.  The extent of Personal Data required about a participant may vary depending on the Services you are using to send or request money.
Pay or request someone else to pay a bill:
If you use our Services to pay a bill for the benefit of someone else, or if you request a User to pay a bill for you, we may collect Personal Data from you about the account holder such as name, postal address, telephone number, email address, and account number of the bill that you intend to pay or request to be paid.
Add money to your NayaPay Accounts:
If you use our Services to add money to your NayaPay Account through the various available modes, or someone else adds money to your NayaPay Account, we may collect Personal Data from you about the other party, or from the other party about you to facilitate the request.
Your messages:
We do not retain your messages in the ordinary course of providing our Services to you except for group Chat Services. Once your messages (including your chats, photos, videos, voice messages, files, and share location information) are delivered, they are deleted from our servers. Your messages are stored on your own device. If a message cannot be delivered immediately (for example, if you are offline), we may keep it on our servers for up to 30 days or till the message storage limit for the intended recipient is exhausted, as we try to deliver it. If a message is still undelivered after 30 days or if the message storage limit of the intended recipient is exhausted, we delete it. To improve performance and deliver media messages more efficiently, such as when many people are sharing a popular photo or video, we may retain that content on our servers for a longer period of time. We also offer end-to-end encryption for our Chat Services, except for group Chat Services. End-to-end encryption means that your messages are encrypted to protect against us and third parties from reading them.
Information about your contacts
– It may be easier for us to help you interact with your friends and contacts if you choose to sync or upload your contact list information to your NayaPay Account. If you choose to do so, we will collect and use the names, telephone numbers, addresses and email addresses in your contact list information, including those of users of our Services and your other contacts, on a continued basis to improve your experience when you use the Services. This information is used to identify which of your contacts in your device’s phone book are also NayaPay users and add them to your NayaPay contact book so you can chat and transact with them easily. We will also update your NayaPay contacts when your contacts who are not yet using NayaPay sign up later. You can control the contact sync feature from your app as well as device-based settings. Learn more about our contact syncing feature
here
.
Information that you choose to provide us to obtain additional Services or specific online Services
– If you request or participate in an optional site feature, or request enhanced Services or other elective functionality, we may collect additional information from you.  We will update this Privacy Policy from time to time to cover information required to obtain additional Services or specific online Services as and when such Services are offered on the NayaPay Platform.
Information about you from third-party sources
– We obtain information from third-party sources such as NADRA, Merchants, and credit and other related data bureaus, where permitted by Applicable Laws.
Other information we collect related to your use of our Sites or Services
– We may collect additional information from or about you when you communicate with us, contact our customer support teams or respond to a survey.
Why Do We Retain Personal Data?
We retain Personal Data to fulfill our obligations under Applicable Laws and for our business purposes.  We may retain Personal Data for longer periods than required by Applicable Law if it is in our legitimate business interests and not prohibited by Applicable Law.  If your NayaPay Account is closed, we may take steps to mask Personal Data and other information, but we reserve our ability to retain and access the data for so long as required to comply with Applicable Law.  We will continue to use and disclose such Personal Data in accordance with this Privacy Policy.
How Do We Process Personal Data?
We may process your information for the following reasons:
To provide the Services
, including:
Initiate and execute a Transaction;
authenticate your access to a NayaPay Account;
communicate with you about your NayaPay Account, the Services, or NayaPay;
connect a Linked Account which is maintained with a Partner Institution with the NayaPay Platform;
perform creditworthiness and other financial standing checks, evaluate applications, and compare information for accuracy and verification purposes;
keep your NayaPay Account and financial information up to date.
To manage our business needs
, such as monitoring, analyzing, and improving the Services’ performance and functionality.  For example, we analyze your behavior and perform research about the way you use our Services.
To manage risk and protect the NayaPay Platform, the Services and you from fraud by verifying your identity.
NayaPay’s risk and fraud tools use Personal Data, device information, technical usage data and geolocation information from our NayaPay Platform and websites that offer NayaPay Services to help detect and prevent fraud and abuse of the Services.
To market to you
NayaPay’s risk and fraud tools use Personal Data, device information, technical usage data and geolocation information from our NayaPay Platform and websites that offer NayaPay Services to help detect and prevent fraud and abuse of the Services.
To provide personalized Services offered by NayaPay on third-party websites and online services.
We may use your Personal Data and other information collected in accordance with this Privacy Policy to provide a targeted display, feature, Services or offer to you on third-party websites.  We may use cookies and other tracking technologies to provide these online services and/or work with other third parties such as Merchants, advertising or analytics companies to provide these online services.
To provide you with location-specific options, functionality or offers
if you elect to share your geolocation information through the Services.  We will use this information to enhance the security of the Services and provide you with location-based Services, such as advertising, search results, and other personalized content.
To comply with our obligations and to enforce the terms of our NayaPay Platform and Services,
including to comply with all Applicable laws.
To make it easier for you to find and connect with others,
we may use your Personal Data and other information you have shared with the Service to suggest connections between you and people you may know.  For example, we may associate information that we learn about you through your and your contacts’ use of the Services, and information you and others provide to suggest people you may know or may want to interact with through our Services.  Social functionality and features designed to simplify your use of the Services with others vary by Service.
To respond to your requests,
for example to contact you about a question you submitted to our customer service team.
Do We Share Personal Data?
We may share your Personal Data or other information about you with others in a variety of ways as described in this section of the Privacy Policy for the purposes of and in connection with the use of the NayaPay Platform, NayaPay products and Services and general business purposes. Your Personal Data or other information will, at all times, be shared on a confidential basis and its usage will be restricted for the purposes for which it is shared or disclosed as provided in this Privacy Policy. We may share your Personal Data or other information for the following reasons:
With other members of the NayaPay corporate family:
We may share your Personal Data with members of the NayaPay family of entities to, among other things, provide the NayaPay products or Services you have requested or authorized, or to provide products and services that are a part of our common or their individual public offering; to manage risk; to help detect and prevent potentially illegal and fraudulent acts and other violations of our policies and agreements; and to help us manage the availability and connectivity of NayaPay products, Services, and communications.
With other service providers/agents:
We may share Personal Data with service providers and/or agents that provide us support and facilitate us in providing the Services or otherwise perform services and functions at our direction and on our behalf. These service providers may carry out functions in relation to the Services, for example, verify your identity, assist in processing transactions, data analytics and other monitoring and analyzing of data for improving the Services’ performance and functionality, send you advertisements for our products and Services, or provide customer support.
With other financial institutions:
We may share Personal Data with other financial institutions that we have partnered with to jointly create and offer products / Services. These financial institutions may only use this information to develop, market and offer NayaPay-related products and Services. We may also share Personal Data to process transactions, provide you with benefits associated with your eligible cards, and keep your financial information up to date.
With the other parties to Transactions when you use the Services, such as other Users, Merchants, and their service providers:
We may share Personal Data and other information about you and your NayaPay Account with the other parties involved in processing your Transactions. This includes other Users, Merchants and service providers you are sending funds to or receiving funds from, when you use the Services to pay for goods or services. The information includes:
Personal Data and NayaPay Account information necessary to facilitate the Transaction and to comply with Applicable Laws;
information to help other participant(s) resolve disputes and detect and prevent fraud; and
aggregated data and performance analytics, including results of polls conducted from time to time in order to gauge consumer and merchant behavior to help Merchants better understand Users and to help Merchants enhance Users’ experiences.
With other third parties for our business purposes or as permitted or required by Applicable Law:
We may share your Personal Data or other information about you with other parties for NayaPay’s legitimate business purposes or as permitted or required by Applicable Law, including:
if we need to do so to comply with a subpoena, court order, direction, or other legal process or requirement under Applicable Law issued or initiated by law enforcement, regulators, government officials, or other third parties (in Pakistan) to or against NayaPay or one of its affiliates;
when we need to do so to comply with credit card rules or other requirements and regulations of local and foreign card payment schemes;
when we believe, in our sole discretion (acting reasonably), that the disclosure of Personal Data is necessary or appropriate to prevent physical harm or financial loss; or to report suspected illegal activity or to investigate violations of the Terms of Use or agreements with Merchants;
to protect our property, Services and legal rights;
to potential acquirers and merging entities or to otherwise facilitate a purchase or sale of all or part of NayaPay’s business;
in connection with shipping and related services for purchases made using a Service;
to help assess and manage risk and prevent fraud against us, our Users and fraud involving our NayaPay Platform or use of our Services, including fraud that occurs at or involves our business partners, service providers/agents, strategic ventures, or other individuals and Merchants;
with Partner Institutions for the purpose of linked Partner Bank Accounts with NayaPay Accounts or as otherwise required under relevant agreements; and
to support our audit, compliance, and corporate governance functions.
Otherwise With your consent:
We do not share your Personal Data with third parties for purposes unrelated to the Services without your consent.
In addition, NayaPay may provide aggregated statistical data to third parties, including other businesses and members of the public, about how, when, and why Users visit our NayaPay Platform and use our Services.  This data will not personally identify you or provide information about your use of the NayaPay Platform or Services.  We do not share your Personal Data with third parties for purposes unrelated to the Services without your consent.
How Do We Use Cookies and Tracking Technologies?
When you access NayaPay Platform or use our Services, we may use cookies and other tracking technologies (collectively, “Cookies”) collected from you to recognize you as a User and to customize your online experiences, the Services you use, and other online content and advertising; measure the effectiveness of promotions and perform analytics; and to mitigate risk, prevent potential fraud, and promote trust and safety across our Services.  Certain aspects and features of our Services are only available through the use of Cookies, so if you choose to disable or decline Cookies, your use of the Services may be limited or not possible.
Do Not Track (DNT) is an optional browser setting that allows you to express your preferences regarding tracking by advertisers and other third parties.  We do not respond to DNT signals.
What Privacy Choices Are Available to You?
You have choices when it comes to the privacy practices and communications described in this Privacy Policy. Many of your choices may be explained at the time you sign up for or use a Service or in the context of your use of the NayaPay Platform. You may be provided with instructions and prompts within the experiences as you navigate the Services.
Personal Data.
You may decline to provide Personal Data when it is requested by NayaPay, but certain Services or all of the Services may be unavailable to you. If you have a NayaPay Account, you generally may review and edit Personal Data by logging in and updating the information directly or by contacting us.
Contact us
if you do not have a NayaPay Account or if you have questions about your NayaPay Account information or other Personal Data.
Location and other device-level information.
The device you use to access the NayaPay Platform or Services may collect information about you, including geolocation information and User usage data that NayaPay may then collect and use. For information about your ability to restrict the collection and use of such information, please use the settings available in the device.
Finding and connecting with others.
If available, you may manage your preferences for finding and connecting with others from your NayaPay Account of the Service you use.
NayaPay Account Linking.
If you authorize Partner Bank Account Linking to a NayaPay Account or NayaPay Platform or linking of your NayaPay Account to your other accounts (including social media accounts), you may be able to manage your connection preferences from your NayaPay Account or the Partner Bank Account or other platforms/websites. Please refer to the privacy notice and policies that governs the Partner Bank’s or other relevant platforms for more information on the choices you may have.
Cookies.
You may have options available to manage your cookies preferences. For example, your browser or internet device may allow you delete, disable, or block certain cookies and other tracking technologies. You can learn more by visiting AboutCookies.org. You may choose to enable these options but doing so may prevent you from using many of the core features and functions available on the NayaPay Platform or in relation to a Service. You may also have an option regarding the use of cookies and other tracking technologies when you use a Service or visit parts of the NayaPay Platform. For example, you may be asked if you want the Service or the NayaPay Platform to “remember” certain things about you, and we will use cookies and other tracking technologies to the extent that you permit them.
Marketing:
We may send you marketing content about our Services, products, products we jointly offer with Partner Institutions, as well as the products and services of unaffiliated third parties and members of the NayaPay corporate family through various communication channels, for example, email, text, pop-ups, push notifications, and messaging applications. If you do not wish to be notified of any of the aforementioned communication, you can disable the notification by changing the appropriate setting on the NayaPay Platform.
Informational and Other:
We will send, as per the Terms of User, communications to you that are required or necessary to send to Users of our Services, notifications that contain important information and other communications that you request from us. You may not opt out of receiving these communications.
How Do We Protect Your Personal Data?
We maintain technical, physical, and administrative security measures designed to provide reasonable protection for your Personal Data against loss, misuse, unauthorized access, disclosure, and alteration. The security measures include firewalls, data encryption, physical access controls to our data centers, and information access authorization controls.  While we are dedicated to securing our systems and Services, you are, as per the Terms of Use, responsible for securing and maintaining the privacy of your password(s), MPIN and NayaPay Account/profile registration information and verifying that the Personal Data we maintain about you is accurate and current. We are not responsible for protecting any Personal Data that we share with a Partner Bank based on Partner Bank Account Linking that you have authorized.
What Else Should You Know?
Changes to This Privacy Statement.
We may revise this Privacy Policy from time to time to reflect changes to our business, or Services, or Applicable Laws.  Such revisions will be notified to the Users through the NayaPay Platform. The revised Privacy Statement will be effective as of the published effective date. Continuing use of NayaPay’s Services shall be deemed as acceptance of the revised Privacy Policy by the Users. We also may notify Users of the change using email or other means.
Disclaimer:
NayaPay is the sole owner of the domain @nayapay.com and is exclusively responsible for any activities, content, or transactions associated with this domain. NayaPay does not accept any responsibility for actions, content, or activities related to any other domains, including domains with similar names or any third-party websites. All responsibility for actions outside of the @nayapay.com domain rests with the respective parties involved.
Download the app now!